
https://archive.org/stream/CommunistInfiltrationInTheUnitedStatesItsNatureAndHowToCombatIt/CIUS2d_djvu.txt


should read this

	The report also sets forth a program of counterattack, and 
	it is hoped that all patriotic and democratic-minded persons 
	will supply talent and energy to help to combat this menace 
	among us. The program calls not for sweeping indictment and 
	broadside attack, but for painstaking fact-gathering, inter- 
	pretation and understanding. Given the facts, we will find a 
	solution. 


"fact gathering" and "understanding" instead of broadside attack, unlike HUAC

did they see that coming? this was written 1946


	...EVEN MORE SERIOUS in the long run were the effects 
	of Communist pressure groups upon the liberals. Pres- 
	sure came through two broad channels. The first was the left- 
	wing press, so widely read and highly regarded in Washington. 
	Newspapers such as PM and periodicals such as the Nation 
	and the New Republic enjoyed almost a sacrosanct status 
	among many government officials. These publications in turn 
	were pro-Soviet and often followed faithfully the Communist 
	line. Indeed, the Washington staff of PM recently resigned, 
	alleging continued Communist domination of the paper.* 

	The tactics of these periodicals followed the familiar "club 
	and carrot" technique so well used by the Communists. 
	Favored public officials and policies were praised to the skies, 
	while those disliked were flayed unmercifully. An illustration 
	of their success can be found in the Department of State. By 
	attacking this Department, and certain individuals, as reac- 
	tionary and Fascist, this group succeeded in driving many 
	faithful public servants from the government. Their successors 
	were more careful not to offend such an aggressive group. They 
	made appointments and advocated policies which would not 
	be attacked by the vigorous leftist press. The result was the 
	disastrous era of appeasement of Russia, the bitter fruits of 
	which we have harvested since VJ Day. 



	...SOME concrete illustrations will show the effectiveness of 
	Communist infiltration and pressure tactics. They will 
	be taken from the field of foreign policy, since this is the cur- 
	rent Communist concentration. The first concerns the Potsdam 
	policy in Germany. The long-range Communist policy on 
	Germany was two-fold. The Comintern was to stir up pressure 
	for a hard peace and unconditional surrender. This was to 
	turn the German people against the Western Allies. 

	In Russia itself, however, a much softer note was taken. A 
	distinction was made between the Nazis and the German 
	people. A committee of German prisoners including leading 
	generals was formed in Moscow. When the Russians occupied 
	Germany, after some excesses by undisciplined troops, a policy 
	of conciliation was put into effect. Factories in the East hummed 
	with activity, producing arms for Russia, while Americans and 
	British concentrated upon de-Nazification ! 


communists secretly nazis all along


	...Thus far, in the book, periodical, and general press fields, 
	Communists have had considerable temporary success, 
	although much of it was due to special war conditions. War- 
	time restraints and government accreditation of correspond- 
	ents, plus the Washington-inspired notion that any criticism 
	of Communism or the Soviet Union was virtual treason during 
	the War, effectively restricted the American press. Direct 
	pressure was infrequent. Usually the subtle suggestion that 
	anything offensive to Russia would ultimately cost American 
	lives was sufficient. These conditions have changed, as is wit- 
	nessed by the frank revelations about Russia since March, 
	1946. Communists in the government are still attempting to use 
	the press through giving out in advance exclusive news favor- 
	able to their cause. The idea is to create a friendly press through 
	this method of favoritism and to give their programs the 
	impetus of an early start. A friendly correspondent gets more 
	beats and is thus more useful to his newspaper or wire service. 


is this true? Bezmenov says something similar

sometimes seems like soviets working for the press rather than other way around...



		
	...The only conclusion obtainable from the facts is that the 
	American Communist Party is an important and growing 
	influence in our national life. It is using this influence exclu- 
	sively in the interests of the Soviet Union. It opposes both 
	political democracy and free enterprise, and operates with 
	surprising effectiveness against both. Unfortunately, this 
	influence has been seriously underestimated, often because of 
	inept and uninformed attacks on Communism. 


	...TO MEET the menace of Communism, the first need is to 
	get the facts before the American public. In so far as the 
	system is an attack upon free enterprise, the American business- 
	man has a duty to show both in theory and in practice the 
	superior merits of our present way of life.* But this is not 
	enough. It attacks only one segment of a major problem. 
	Communism thrives on secrecy and deceit. If its machinations 
	were exposed to the public, if its front groups had the mask 
	torn from them, its influence domestically would rapidly shrink. 
	The same weapon of fearless truth should be used against the 
	inhumanity within the Soviet Union. It should be shown as 
	the ruthless dictatorship it is, rather than as a "peace-loving 
	democracy." 

	The great need today is fact-gathering of unquestioned 
	integrity and competence. Such research must content itself 
	solely and rigorously with exposing the truth about Com- 
	munism. It should not favor any special interest, no matter 
	how legitimate and useful. Many important groups in America 
	today are opposed to Communism. Church, veterans, busi- 
	ness, anti-Communist labor, fraternal, and foreign-language 
	associations all attack this evil. Their individual efforts have 
	been largely ineffective, partly because of lack of adequate 
	information and want of concerted action. 


concluded that exposing methods of deceipt and machinations to public would srhink influence

great need of fact-gathering of "unqestioned integrity and competence"

seems right, except maybe these people didn't realize the press would ignore anyone like that and promote wackos like HUAC and soviet spies

having the answers doesn't matter if nobody will be able to see them, and press was apparently never interested in that


I wonder if this was thought of by them ahead of time? A lot of people saw the new communicst threat after WWII as a new "fifth column" and were alarmed by this growing threat, and angry at treachery by the Soviet union. So they cracked down on the Communists which ended up helping them, at least in the way some did it. As it turns out the 5th column was already there.


------


https://archive.org/details/CommunistInfiltratFBI19411946


comunist infiltration of FBI


------


https://www.nytimes.com/1999/11/28/magazine/cold-war-without-end.html

on disputes over who was a Soviet agent

author is sketchy (and brother of guy who made "The Americans" show)


------


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Martin_James_Monti

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Robert_Henry_Best

should look these guys (convicted of treason for going to Nazis) and who if anyone helped them

both went on to do propaganda for them



http://gawker.com/the-journalists-guide-to-not-getting-charged-with-espio-513323611
	But even with the War On Leaks in full swing, one veteran national security reporter I spoke to told me he doesn't worry about possible legal fallout while reporting on classified stories, and with good reason: No journalist has ever been charged under the Espionage Act



any court cases of journalists getting nabbed for treason or espionage?



------


https://books.google.com/books?id=qCAVQ_cdomcC&pg=PA177&lpg=PA177
	Of the four journalists listed, "Ide"/Samuel Krafsur and "Grin"/John Spivak were unambiguously recruited KGB agents. However, "Bumblebee"/Walter Lippman was not a KGB agent. Instead, he knew Pravdin only as a Soviet journalist with whom he traded insights and information. As for Stone, given Pravdin's effort to recruit him in 1944, he could not have been under the illusion that the Soviet was a normal journalist. Still, with LIppmann's inclusion in the list, this message is ambiguous in regard to Ston'e relationship to the KGB at the time and does not have enough detail to warrant a firm conclusion.



https://www.cia.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/csi-publications/books-and-monographs/venona-soviet-espionage-and-the-american-response-1939-1957/b36.gif/image.gif

Lippman telling Soviet agent Pravadin about operation overlord a month before it started


what has been relationship between Western elite and Soviet intelligence?


Philby, Macalean apparently fully recruited


Stone, Lippman, Bohr, Fermi, said to be "helpful" but not fully recruited

so far seems believable that Sudoplatov honestly didn't think Bohr, Fermi, others were agents.

If Pravdin tried to recruit Stone, possible he didn't see Stone as working for them or vice versa

Bezmenov said Western journalists would know they were agents but fall for their tricks: 


https://archive.org/details/BezmenovWorldThoughtPolice1986
	After initiation into the secrets of the APN kitchen, I was given 
extensive training in P.R. activity with numerous delegations of 
foreign guests of Novosti visiting the USSR. A typical "package 
tour" would include not only regular visits to "average" collective 
farms and kindergartens, talking to smiling milkmaids and to nicely- 
dressed Eskimos who spoke fluent English and played the grand 
piano in the woods in Siberia. More importantly, every foreign guest 
must be made a part of the process of deception. And that takes a 
person like myself: easy-going, friendly, knowledgeable about the 
country of my guest, with a small weakness for foreign liquors, slight- 
ly cynical about the thugs in the Politbureau, able to crack an 
anti-Soviet joke at an appropriate moment, but above all, able to 
arrange meetings with newsmakers, people who are usually un- 
available to an average journalist. 


	...It all depends on a foreign counterpart's motivation, on his (or her) 
personal interests, moral standards, and integrity (or lack thereof), 
whether they will go along with the APN contact and pretend it is just 
"business as usual," or resist manipulation or even reject the 
"arrangement." In my own practice and throughout my 12-year 
career with the Novosti, I have seldom met foreigners who would 
refuse to cooperate categorically. Most of my guests or foreign con- 
tacts would prefer to go ahead, hoping that they were smart enough 
to see through the trickery and at the right moment stop short of 
becoming a collaborator with APN-KGB. Most of them did not 
stop.



...


from "Spies" Hayes book:

	On 13 September 1944, the KGB New York station sent a message to Moscow that Vladimir Pravdin, a KGB officer working under cover of a TASS correspondent, had been futilely trying to contact "Pancake" in Washington, but he had been refusing to meet, citing his busy schedule. Samuel Krafsur, "Ide," an American KGB agent who worked for TASS in the same building as Stone's office, had tried to "sound him out but Pancake did not react." A 23 October 1944 message then reported that Pravdin had succeeded in meeting with Stone:
	P. ["Pancake"/Stone] said that he had noticed our attempts to contact him, particularly the attempts of Ide [Krafsur] and of people of the Trust [USSR Embassy], but he had reacted negatively fearing the consequences. At the same time he implied that the attempts at rapprochement had been made with insufficient caution and by people who were insufficiently responsible. To Sergey's [Pravdin's] reply that naturally we did not want to subject him to unpleasant complications, Pancake gave him to understand that he was not refusing his aid but one should consider that he had three children and did not want to attract the attention of the Hut [FBI]. To Sergey's question how he considered it advisable to maintain liaison P. replied that he would be glad to meet but he rarely visited Tyre [New York].
	While Stone earned a good living, the message added, "he would not be averse to having a supplementary income."


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Vladimir_Pravdin
	In Washington, Pravdin, posing as a TASS reporter, made the acquaintance of such people as the famous correspondent Walter Lippmann and others. On one occasion, he met with a person with three children to offer money for certain unspecified information and who was code-named by the KGB as BLIN ("bliny" is Russian for "pancake"). In the plain language of the cable decrypt, BLIN was willing to provide information but declined to cooperate with the NKVD because the approach had been clumsy, but left open the possibility of future cooperation.[1]


maybe Pravdin did know something up with Stone?

wonder if Pravdin not such a bad guy after all...

a pressing problem for these "nobles" is that once exposed, everyone hates them, including their own agents


from Spies book:


	...The first report of Stone's possible ties to the KGB came in 1992, when Oleg Kalugin, a retired KGB general, told a British journalist: "We had an agent-a well-known American journalist-with a good reputation, who severed his ties with us after 1956. I myself convinced him to resume them. But in 1968, after the invasion of Czechoslovakia ... he said he would never again take any money from us." Herbert Romerstein, a former staff member of the House Committee on Un-American Activities, quoted an unidentified KGB source as saying that the journalist in question was Stone. The British journalist then reinterviewed Kalugin, who admitted that he had been referring to Stone but denied that Stone was a controlled agent. In his later (1994) autobiography, Kalugin characterized Stone as a fellow traveler "who had made no secret of his admiration for the Soviet system" before the mid-1950s. He wrote that when he was asked to reestablish contact with Stone, KGB headquarters in Moscow "never said that he had been an agent of our intelligence service, but rather that he was a man with whom we had regular contact."4
	Kalugin's careful parsing of Stone's exact relationship to the KGB and hints of an earlier relationship made the discovery of Stone-related materials in the KGB cables deciphered by the Venona project in the mid199os the occasion for another uproar. 


Kalugin was coy about Soviet relationship with Stone and I guess implied the relationship stopped in 1956 then 1968. What was going on there?



------

journalists with relationship with KGB:


from Hayes "Spies:"

	...KGB archival documents tell a different story. The first mention of Stone comes in a KGB New York station report of 13 April 1936 noting "`Pancake' (`Liberal's' lead)-Isidor Feinstein, a commentator for the New York Post." "Liberal" was Frank Palmer, part of the same New York community of pro-Communist radical journalists as Stone. He had also been an agent of the KGB New York station for several years, and this note indicated that Palmer had suggested to his bosses that they look at Isidor Feinstein (as Stone was then known). The New York station further reported in May 1936: "Relations with "Pancake" [Stone] have entered `the channel of normal operational work.' He went to Washington on assignment for his newspaper. Connections in the State Dep. and Congress." By stating that its relationship with Stone had entered "`the channel of normal operational work,"' the KGB New York station was reporting that Stone was a fully active agent. Over the next several years, documents recorded in Vassiliev's notebooks make clear, Stone worked closely with the KGB.'


Stone "worked closely," Palmer agent

mentions "New York community of pr-Communist radical journalists including Stone and Palmer"


	...Commenting on Stone's work as a KGB talent spotter and recruiter, the KGB New York station reported: ""Pancake" established contact with Dodd. We wanted to recruit him and put him to work on the State Dep. line. "Pancake" should tell Dodd that he has the means to connect him with an anti-Fascist organization in Berlin." William A. Dodd, Jr., was the son of the U.S. ambassador to Germany and an aspiring Popular Front activist with political ambitions. The KGB did recruit him, and Stone briefly functioned as his intermediary with the KGB, providing him with a contact in Berlin when he went to join his father at the embassy. Stone also passed on to the KGB Dodd's information, picked up from the American military attache, about possible German military moves against the USSR and the name of a suspected pro-Nazi embassy employee.


Stone helped recruit William E. Dodd, Jr. (wasn't a journalist but had some influnece on public opinion at various points)


	...The mere fact that Ernest Hemingway toyed with Soviet intelligence is one of the more surprising revelations in the KGB files. Although the future Nobel Prize winner never provided any significant information to the KGB, he was in contact with several of its agents for a few years and remained an object of interest into the 1950s.
	While principally a novelist, Hemingway also wrote as a journalist, providing topical essays and reports on contemporary events that appeared in newspapers and magazines. After the Spanish Civil War broke out, lie traveled to Madrid with press credentials from the North American Newspaper Alliance to cover the conflict. Once there, he grew close to the Communist movement and cooperated with party front organizations in the aftermath of the war. Although the CPUSA was unhappy with his portrayal of International Brigades' chief Andre Marty in the novel For Whom the Bell Tolls, Hemingway's fame and willingness to cooperate on selected issues ensured that lie remained close to the CPUSA.
	Early in 1941 Hemingway and his new wife, Martha Gellhorn, were preparing to leave for a trip to China. Gellhorn had secured an assignment from Colliers magazine, and Hemingway reluctantly agreed to ac company her. The left-wing newspaper PM contracted to run his stories. More significant, Hemingway spoke to Harry White, chief of the Treas- my Department's Monetary Division, who asked him to report secretly to him on relations between the Chinese Communists and the Kuomintang, the Chinese transportation system, and the condition of the Burma Road. Hemingway agreed. 


Hemmingway in contact with Soviet spies, "object of interest," worked as journalist, did some mission in Chinese civil war

says interviewed Chiang Kai-Sheck, met secretly with Chou Enlai, wrote reports for White, was in contact with Soviet intel before the trip (Jacob Golos)


KGB reports said to study him, look to cultivate him and give him opportunities to travel abroad

Golos gave him some stamps which they said were a "material password" for resuming ties with Hemmingway


...


Ludwig Lore journalists, Communist since at least 1917, involved in internal conflicts regarding Trotsky or "Loreism", worked for socialist paper, freelance journalist in 1931 and editorial staff of New York Post in 1934, focused on foreign affairs


	...While it might appear counterintuitive, the KGB and GRU in the late 192os and early 193os recruited a number of persons expelled by the CPUSA. Those expelled often considered themselves good Communists and saw working for Soviet intelligence as a path back into the Communist movement. Lore was one of these and worked for the KGB's illegal station in the mid-1930s under the code names "Leo" and 10. 
	In a report written early in January 1935, "Leo"/Lore was described as a talent spotter, recruiter, and agent handler who was responsible for four sources. He had recruited "Gregor," who was supplying economic information early in 1934. He also recruited and handled "Willy," a key source in the State Department. "Willy" (David Salmon) headed the State Department's Communications and Records Division and provided copies of reports sent by American diplomatic personnel overseas (see chapter 4). During 1934 Lore recruited another State Department source, "Daniel," who provided "very valuable" copies of stenographic records of the conversations of high-ranking officials with foreign ambassadors. Additionally, Lore recruited "Albert," described as employed by an unidentified police agency in New York. 

	...The KGB New York station also assigned Lore liaison duties with Thomas Schwartz, a former German consul living in New York who had become a KGB source. 


Soviet intel recruited many persons expelled by CPUSA, Lore one of them.

recruited in State Department and NY police

Moscow later reported speculation that two of Lore's recruits were made up

Laurence Duggan another state dep recruit

Soviet spy Hede Massing and Paul Massing investigated Lore

soviet cables spoke of problems with Lore


	...Lore never gave Chambers any contacts. GRU was not the only agency that approached Lore. Later the FBI did so as well, and he gave it a partial account of his knowledge of Soviet networks in the United States but avoided recounting his own work as a Soviet spy or the sources he recruited, such as David Salmon, in the State Department. One Soviet agent he did identify, however, was Whittaker Chambers, and it was Lore's information that led the FBI to its first interview with Chambers in 1941. Lore died in 1942.


Lore led FBI to Chambers


...


	...Unlike Lore, Robert S. Allen had no history of involvement with Communist causes. Born in Kentucky in 1goo, he served in the army during World War I by lying about his age. He graduated from the University of Wisconsin, joined the Ku Klux Klan to write an expose, and at the time of Hitler's abortive coup was studying in Munich, where his reporting enabled him to become a foreign correspondent and then Washington bureau chief for the Christian Science Monitor. A hard-nosed reporter with a large dose of skepticism about American intervention in Latin America and angered by his paper's refusal to publish damaging inside stories about Washington, Allen recruited Drew Pearson, a neophyte reporter for the Baltimore Sun, and they anonymously wrote Washington MerryGo-Round, published in 1931, a sensational and nasty expose of the Hoover administration. It sold over 18o,ooo copies. After the authors were identified, both were fired from their jobs. They quickly produced a sequel in the fall of 1932, More Merry-Go-Round, and capitalized on their fame by starting a syndicated newspaper column the following year. Although Pearson was smooth and conciliatory and Allen abrasive and bullying, their styles meshed, and the column, carried by Scripps Howard, became a powerful force in American journalism. Both men were ardently pro-Roosevelt and sympathetic to liberals in the administration like Harold Ickes and Sumner Welles, who frequently fed them inside gossip and leaks. Unbeknownst to his partner, for a time Allen was also providing information to Soviet intelligence.


Robert S. Allan involved with KKK, wrote expose on them, reported (on what?) from Munich around time of abortive Hitler coup, became foreign correspondent for Christian Science monitor.

recruited reporter Drew Person of Baltimore Sun

trashed Hoover admin in popular expose

got fame, started syndicated newspaper column with Pearson, carried by Scripps Howard. Column was influential

got information from Harold Ickes and Sumner Welles in Roosevelt admin

KGB wrote of his potential as a recruit, mentioned by name in Jan 1933

provided information on U.S. politics from his contacts to KGB, took a KGB stipend


...


	...John Spivak and Frank Palmer
	Two other journalists assisting the KGB in the early 1930s were John Spivak and Frank Palmer. Neither man ever openly admitted his Communist affiliation, much less his work for Soviet intelligence, but both were KGB agents who provided valuable material about potential enemies and suggested possible recruits to the KGB.


Hayes writes of John Spivak and Frank Palmer as unambiguously recruited KGB agents

Spivak started journalism career as a police reporter

working for socialist paper by end of WWI

Spivak engaged in active measures that freed Amtorg company of suspicion of ties with Soviet intelligence


	...Many of his sources, including Treasury Secretary Henry Morgenthau's niece, Josephine Pomerance, worked with him "`without knowledge of his connection to us."' (In other words, Pomerance thought she was only assisting an anti-Nazi journalist and was unaware of his link to Soviet intelligence.) The KGB also noted that Spivak "receives materials from Prince" (the ADL and McCormack-Dickstein Committee consultant), who told him "that he is the only journalist to whom he is willing to give the numerous materials he has about the Nazis." Another Spivak source, cover-named "Zero," worked for the U.S. Committee on Investigation of the Munitions Industry (the Nye Committee) and gave him numerous documents on chemical arms, munitions production, and technical data on specific weapons: she "`doesn't even know that she works for us."' She was valuable enough, however, that the KGB decided to end the indirect relationship and "`in the next few days we will be taking `Zero' from `Grin' and including her in our network.' "


niece of Treasury Secretary Josephine Pomerance was Spivak source, said to be unwitting by Hayes

Dickstein committee consultant Prince passed Spivak materials

Nye committe (investigating munitions inddustry) source "zero" gave Spivak data on munitions

Spivak travelled to Nazi Germany and worked closely with Martha Dodd


	...Spivak continued to undertake covert tasks for the Communist Party in the early 1950s. In April 1953 he and another secret party operative, Leon Josephson, burglarized the law office of O. John Rogge, David Greenglass's attorney, stealing documents later published in the Communist press to discredit Greenglass.


...


Frank L Palmer editor of Colorado Union Advocate in 1922. 

Cheif editor of radical "People's Press" in 1930s

Worked as managing editor of Federated Press

Moscow wanted him to get close to Congressman Mauy Maverick and newspaper magnate Randolph Hearst

	
	..."Liberal" [Palmer] gave information about Louis Francis Budenz, who used to be the editor of the magazine "Labor Age" (where "Liberal's" wife worked). ..."Liberal's" conclusion: There are 3 or 4 people with information that is of interest to us, all of whom are on close terms with Cannon and familiar with current events in Europe. Everyone else-out of the loop, they know whatever is known to the general public. "Bearing in mind `Liberal's' potential, we are conducting work with him on identifying the persons surrounding Muste .... Cannon, and other Trotskyite `leaders' here, who, while not in leadership positions, are nevertheless up to date on Trotskyite organizational activities.


said to have "spotted" Louis Budenz for KGB 


	...One was Grigory Rabinovich, a doctor and KGB officer sent to the United States in the 1930s under Russian Red Cross cover to supervise penetration of the American Trotskyist movement. The other four were Americans who had worked for the KGB. One was Palmer, and the memo noted that he had assisted in recruiting Budenz. The others were Zalmond Franklin, a veteran KGB courier, and two people, Robert Menaker and Sylvia Caldwell, deeply involved in the KGB's anti-Trotsky operations (see chapter 8).

	...There were signs that the KGB had become dissatisfied with Palmer's work in 1935. One memo complained that he and John Spivak were "crossing paths and could expose one another." The memo described Palmer as a "failed agent, since people approach him on their own initiative." ("Failed" in this case meant his links to Soviet intelligence were known to too many people.) 


...


	...George Seldes and Bruce Minton

	1. F Stones Weekly was modeled on an earlier iconoclastic periodical of independent left journalism that started publishing in the 1930s: In Fact, the brainchild of George Seldes, a radical journalist for more than eighty years. Like Stone, Seldes and his In Fact co-founder, Bruce Minton, had unacknowledged links to the CPUSA and Soviet intelligence. Born in New Jersey to immigrant Russian parents in 1890, Seldes worked as a war correspondent beginning in 1917 and covered the Soviet Union in the early 1920s. But Soviet authorities expelled him and several other reporters when they discovered they were evading censorship regulations. Moving to Italy, Seldes filed press reports that implicated the Mussolini regime in political assassination, and Fascist officials booted him out of Italy as well. The left-wing slant of his work as a correspondent for the Chicago Tribune increasingly angered its publishers, and he resigned in 1928 to write You Can't Print That, a harshly critical study of press bias and censorship.


George Seldes column said to be model for I.F. Stone's

co-founded with Bruce Minton

Seldes worked as war correspondent journalist in 1917

correspondent for Chicago Tribune until 1928

covered Spanish Civil War for New York Post

Louis Budenz charged Seldes with being communist agent, Seldes lied to Congress and said he wasn't


	...Seldes lied. He had been a member of the CPUSA. In the spring of 1940, the KGB New York station informed Moscow:
	"In order to activate our station's political work, particularly in view of the beginning of the presidential reelection campaign (activization of the internal political life of the USA), we have decided to identify, through `Sound' [Gobs], the most qualified, proven American newspaper workers, who have interesting connections and resources for covering the behind-the-scenes activities of political party leaders as well as of individual financial groups, Roosevelt's administration, individual departments, etc. The head master of the local fellowcountrymen [Communist Party] recommended the two aforementioned individuals through Sound: Robert Miller and George Seldes. The former has only just applied for membership in the organization (meaning a secret enrollment), while the latter is a longtime fellowcountryman [Communist], who is listed on a special register.... They both run independent newspaper agencies (financially well-off and independent), which we could put to successful use."


...


	...While there is no further mention of recruiting Seldes, his partner, Bruce Minton, was recruited and actively used. Minton continued to work openly on party projects while editing In Fact, serving as an editor of the CPUSAs literary journal, New Masses. As for his work with Seldes, the KGB New York station informed Moscow that it had been told this was CPUSA work: "On assignment from Browder, he issues the bulletin `In Fact' together with Seldes." Minton was, however, more than just a se cret Communist journalist; he was deeply enmeshed in the Communist Party underground and was one of its links to the KGB.47
	Minton had been born Richard Bransten into a wealthy California family. He married an even wealthier woman, Louise Rosenberg, heiress to a San Francisco produce fortune, and dabbled in the movie industry as a screenwriter. After their divorce, he moved east and assisted in editing New Masses under the name of Bruce Minton. He had joined the CPUSA during the San Francisco dock strikes of 1934, which is when he probably met Nathan Gregory Silvermaster, who served as a courier for Earl Browder during that period. When Silvermaster arrived in Washington in 1935, on Browder's advice he dropped public Communist activity and confined his open political activities to conventional liberal causes. 



Bruce Minton editor of CPUSA's New Masses. Moscow said he wrote in his and Selde's column "In Fact" on assignment from Browder.

Hayes says Minton link between communist underground and KGB

Minton born Richard Bransten to wealthy California family. Married even wealthier Louise Rosenberg

"dabbled" in movie industry as screenwriter

Minton gave the KGB reports on allied military activities

his codename was "Informator"


	...Moscow Center sent the following information to Zarubin:
	""Informator's" [Minton's] and "Pal's" [Silvermaster's] group. This group, besides these two sources, consists of the following: "Jurist" [Harry Dexter White], "Peak" [Frank Coe], "Polo" [Ludwig Ullmann] and "Sachs" [Solomon Adler], and the courier, "Pal's" wife.
	"Informator," as a courier, requires meticulous work in training him to get accustomed to systematizing the materials he processes and teaching him the operational techniques of meetings, obtaining materials, and receiving verbal messages. Continue to use him on the communications line with "Pal" and simultaneously groom him as a future deputy station chief.
	"Pal." Future use of him should be directed toward studying the possibility of recruiting [Lauchlin] Currie and thereby infiltrating Roosevelt's immediate inner circle. Simultaneously with intensifying the cultivation of opportunities for obtaining information directly from his workplace, give him the assignment to get as close as possible to Currie.
	`Jurist" represents the most valuable source from this group. His capabilities, thanks to his proximity to Morgenthau, are very substantial. We should focus our work with him on obtaining important documented and verbal information. In this regard it is essential to train the source to transmit exactly what he has heard and to extract from his interaction from Morgenthau's inner circle information that is of most interest to us. Simultaneously study and cultivate both Morgenthau's connections and his own.
	"Peak," "Polo," and "Sachs" are of value because of their official positions but have not yet made use of their capabilities. While studying them, it is essential to orient the sources toward doing everything they can to strengthen their positions in the department, especially since "Peak" in the past has already been somewhat compromised as a `Red."50
	Early in 1942, Moscow referred to this group as "`Informator's' [Minton's] group" and listed Silvermaster as one of his agents. 


Minton was in charge with passing information and managing important people in U.S. government, but later was resassigned.


	...Along with his wife, the humorist and short-story writer Ruth McKinney, Bruce Minton moved to Hollywood in 1944 to work as a scriptwriter. Both were expelled from the Communist Party in 1946, accused of a left-wing ideological deviation. They moved to Europe during the Hollywood blacklist era. He committed suicide in London in 1955.


went to work as scriptwriter in Hollywood. Hayes says he "committed suicide" in 1955.


...


	...Even as it exploited a host of journalists with Communist ties to provide information, entree, and cover, the KGB was anxious to learn what more mainstream and establishment journalists knew. The most prominent, and one of its major targets, was Walter Lippmann. One of the doyens of American establishment journalism, Lippmann had evolved from a preWorld War I young, socialist-leaning intellectual to a consummate insider and highly respected commentator on the world of Washington and high government policy. His extensive contacts within the government provided him with copious background information, much of it off-the record and too sensitive to publish, knowing that while it would assist him to write his opinion columns, it would not appear directly in his newspaper writings.


Hayes says Lippman was establishment journalist with lots of insider information

Hayse says his information was too sensitive to publish, but would "assist him" to write his opinion columns while not "appearing directly" in them


	...Later in the Cold War he came to urge respect for a Soviet sphere of influence but on the basis of a calculated realism rather than any sentimentality about Soviet goals. There was no chance that the KGB could recruit Walter Lippmann as a source. Nonetheless, anxious to gain access to the information that came to his attention, the KGB set out to develop sources close to him, and in 1941 Golos found one-Lippmann's secretary.


Lippman urged yielding to Soviets from "calculated realism" (in line with Kissinger, other "realists?")


Hayes says there was no chance the KGB could recruit Lippman, but recruited sources close to him like his secretary Mary Price


	...She was also a secret Communist, having joined the party sometime in the 1930s. Golos recruited her for covert work in 1941 and assigned Elizabeth Bentley to serve as her contact and courier. For two years in both New York and Washington Price rifled her boss's files, stole copies of his correspondence, and prepared summaries of his conversations and telephone calls, all of which she turned over to Bentley.


Price served as conduit for infromation from Lippman to Moscow, and some of this went through Bentley


Moscow showed interest in Lippman's relationship with Bill Donovan


	...(We are sending "Dir's" [Price's] reports on Lippmann. We are starting a file on him called "Hub.") "Lately Lippmann has significantly cut back on his newspaper work. He has spent a lot of time on correspondence, phone conversations, and personal discussions with certain political figures, obviously putting his main emphasis on participation in the behind-the-scenes activities of various Amer. circles. In addition, he is studying issues involving the presentation of other propaganda broadcasts on the radio.... He was allocated a special short-wave radio for listening to foreign radio broadcasts. Obviously, one of the areas of his cooperation with Donovan is precisely this type of activity."


provided info on secret talks between British and French, U.S. Far Eastern policy

Price had affair with Duncan Lee, wanted to quit KGB because she watned to get married, and her love life became of interest to KGB


	...The stress of covert work, illness, and her affair with Duncan Lee had taken its toll on Price. The New York station reported that she had symptoms of tuberculosis and that Lippmann was increasingly unhappy with her work. She resigned in April 1943 and left to recuperate in Mexico. Once she returned to the United States, Soviet intelligence fully expected Price to resume her intelligence work. She applied for jobs in the State Department and OSS. The KGB New York station told Moscow: "We think that with the assistance of "Imperialist" [Lippmann], who has shown an interest in setting "Dir" [Price] up at the above institutions, she will succeed in getting a job there. 


Lippmann's codename was Imperialist


	...Meanwhile, Golos continued to use Price as a recruiter. The KGB New York station and Golos had had their eye on Michael Greenberg, a China specialist and assistant to presidential aide Lauchlin Currie, then the deputy administrator and day-to-day head of the Foreign Economic Administration (FEA):
	"'Re "Yank" [Greenberg]. We have reported to you about him several times as valuable contact. As "Page's" [Curries] secretary he can provide interesting information. With this mail we are sending materials Nos. 2414 and 2485, which contain valuable facts about the political situation in China...... Dir" [Price], who has returned from the "Countryside" [Mexico], came to "Yank" on "Sound's" [Golos's] recommendation (they are good acquaintances) and on behalf of the fellowcountrymen [Communist Party] asked him to supply her with information. "Yank" agreed."'
	British-born, Greenberg had become a secret Communist while a student at Cambridge University in the 1930s. He immigrated to the United States in 1939 and became editor of Pacific Affairs, a journal published by the Institute of Pacific Relations. His tenure caused one trustee to complain that Greenberg had imposed a pro-Communist slant on the journal. In 1942 he became a China specialist for the Board of Economic Warfare (BEW; later merged into the Foreign Economic Administration). Elizabeth Bentley identified him as a source; she said she never met directly with Greenberg but received his information via Mary and Mildred Price. (Greenberg became a naturalized American citizen during this period, so his cover name, "Yank," represents a bit of KGB humor.) At the end of World War II, Greenberg succeeded in transferring to a position in the Department of State, but resigned abruptly in 1946, an act likely triggered by Bentley's defection. Questioned by the FBI in 1947, he admitted knowing the Price sisters but denied ever turning over any information. Shortly afterwards, he returned permanently to England.


Price got close to Micheal Greenberg on orders from Moscow

Micheal Greenberg was a Chinca specialist and assistant to presidetnial aide Lauchlin Currie

born in Britain, became secret Communist while student at Cabridge University in 1930s

became editor of "Pacific Affairs" in 1939 in U.S.

became China specialist for U.S. board of economic warfare in 1942

left dep of state after Bentley's defection, quizzed by FBI and shortly later returned to England


	...Having lost its covert entree to Walter Lippmann in 1943, the KGB took steps to recover some part of it. It used Vladimir Pravdin, whose cover job as a TASS correspondent concealed his role as deputy chief of the KGB New York station in early 1944. Pravdin met with numerous journalists, and the New York station reported, "`Contrary to all expectations, the person with whom `Sergey' [Pravdin] succeeded in achieving the biggest results in the task of establishing a good relationship"' was Lippmann. He attributed this to Lippmann's desire "`to have connections with responsible representatives of our circles in the Country [USA]. He views the acquaintance with "Sergey" [Pravdin] precisely in this light, and naturally he is attempting to use the acquaintance with him to determine our viewpoint on various issues of international politics. He is doing this, of course, very subtly, with the utmost tact. It should be recognized that, by attempting to draw "Sergey" into making candid comments, "Imperialist" [Lippmann] is sharing his own information with him."'


after Price reassigned, Pravdin befriended Lippman. Moscow cables said the flow of information between Pravdin and Lippmann was mutual, and that Lippmann's intent in contacting Pravdin was to get information.

Hayes says Lippman was not aware that Pravdin was an intelligence officer.


...


Bernard Redmont born on NY, MA from Columbia JOurnalism chool in 1939, in USSR at time of Nazi-Soviet pact

was news writer for CIAA after pearl harbour

William Remington introduced him to Elizabeth Bentley

Bentley outed Redmont, but he denied knowledge of her being a Soviet spy

Joined Marines in 1943 and wounded while serving as combat correspondent

Ann Moos Remingington testified to grand jury that she and ex-husband were close friends with Redmont and both were Communists, while Redmont denied Communist affiliation

William Remington testified to congress that Bernard was a Communist, later withdrew and apologized while trying to persuade Redmont to testify for him for his perjury trial.

Redmont agreed and Hayes says this got him into more trouble.


	...Redmont might have escaped trouble, since Bentley had barely mentioned him publicly, except that he agreed to testify on behalf of Remington in his perjury trial. He was immediately fired by his boss, William Lawrence, publisher of U. S. News and World Report. He moved to France, where he worked for a series of newspapers and, ultimately, Westinghouse Broadcasting Group. In 1976 he became Moscow bureau chief for CBS. Five years later, he returned to the United States to teach and then served as dean of the College of Communication at Boston University, resigning in 1986 after a disagreement with BU president John Silber over plans to train exiled Afghan journalists to cover the Soviet occupation.

	Redmont continued to hew to the position that Bentley was a fantasist, linking her to "pathological liars, cranks, seekers of attention or publicity, or paid purveyors of tales and innuendoes." He insisted that he had been a victim of hysteria: "Tens of thousands of us, who in some way had not conformed, who had
	joined the wrong organizations, or had the wrong acquaintances, or had been denounced, anonymously or not, by informers, crackpots or self-styled patriots, were caught in the gears ."ss
	The evidence is, however, that Bernard Redmont, distinguished American journalist and dean of a college of journalism, was the fabricator, not Elizabeth Bentley. An October 1944 KGB report lists his real name and cover name ("Mon") and identifies him as one of Bentley's sources. A January 1945 report again lists him as a Bentley contact with his real name and "Mon" cover name and adds that he had a Communist Party name of "Berny," that he worked in the press department of the CIAA, and that he had become an inactive source. In December 1945 the KGB station in London informed Moscow Center that Kim Philby had turned over a copy of Bentley's 1945 FBI statement given to British SIS. The KGB report listed forty-one KGB sources Bentley had identified to the FBI, adding their KGB cover names (which Bentley had not known). The last one on the list was, "41. Bernard Redmont (Mon)." 


Redmont tried to discredit Bentley, but venona intercepts confirmed her story


...


	...William Dodd, Jr.
	I. F. Stone assisted in recruiting William Dodd, Jr., as a KGB agent in 1936. Initially Dodd provided the KGB with inside information from the U.S. Embassy in Berlin. Once his father's ambassadorship ended, Dodd returned to the United States, worked as a journalist for a time, and then challenged an incumbent member of Congress, Howard W. Smith, for the 1938 Democratic nomination in Virginia's eighth district. Dodd ran as an ardent New Deal supporter and as part of a White House effort to replace conservative Democrats with liberals. Eager to have one of its agents in the House of Representatives, the KGB New York station gave Dodd $1,ooo (nearly $15,000 in zoo8 dollars) for his campaign.


William Dodd Jr was recruited to KGB, provided info on U.S. embassy in Berlin where his father was an ambassador. Worked as a journalist for a time and tried to run for Congress. The KGB funded his campaign.


Hayes cites Gutzeit, iirc cited in "Haunted wood" with regards to Dickstein's work for the KGB. In this one agent imagined a plan for recruiting and installing a vast number of agents to U.S. Congress, but it was decided this would be too expensive.

Most or all of Dickstein's handlers were later killed in Soviet purges.


	...Dodd ran an energetic campaign, and press coverage in liberal-leaning newspapers such as the Washington Post suggested that it was a tight campaign and he had a chance. But in the primary Smith swamped Dodd by a three-to-one margin. Whether it was Gutzeit's sensible skepticism or Dodd's loss, nothing more was heard of Moscow Center plans of becoming a significant player in American electoral politics.68



the KGB reported that Dodd passed on political gossip from Sen Claude Pep and Rep John Coffee, documents from his father as ambassador, and agreed to work as intermediary between KGB and Helen Fuller, a DOJ employee

the KGB supported Dodd in purchasing weekly newspaper Blue Ridge Herald and outliend plans for it, but Dodd did not purchase the paper

around 1941 Dodd was with left-wing journal American Week, when he was reactivated by KGB

Dodd suggested to KGB that he work as Moscow correspondent for Newspaper Alliance or Harper's magazine, but this was dropped


	...In January 1942 Moscow told Vasily Zarubin, newly arrived chief of the legal station, that Dodd's potential had not been realized:
	"For the past two years we have made unsuccessful attempts to use "President" [Dodd] in various areas of work.... Even though "President" has communicated with us for a long time, he remains a rough-edged probationer [agent] and requires a good deal of work both to teach him agent skills and to instill brutal discipline and the rules of covert work in him." (The aim is to turn him into a journalist-commentator. To direct his appearances in the press and on the radio so as to earn him a more solid position and reputation. In order to detach him from "Liza" [Martha Dodd Stern], arrange a trip for Pr. somewhere abroad (except for Home [Moscow]).71


The KGB had hopes for Dodd to be a disciplined agent and a journalist-commentatoron press and radio

called to Dies committee in 1943, where he denied ties to Communism. Hayes said he did not do well. Similar at Lye Committee. Congress decided to attach rider to FCC bill including firing Dodd. 


	...KGB New York station chief Zarubin forwarded the Kerr subcommittee report on Dodd's testimony and told Moscow:
	"As the report makes clear, "President" [Dodd] conducted himself in a foolish and sometimes disgraceful manner during the interrogations, especially when the questions pertained specifically to the fellowcountrymen [CPUSA] and the USSR and its system. "Vardo" [Elizabeth Zarubin], as we have reported to you, spoke with "President" before the investigation and interrogations began and gave him specific instructions on how to conduct himself so as, on the one hand, not to become confused and not get stuck, and on the other, to emerge with dignity from this affair and not denigrate the "fellowcountrymen" and the USSR. "President" evidently got terribly scared and hoped to keep his job if he would slander the fellowcountrymen and the USSR.
	A great deal has been written in the press on "President's" case and a big ruckus has been raised. Because of this, and also because P. did almost nothing for us, we have not been meeting with him in the past few months. He was very frightened by the investigation and avoided meetings himself.... Based on the foregoing, President for the moment should be considered deactivated. The question of his future use can be settled once and for all after his situation is clarified."


Zarubin told Moscow Dodd did poorly, did not "emerge with dignity"


	...Dodd and the others named in the 1943 appropriations rider were, in effect, fired by Congress. Years later the U.S. Supreme Court held that the rider was a bill of attainder prohibited by the Constitution, and Dodd received back pay but not reinstatement.


the supreme court later struck down the rider and Dodd got back-pay

Dodd had problems with Communist suspicions around him after this and was worried about his employment

he asked his friends for a job as a reporter at TASS, Moscow was not pleased


...


	...Overseas Correspondents
	A 1943 KGB report reviewing earlier activity that needed to be reinforced noted the work of four "journalists recruited and sent to Euro. countries: "Eagle," "Yun," "Paul," "Leopard."" There were no indications of the identity of "Leopard," but two of the other three can be confidently identified and one likely so.

	...Through Paul-descriptions of a large number of Amer. dip. workers in territories in G. and occupied countries." Another 1941 memo, a Moscow Center evaluation of Amer ican intelligence, said that "Paul" had been recruited in 1940 and had supplied "a word-for-word translation of a confidential report by the director of the Washington office of "United Press" on the policies of the Amer. government vis-a-vis the Japanese. z. "Paul"-on FrenchAmerican negotiations on the question of installing American navy and air force bases on the island of Martinique and on French naval forces in the West Indies." The same memo described "Paul" as "(currently in En- gland)-a journalist. Secret member of the CPUSA. Valuable materials and leads. He has major connections. Could be an information agent, talent-spotting agent, and a recruiting agent." Not surprisingly, Moscow Center put "Paul" on its 1941 list of the "most valuable" agents in the United States.76
	"Paul" was probably Peter Rhodes. Rhodes was unambiguously a KGB agent.


agent Paul probably Peter Rhodes, journalist recruited by the KGB


MA from Oxford in mid-1930s

first journalism job Herald Tribuen in Paris 1936

hired by UP same year

covered German occupation of Norway and Soviet annexation of Baltic states.

worked for UP in U.S. until 1941, then for United Chinca Relief, then worked on radio monitoring in England

in London worked at propaganda at occupied Europe for OWI

for UP in 30's wrote about Americans fighting with International Brigades in Spain


...


agent "Yun" was Stephen Laird.

born Laird Lichtenwalner

attended Swarthmore College mid 1930's then became journalist

worked for Time magazine as of 1941, where he and Rhodes were contacts of Golos


	...At this point Moscow Center told its New York station: "`We are becoming convinced that the Time publishing house is a well organized intelligence agency that sells its material to the FBI, the State Department's intelligence service, and military and naval intelligence."' Laird, the magazine's London correspondent, was at this point already a KGB contact with the cover name "Yun."


Moscow cables called time magazine an intelligence agency that sells its material to US intelligence


	...KGB New York station sent Moscow Center a report from "Yun," described as a "probationer" (KGB term for its agents), with brief descriptions of American reporters in Germany, Switzerland, and the United States, and: "`In addition, "Yun" [Laird] gives quotations from comments by highly prominent members of American circles with whom he personally discussed U.S. foreign-policy issues. All of these individuals hold anti-Soviet positions and say that support for the USSR in its war with Germany lays the groundwork for the `spread of Bolshevism throughout the world.""


other Moscow cables reported suspicions regarding Rhodes and Laird's invovlement with Time Magazine


	...A KGB message from August 1944 positively evaluated Laird.
	[He] gives the impression of a politically well-developed person who wishes to help us. However, he considers his potentialities to be limited, for he deals only with technical work on the magazine. He can pass on correspondents' telegrams but we receive them from other sources. Using his connections among journalists and studying the magazine's materials, he could draw up political reports for us but he lacks perseverance for that. Besides, [undeciphered words] breakup with his wife. Yun [Laird] declares that he is used to reporters' work and would like to go abroad again, but the owner of the magazine will not send him because he disapproves of his radical views. The other day the film company RKO took him on as a film producer, which he succeeded in getting thanks to social connections in actor and producer circles. According to Yun's words, Vardo [Elizabeth Zarubin] in her time did not object to such a maneuver and afterwards it may give him an opportunity to make trips to Europe and do work useful to us. In the middle of September Yun is moving to Hollywood. We consider it expedient to continue liaison with him in Hollywood. Telegraph whether a new password should be agreed upon.


KGB cable said Laird politically well developed and could draw up political reports for them, but lacks perseverence for that. Said owner of Time would not send him abroad although he wanted to go.

got job in Hollywood instead, and KGB continue contact with him there

was a pro-Soviet journalist in 1947


Hayes says "Eagle" was probably Winston Burdett, who worked for Brooklyn Eagle


...


Andrew J. Steiger was Soviet source

learned Russian, worked there and had a Russian wife, who wasn't allowed to come to U.S.

wrote for magazines and worked for CBS radio. c-authored "Soviet Asia, Democracy's First Line of Defense" with another former Moscow correspondent in 1942.

Steiger wrote Wallaces' book "Soviet Asia Mission", which whitewashed Soviet crimes, based off Wallace's notes

became Rueters stringer in Moscow in 1949


	...In April 1941 Moscow reminded Gayk Ovaldmyan, KGB New York station chief, of its desire that he contact Steiger using the passwords arranged while he was in the USSR:
	"In our last two letters we wrote you about the necessity of finding out the particulars about agent `Fakir,' Andrew Steiger, but to date we haven't had a reply from you regarding this matter. We learned from the magazine Amerasia for March, which we have received, that `Fakir' is in New York and is contributing to many newspapers and magazines. The March issue ofAmerasia magazine contains his article, `How Strong Is Soviet Siberia?' The article is very good and one can sense that he is well versed in the international situation and the world economy. Find out the particulars about `Fakir' through Amerasia magazine, make contact with him (we enclose the meeting instructions), and activate him, using him for econ. intelligence and the press. Report immediately when you have made contact with him.

	Meeting instructions: The meeting must take place on the 8th or the i5th at iz noon on the corner of West End Avenue and 8,5 Street.... The source will have a Life magazine in the right pocket of his overcoat, and if the weather is good, a hat in his left hand. You will say in English, `Regards from Alice.' He will reply, `Thanks. I would like to visit her.' You will say, `She will be very glad to see you.' After that you can get down to business."

	Ovakimyan, however, was arrested by the FBI shortly after receiving Moscow Center's instructions. It was not until November 1941 that the New York station reported that it had established contact with Steiger and learned that he worked at CBS, compiling summaries of international radio reports for broadcast and distribution to newspapers. 


this bit by Hayes odd

if Moscow didn't learn Stiger was working at CBS and compiling radio reports for newspapers, how did they know he'd meet Ovaldmyan with a magazine in his pocket and hat in his hand?


...


Israel Epstein born to Marxist parents in Warsaw in 1915, moved to China 1917

1949 KGB report lists his codename Minayev, agent since '37 recruited in China


	...Moscow had first alerted the New York station about Epstein in 1943 during a critical review of its progress on developing sources on China. Moscow Center warned that the United States was increasing its engagement with China and the KGB needed to respond, explaining:

	"While the elaboration of issues related to the course of the war in Europe and issues of postwar Europe is one of the leading areas of the office's everyday activities, the office is clearly not giving enough attention to coverage of issues related to the war in the Pacific and U.S. policy toward the countries of the Pacific. Meanwhile, our operatives in Chungking and in Sinkiang note an exceptional increase in the Americans' activities in China and their effort to penetrate into China's northwestern provinces, to the border with the USSR and the MPR [Mongolian People's Republic]. For example, in the winter of this year a group of American competitors toured all of northwestern China up to our border with Sinkiang. The group consisted of. Clabb, second secretary of the U.S. Embassy in Chungking; Lieutenant Roy assistant military attache; Adler, a financial expert, and others. We have information regarding the planned opening in a number of northwestern Chinese cities of American consulates and regarding the intention of the U.S. to finance the development of natural resources in northwestern China.

	The Americans are taking every measure in order to seize the moment and maximize their influence in China: they are providing a great deal of financial assistance to Chinese higher educational institutions, they are creating and subsidizing `young men's Christian associations, etc.' . . . In our cable of 9.11- 1942 we gave you the task of cultivating through "Girl Friend" [Fairfax- Cholmeley] and other probationers of the office the activities of members of American organizations that deal with issues related to China and editorial staffers of magazines: Asia, China Today, Amerasia, Pacific Affairs, and others that publish articles on countries of the Pacific and on issues of U.S. Pacific policy. To date we have no materials from you that would indicate that the station is performing this task.

	In connection with the forthcoming departure of "Girl Friend's" husband, "Minayev" [Epstein], we are giving you the task of intensifying the cultivation of the above-mentioned contingent. A large number of these individuals regularly visit China, and they could be extremely useful to us in cultivating the leading Chinese circles and the activities of foreign missions in China. We are interested in the structure of numerous organizations, institutes, associations, and various societies that manage the study of the Pacific problem, especially the Pacific Institute, whose regular session was held in December 1942 in Canada. To what extent is their work directed by the "Bank" [U.S. State Department] and competitor [American intelligence] organizations?"


Epstein wrote for Allied Labor news in U.S. in 1945

wrote "Unfinished Revolution in China" which celebrated communists in China

left for China in 1951 and became editor of "China Reconstructs," later "China Today"

(apparently no relation to Gady Epstein https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=zh-CN&u=http://cnblogs.timesofisrael.com/%25E6%25B5%25B7%25E5%25A4%2596%25E5%25AA%2592%25E4%25BD%2593%25E9%25A9%25BB%25E5%258D%258E%25E8%25AE%25B0%25E8%2580%2585%25E7%259A%2584%25E7%258A%25B9%25E5%25A4%25AA%25E6%2595%2585%25E4%25BA%258B/&prev=search)


	...He and Elsie, however, left for China in 1951, where he became editor of a PRC Englishlanguage journal, China Reconstructs, later renamed China Today, and served as a correspondent for the National Guardian, edited by another former KGB agent, Cedric Belfrage. Fanatically devoted to Chinese communism, he was part of a team charged with translating Mao's works into English beginning in 1960. Other members included such one-time KGB sources as Frank Coe and Solomon Adler. When Anna Louise Strong, another ex-KGB agent, settled in the PRC, Epstein became close to her as well. Despite his long service to the Chinese Communist movement, he and his wife were arrested during the Cultural Revolution in 1967 and served five years in prison before being released with an apology.



...


	...Other Journalists Who Cooperated with the KGB
	
	The myriad of ways that journalists assisted the KGB-as sources of inside information, talent spotters, purveyors of disinformation and propaganda, couriers-is testimony to how valuable they were perceived as being. Those profiled above do not exhaust the list of journalists who cooperated with Soviet intelligence. Samuel Krafsur ("Ide"), CPUSA member and veteran of the International Brigades, an asset of the KGB New York station, worked as a journalist for TASS. The KGB used Krafsur to cultivate American journalists with particular attention to recruiting some as KGB sources.ss Cedric Belfrage ("Charlie"), an Englishman who later edited the National Guardian, wrote angry books denouncing what he depicted as a paranoid America's anti-Communist "inquisition," which looked for non-existent spies. A concealed Communist, he worked for British Security Coordination, a branch of British intelligence, in the United States during World War II. He reported both British and American information to the New York office of the KGB.89 Richard Lauterbach ("Pa"), a Time magazine Moscow correspondent, carried out discussions with Jack Soble (an illegal KGB officer) that led the New York station to ask Moscow Center for sanction for his formal recruitment, but it is unclear if this relationship was consummated.90 Johannes Steele ("Dicky"), radio commentator and columnist, assisted the KGB with contacts with refugees and exiles.01 Ricardo Setaro ("Express Messenger" and "Jean"), deputy chief of the Latin American department at CBS Radio, worked as a courier and communications link for KGB South American operations.92 Helen Scott ("Fir") was a journalist and KGB source who worked as a secretary to a French journalist, Genevieve Tabouis, and later for the Coordinator of Inter-American Affairs and the U.S. Chief of Counsel for Prosecution of Axis War Criminals.93 Peter MacLean ("101st") was a reporter and photojournalist who did unspecified work for Soviet intelligence, likely for GRU, in the mid-193os.94 David Carpenter ("103rd"), one-time reporter for the Baltimore Sun and later for the Daily Worker; was part of Whittaker Chambers's GRU-linked 193os espionage apparatus.95 "Bough" was an unidentified journalist who provided information on senior American journalists in 1944-45.96

	By the early 195os nearly all of the KGB's sources, including the journalists, had dried up. A number had been exposed by defectors or tracked down by the FBI. Others had quietly dropped away or lost contact with Soviet intelligence. 



------


https://www.cia.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/csi-publications/csi-studies/studies/vol47no2_2003/article08.html
	Red Spy Queen: A Biography of Elizabeth Bentley

	... The outlines of Bentleys story have long been clear.  She flirted with Italian fascism after graduating from Vassar and then, during the Depression, drifted into the Communist Party and espionage.  For years she met with spies in New York and Washington, occasionally stuffing her knitting bag with rolls of microfilm.  The NKVD dubbed her UmnitsaSmart Girland eventually tried to take over her network.  Frightened and angered by her Soviet bosses, in 1945 she went to the FBI (the Bureau dubbed her Gregory).  Eventually she testified before Congressmen and juries, attaining a celebrity status second only to Whittaker Chambers in the tribe of ex-communist witnesses. 

	Bentleys testimony and her 1951 memoir Out of Bondage provoked praise and revulsion across the political spectrum.  Critics called her a neurotic liarand worse.  Defenders questioned the patriotism of her accusers.  There matters stood even before her 1963 death from cancer, and there matters remained for decades.


Bentley went from Italian facism to Communism and espionage for Soviets. Went to FBI in 1945, testimony and memoir public by 1951. Was controversial in press.

her charges were substantially correct and verfied by Venona intercepts released in 1995



	...The espionage campaign in which Bentley participated has to rank as one of the most formidable conspiracies ever launched on American soil.  Soviet military and Party intelligence organs, with copious support from the Communist Party of the United States, penetrated many corners of Americas government, military, and industrial establishments both before and during World War II.  The take was enormous, ranging from gossip about New Dealers and military data to the details of the super-secret Manhattan Project to build an atomic bomb.

	The sheer size and aggressiveness of this effort proved to be its greatest weakness.  Couriers and case officers, like Bentley, and their supervisors (like her lover Jacob Raisinaka Joseph Golos) had so much work that they inevitably learned far more about their agents and the entire network than was wise for proper security.  When the NKGB in 1943-1944 tried to split the networks into smaller, more professionally run cells, some of the agents and their American case officers balked. 

	One of them, Elizabeth Bentley, was so disillusioned and angry that she took her story to the FBI in the fall of 1945, doing so in a way that both protected her from Soviet reprisals and ensured that the Bureau would welcome her as a valued defector instead of arresting her for espionage.  FBI agents used her information to mount a massive 18-month effort against the Soviet and American contacts she named.  That project bored an amazing number of dry holes, however, finding innumerable hints that something had gone on, but discovering virtually no evidence that the alleged spies were actually doing anything.

	Thanks to Allen Weinstein and Aleksander Vassilievs The Haunted Wood, we now know that the NKGBthanks to Kim Philbyhad warned virtually all of its operatives to lie low.  When the leads that Bentley provided petered out in 1948, Congressional investigators called her to Washington for public testimony that was breathlessly reported by the national media.  (Reporters incongruously called her the blonde spy queenshe was neither blonde nor glamorous, as several reporters quickly noted!) It also led Congressmen to seek testimony from a corroborating witness, Whittaker Chambers, who then implicated Alger Hiss. 


Bentley ended up with knowledge of many KGB agents. The FBI used her information to launch a massive counter-intel effort, but "discovered virtually no evidence" the spies she alleged were doing anything.

Kim Philby is said to have warned all agents named by her to lay low.

When her leads petered out, Congress called her to testify in 1948 for public testimony. This led Congress to ask Whittaker Chambers for testimony.


	The notoriety caused another change of life for Bentley.  Like Chambers, she, too, would be sued for slander by one of the men she called a communist operative, and defending her case would take years and cost her much more than money.  The stress deepened her dependence on alcohol, and her amateurish efforts to market her story led her to embellish the details of her espionage.  As Olmsted explains,

	She had led a most unconventional life, from the rejection of marriage to her choice of careers.  She had successfully planned her defection to avoid assassination by the NKGB and imprisonment by the US government.  She had recently demonstrated that she could outwit top lawyers on the witness stand.  Now, her distorted portrayal of her life was one more example of her practicality and her resilience.  She was shrewd enough to change her life story in a way that suited the times and her own needs. [1]

	When the inconsistencies and exaggerations in her accounts tumbled out, Bentley retreated deeper into booze and paranoia.  She also realized that her imminent crack-up worried her new friends at the FBI, and she learned how to squeeze money out of the Bureau by periodically causing trouble and threatening to cause more unless they helped.  Her choice in boyfriends only complicated mattersone had to be threatened by assistant US attorney Roy Cohn, and another told the press that she had privately called her autobiography a work of fiction.  Olmsted passes a harsh judgment on Bentley:

	She had formidable survival skills, and one of those skills was her ability to lie.  She lied to others and to herself . . . .  At some level, though, she must have doubted her own comforting stories.  She used the alcohol to banish those doubtsand her inescapable guilt. [2]

	Elizabeth Bentley spent her last years as a near-recluse in rented rooms in Connecticut, teaching in a reform school for girls.  She died at age 54 of an abdominal cancer that was probably exacerbated by her drinking, and only a handful of relatives and FBI agents attended her funeral.  Her lonely end was little noticed in the press, and mostly welcomed there.


Bentley was sued for slander by one of the people she accused of being a communist, which cost her money and was said to have caused stress for her. She became dependent on alcohol.

Olmsted (I think?) says she embellished her story to market it. She was put on the spot for inconsistencies and embelllishments in her story.

The FBI was said to be worried about an "imminent crack-up" by her, and she learned how to cause trouble and threaten more unless the FBI helped.

One of her boyfriends told the press she privately called her autobiography a "work of fiction."

Olmsted said Bentley had to lie to survive and was good at it. "At some level, though, she must have doubted her own comforting stories."

She died at 54 of cancer "probably exacerbated by her drinking." Her "lonely end" was "mostly welcomed" by the press. 


	...Indeed she did.  Bentleys clues were key to the early success of VENONA.  For the Bureau, VENONA became a priceless window into Soviet espionage when it corroborated her, than rather than vice versa.  It was also through Bentley that the Bureau finally realized that the Soviets had built an underground apparatus in the United States that was operating almost completely apart from the Soviet diplomats that Bureau agents had been tailing.

	At least one novelist has complained that writing fiction is harder than writing history because fiction has to be plausible.  Elizabeth Bentleys career was far too improbable for fiction, which shows that the truth is often more interesting.


...


http://spartacus-educational.com/USAbentleyE.htm
	In 1926, eighteen-year-old Elizabeth Bentley won a scholarship to Vassar College. According to her biographer, Kathryn S. Olmsted: "The cloak of loneliness she had donned in high school still clung to her at Vassar. She was a tall girl - over five feet nine - with a large build, long neck, and a shy smile. She was growing into the kind of woman that some people would term 'somewhat attractive,' but more critical observers would call plain. At Vassar, Elizabeth seemed uncomfortable among her rich, prestige-conscious classmates." (1) A fellow student described her as a "kind of a sad sack, plain, dull, very teacherlike. She didn't have a single boyfriend, if I recall correctly, a pathetic person really. Everyone that knew her just called her Bentley. She was a sad and lonely girl." (2) 

	Bentley came under the influence of the drama teacher, Hallie Flanagan. In 1927 Flanagan met Konstantin Stanislavsky. On her return to America she established the Vassar Experimental Theatre. In 1930 Flanagan took a group of students to Leningrad and wrote in her journal: "Oh, I was right. Russia is what I thought it was, only infinitely more. It is a country of free men, it is a land of workers. They exist to help others." (3) 


Bentley got an elite and Communist-slanted education, but didn't fit in with all the students there


	While she was living in Florence, Elizabeth became a supporter of Benito Mussolini. Impressed by the dictator's achievements, in 1934 she joined the Gruppo Universitate Fascisti. She also began an affair with Mario Castella, a prominent literary critic more than twenty years her senior. Castella held left-wing views and Elizabeth later claimed that under his influence she changed her views on fascism. (5) 


involved with fascist organization and prominent literary critic while living in Florence


	At one of the early CPUSA meetings Elizabeth Bentley met Juliet Poyntz. Another member of the CPUSA, Whittaker Chambers, commented: "Juliet Poyntz... had been a member of the first unit of the Communist Party which I joined in 1925. A heavy-set, dark, softly feminine woman, she was also a little absurdly imperious and mysterious as Communist bureaucrats often become, sagging self-consciously under the weight of so much secret authority and knowledge." (7)

	Bentley claimed in her autobiography that Poyntz attempted to recruit her as a Soviet spy. Poyntz introduced her to a man named "Smith". He seemed more interested in developing a sexual relationship with Bentley. When she rejected his advances he reported her to Poyntz. Worried that Bentley might inform the FBI about her spy network, Poyntz visited Elizabeth's apartment and denounced her as a "subversive". Poyntz then told her: "Just remember one thing, if ever you meddle in my affairs again, I'll see that you're taken care of. You'll be put six feet under and you won't come back to do any more talking!" (8) 


Soviet spies Poyntz and "Smith" used her

became involved with Golos and was recruited by him


	...Golos health began to deteriorate and so Bentley began to take over some of his duties. This included visiting Washington to pick up documents from Nathan Silvermaster who lived in a flat with his wife and another spy, Ludwig Ullman. Helen Silvermaster was highly suspicious of Bentley and she told Golos that she was convinced that she was an undercover agent for the FBI. Golos told her that she was being ridiculous and that she had no choice but to work with her. The Silvermasters reluctantly accepted Bentley as their new contact." 

	...Victor Perlo divorced his wife in 1943 and they had a bitter dispute over the custody of the daughter. In April 1944 she sent a letter to President Franklin D. Roosevelt naming her husband and several members of his group as Soviet spies. Although she was interviewed by the FBI the people named were not arrested. Kathryn S. Olmsted has argued: "Possibly, the men of the FBI discounted the tale of an unstable, vengeful ex-wife. Or perhaps the tale of Russian espionage did not seem so sinister in 1944, when the brave Soviet allies were battling the Nazis. In any event, Katherine Perlo failed in her quest to destroy her ex-husband, and Elizabeth Bentley survived to spy another day." (28) 


after the death of Golos, Anatoly Gorsky took over.


	...Elizabeth Bentley immediately took a dislike to Gorsky. In her autobiography, Out of Bondage (1988) "as a short, fattish man in his mid-thirties, with blond hair pushed straight back and glasses that failed to mask a pair of shrewd, cold eyes." She added that there was something about him that made "shivers run up and down your spine." (30) She did not trust Gorsky and suspected that if she ever did go to Moscow to receive the Order of the Red Star she would be eliminated.

	Bentley claimed that Gorsky sexually harassed her. According to Bentley he stared at her like "a trader about to decide whether to buy a horse" and said, suggestively, "I like you personally; I think we could work very well together." Bentley was overwhelmed with "nausea." (31) However, Gorsky complained to Moscow that Bentley was making sexual advances towards him: "In a meeting with Gorsky where they exchanged Christmas presents, Bentley informed her Russian colleague that he reminded her of Jacob Golos. It was difficult for a young and lonely woman to live without a man, she told him, noting that she thought more and more often about having a family. A flustered Gorsky, plainly hoping to avoid entanglement, immediately cabled Moscow stating that it was urgent to find a husband for Bentley." (32)

	Kathryn S. Olmsted has argued that it was probably Bentley who was lying about the incident


by most indications, Gorsky sexually harassed Bentley. Olmsted argued Bentley was probably lying about this.


	...On 29th April, 1944, Iskhak Akhmerov, a Soviet agent, sent a report on Bentley that showed concern about comments she had been making: "She is a rather complicated and controversial character.... she knows perfectly well that she is working for us. She, as a rule, carries out my instructions gladly and reports everything about our people to me. However, her behavior changes when I ask her to organize a meeting with (Silvermaster) for me or to connect some of the (American) probationers with our operative. She becomes an absolutely different person and... claims that she is not our operative, that she works for (Browder) ... Sometimes, by her remarks, I can feel that at heart, she doesn't like us (i.e., Russians). She is inclined to distinguish us from compatriots (i.e., American Communists) and bitterly notices only our professional interest in different questions. She says that all of us personally care little about Americans, that the USSR is the only country we love and work for. I tried to explain that she is mistaken." (34)

	Anatoly Gorsky discovered that Elizabeth Bentley was involved with a man, Peter Heller, who they suspected was a FBI agent. Gorsky forced Elizabeth to turn over all of her contacts to him. He informed Moscow "Bentley is a serious and dangerous burden for us here. She should be taken home (to the Soviet Union), but how to do it, frankly speaking, I don't know since she won't go illegally." (35) On 27th November, 1944, Gorsky sent a memo about the possibility of another agent, Joseph Katz, killing Bentley. However, he pointed out that this would be difficult as Bentley was "a very strong, tall and healthy woman" and Katz "was not feeling well lately." (36)


Akhmerov questioned Bentley's loyalty, and worried that she thought the USSR didn't have American communist interests at heart. Gorsky found out Bentley was involved with a man, who he "suspected was a FBI agent." Gorsky suggest Bentley be assassinated.

Bentley considered telling authorities about spying in 1944. She told FBI of Soviet activities in August 1945. Budenz announced he was leaving Communist Party with intent to expose the "Communist menace" in October 1945. Vsevolod Merkulov wrote that Bentley's defection might have been caused by fear of bing unmasked by "the renegade Budenz."

Bentley gave the FBI a 107 page statement on soviet espionage on Nov 7, 1945


	...Another meeting was held on the 7th November 1945. This time she gave the FBI a 107 page statement that named Victor Perlo, Harry Dexter White, Nathan Silvermaster, Abraham George Silverman, Nathan Witt, Marion Bachrach, Julian Wadleigh, William Remington, Harold Glasser, Charles Kramer, Duncan Chaplin Lee, Joseph Katz, William Ludwig Ullmann, Henry Hill Collins, Frank Coe, Abraham Brothman, Mary Price, Cedric Belfrage and Lauchlin Currie as Soviet spies. The following day J. Edgar Hoover, sent a message to Harry S. Truman confirming that an espionage ring was operating in the United States government. (40) Some of these people, including White, Currie, Bachrach, Witt and Wadleigh, were named by Whittaker Chambers in 1939. (41) 


Bentley named many spies


	J. Edgar Hoover attempted to keep Bentley's defection a secret. The plan was for her to "burrow-back" into the Soviet underground in America in order to get evidence against dozens of spies. However, it was Hoover's decision to tell William Stephenson, the head of head of British Security Coordination about Bentley, that resulted in the Soviets becoming aware of her defection. Stephenson told Kim Philby and on 20th November, 1945, he informed NKVD of her betrayal. (45) On 23rd November, Moscow sent a message to all station chiefs to "cease immediately their connection with all persons known to Bentley in our work and to warn the agents about Bentley's betrayal". The cable to Anatoly Gorsky told him to cease meeting with Donald Maclean, Victor Perlo, Charles Kramer and Lauchlin Currie. Another agent, Iskhak Akhmerov, was told not the meet with any sources connected to Bentley. (46) 


Hoover had a plan for Bentley to resume contact with Soviet spies. Hooever decided to tell head of British Security Coordination about Bentley, which information was passed to Kim Philby and the soviets.


	Attempts to establish connection with former Soviet agents ended in failure. Aware that they must know she was working with the FBI she began fearing that she would be murdered. After losing her job with the U.S. Service and Shipping Corporation she was desperately short of money. In August 1946, after what the FBI called "an exceptionally severe night of drinking" she took an overdose of phenobarbital. The FBI wanted her alive because she would be the major source against any future prosecutions. With the help of a FBI lawyer, Thomas J. Donegan, she was successfil in taking legal action against the U.S. Service and Shipping Corporation and she was awarded a year's salary in severance. (47) 


Bentley apparently went along with Hoovers plan, and this lead her to learn the Soviets knew of her defection and she began to fear she would be murdered. She lost her job and started drinking. She was said to have taken an overdose of phenorbarbital which threatened her life. An FBI lawyer helped her sue her old employer and get a year's salary in severance.


	On 15th April, 1947, the FBI descended on the homes and businesses of twelve of the names provided by Bentley. Their properties were searched and they were interrogated by agents over several weeks. However, all of them refused to confess to their crimes. J. Edgar Hoover was eventually advised that the evidence provided by Elizabeth Bentley, Louis Budenz, Whittaker Chambers and Hede Massing was not enough to get convictions. Hoover's main concern now was to protect himself from charges that he had bungled the investigation. (48) 


Bentley's information didn't lead to convictions, and Hoover's main concern became to protect himself from charges that he had bungled the investigation.


	On 30th July 1948, Elizabeth Bentley appeared before the House of Un-American Activities Committee. The senators were relatively retrained in their questioning. They asked Bentley to mention only two names in public: William Remington and Mary Price. Apparently the reason for this was that Remington and Price had both been involved in Henry A. Wallace campaign. Bentley was also reluctant to give evidence against these people and made it clear that she was not sure if Remington knew his information was going to the Soviet Union. She also described spies such as Remington and Price as "misguided idealists". (49) 


Bentley appeared before the HUAC in July 1948. The HUAC was restrained in their questioning and politicized their investigation. They only ask her of two names, whose level of involvement she was unsure about.


	The following day Bentley named several people she believed had been Soviet spies while working for the United States government. This included Victor Perlo, Harry Dexter White, Nathan Silvermaster, Duncan Chaplin Lee, Abraham George Silverman, Nathan Witt, Marion Bachrach, Donald Niven Wheeler, William Ludwig Ullmann, Julian Wadleigh, Harold Glasser, Henry Hill Collins, Frank Coe, Charles Kramer and Lauchlin Currie. One of the members of the HUAC, John Rankin, and well-known racist, pointed out the Jewish origins of these agents. (50) 


The next day Bentley named many high-level Soviet agents. John Rankin of the HUAC, a well-known racist, pointed out the agents were Jewish

Whittaker Chambers testified a few days later and said similar things to Bentley


	...Elizabeth Bentley appeared before the NBC Radio's Meet the Press. One of the reporters asked her if William Remington was a member of the Communist Party of the United States (CPUSA)? She replied: "Certainly... I testified before the committee that William Remington was a communist." To preserve his credibility Remington sued both NBC and Bentley. On 15th December, 1948, Remington's lawyers served her with the libel papers. The libel suit was settled out of court shortly thereafter, with NBC paying Remington $10,000. (53)


Remington sued Bentley and NBC for outing him as a Communist. NBC settled out of court and paid Remingin $10,000


	John Gilland Brunini, the foreman of the new grand jury investigating the charges made by Elizabeth Bentley, insisted that Ann Remington, who had divorced her husband, should appear before them. During interrogation by Bentley's lawyer, Thomas J. Donegan, Ann Remington admitted that William Remington was a member of the CPUSA and that he had provided Bentley with secret government documents. "Ann Remington was the first person from Elizabeth's espionage days who did not portray her as a fantasist and a psychopath." (54) On 18th May, 1950, Elizabeth Bentley testified before the grand jury that Remington was a communist. When he stopped spying we "hated to let him go." The grand jury now decided to indict Remington for committing perjury. (55) 


Anne Remington corroberated Bentley's story and was the first from Bentley's espionage days "who did not portray her as a fantasist and a psycopath."


Bentley wrote her autobiography "Out of Bondage", which was contemporary to Budenz's book "This is My Story". Some people criticized Bentley for making money from her crimes or gloryfying treason and espionage.

Bentley blamed her behavior on Jacob Golos, saying she was under his influence. Omsted says Bentley was trying to defect blame onto Golos and "frequently allowed men to take advantage of her"


	...When Out of Bondage was published later that year it received some hostile reviews. Joseph Alsop commented that "it is very hard to decide whether to treat Out of Bondage as tragic, or as ludicrous, or as terrifying or as pathetic." (62) The New Yorker sarcastically suggested that the book read as if the author "had almost as grievous a tussle with Freshman English at Vassar as she had later with her New England conscience." (63) As a result of these reviews the book sold poorly. (64) 


Bentley's book recieved negative reviews and sold poorly.


Though Bentley and Anne Remington helped William Remington be convicted for perjury, the U.S. Circuit Court of appeals reversed the conviction, saying the Judge had been "too vague and indefinite" on party membership. Remington was to get a second trial.


	...Elizabeth Bentley was drinking heavily during this period and her lover during this period, Harvey Matusow, was worried about the impression she would make in court. He claimed that she was upset at her "frivolous treatment" in the press. "She didn't understand the hostility... She never got to the point where she could handle it." Bentley complained about the way she had been treated by the FBI: "She felt that she'd been used and abused." (66) Bentley told her friend, Ruth Matthews that she "should step out in front of a car and settle everything." (67) 


Bentley's boyfriend Harvey Matusow discouraged her from testifying. Matusow said Bentley was upset about hostility from press.



https://books.google.com/books?id=l2o3gebGs-gC&pg=PA76&lpg=PA76&dq=Elizabeth+Bentley+%22Ruth+Matthews%22&source=bl&ots=H_uozE_ut9&sig=nuBlsK_Z2bRco_FcUNJegbCKtMU&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjMyuGGz4vaAhUFwYMKHTORCxsQ6AEIOzAH#v=onepage&q=Elizabeth%20Bentley%20%22Ruth%20Matthews%22&f=false
	Matusow had become friendly with Elizabeth Bentley, who at the time drank heavily and was financially strapped. On October 3, 1952 (his twenty-sixth birthday), they shared dinner at a Greenwich Village restaurant, and Bentley poured out her troubles to him. She couldn't find work as a language teacher, he recalled her saying; she had spent the money from her book, and the government kept pressuring her to name new names. When Matusow recanted in 1955, this dinner would become the subject of controversy at SISS's hearings and gave rise to an FBI investigation.
	
	***

	On February 13, 1953, Matusow attended a black-tie testimonial dinner for J. B. Matthews at the Waldorf-Astoria. Organized by George Sokolsky, the dinner honored "Doc" Matthews (the nickname had been conferred by Martin Dies) for his past efforts in the cause and also reflected current (and well-founded) reports that he was in line for a senior staff position with Joe McCarthy's investigating subcommittee. With McCartyh as the principal dinner speaker and Sokolsky as master of ceremonies, the dinner was a "must" event for "countersubversives," three hundred of whome turned out.

	The "regulars" were there--Kohlberg, Rabbi Benjamin Schultz of the American Jewish League against Communism (which served the important function of shielding the "countersubversive" community against charges of anti-Semitism), Roy Cohn (whose party included Jean Kerr, the future MR.s Joe McCarthy), Matt Cvetic, Herbert Philbrick, and Elizabeth Bentley. The right-wing writing world was well represented. In addition ro Rand, Eastman, and deToledano, the names of William F. Buckley Jr. and L. Brent Bozell (the soon-to-be authors of McCarthy and His Enemies, a vigorous defense of McCarthy), and Victor Lasky (the coauthor with deToledano of Seeds of Treason, a 1950 book on the Hiss case) appeared on the guest list. Television boradcaster Lawrence Spivak also attenteded.

	Vice President Nixon sent regrets, enclosing a small check to be used toward a gift for Matthews and asking Sokolsky to "extend to Doc my commendation and appreciation for his many years of outstanding service in the anti-Communist field." Sokolsky read Nixon's message to the appreciatvie dinner guests.

	The guests responded enthusiastically to McCarthy's dinner address.


https://archive.org/stream/ElizabethBentley/Elizabeth%20T.%20Bentley%2004_djvu.txt
	BENTLEY DOES NOT RECALL ANY SPECIAL CONVERSATION Iv^ITH MATUSOU EX-  I 

	CEPT THAT DURING LUNCHEON WITH DR. RUTH MATTHEWS AND MATUSOW .  .' '/  

	^ ^ f 

	, OCTOBER THREE FIFTY- TWO, SHE STATES SHE NEVER KEN WNED_ ANYTHING 
	CONCERNING HER RELATIONS., WITH ^BUREAU DURNG THIS MEETING ANp._ANy ' - 
	ALLEGATIONS MATUSOW HAS MADE CONCERNING H ER ARE ABSOLUTELY _FALSE AND 
	|i WITHOUT FOUNDATION, BENTLEY ADVISED SHE NEVER HAD A CONVERSATION  

	1-7 ' with MATUSOW THAT WOULD GIVE RISE FOR HIS ALLEGATIONS THAT SHE HAD , 

	7, 

	Vj TESTIFIED FALSELY. SHE EMPHATICALLY STATED THAT SHE HAD WEAVER TESTI- 

	A / FIED FALSELY AND HAS NEVER FURNISHED ANY FALSE INFORMATION TO THIS 

	^0^ 

	BUREAU TO HER KNOWLEDGE. THE ONLYl REMARK SHE CAN RECALL MAKING IN 

	IpRESENCE OF MATUSOW AND DR. RUTH MATTHEWS IK OCTOBER FIFTY-TWO -WAS _ 

	i ^K /that SHE WAS (yWTE LOOKING FOR A JOB UNQUOTE .' ' SHE DOES NOT 


	ANYINE ELSE TALKING WITH THRE THREE OF THEM DURING THIS LUNCHEON, 


	11 , 


	IBENTLEY KNEW ALBERT E. KAHN AS A COMMUNIST ENGAGED IN ESPIONAGE 


	[ACTIVITIES IN NY FROM JANUARY FORTY-ONE TO ABOUT APRIL FORTY-THREE.



https://archive.org/stream/ElizabethBentley/Elizabeth%20T.%20Bentley%2015_djvu.txt
https://archive.org/stream/ElizabethBentley/Elizabeth%20T.%20Bentley%2015#page/n111/mode/2up

pg 113

	Dr. RUTH E. MATTHEWS was interviewed by SA EDWARD 
	W, BUCKLEY and she advised as follows: 


	She recalled that on December 4 , 1952 she had a 
	lunoheon date with ELIZABETH BENTLEY and HARVEY LATUSOW
	at the Hotel Abbey in Now York City. She related that she 
	met both people at the hotel in the lobby and during the 
	luncheon, BENTLEY was somewhat upset and unhappy since she 
	did not have a job and was unsuccessful in obtaining one at 
	that time. BENTLEY mentioned during the luncheon that 
	every time she went after a worthwhile job, she would be 
	called on to testify and as a result, her prospective employer 
	would lose interest in her and she would subsequently lose 
	out on the position. 

	MATTHEWS advised that BENTLEY did not give any 
	specific names of any prospective employers. Mrs. MATTHEWS 

	stated further that BENTLEY never made any statements nor 
	did she indicate at any time that she was' not going to con- 
	tinue cooperating with the Federal Bureau of Investigation 
	and government officials. She advised that BENTLEY never 
	gave any indication that it was the responsibility of the 
	government to obtain positions for her at this luncheon or ' 
	any other time in Mrs. MATTHEWS presence. On the contrary, 
	Mrs. MATTHEWS stated that BENTLEY praised the accomplishments 
	of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the manner in 
	which they developed the facts. 

	Mrs. MATTHEWS pointed out that BENTLEY did indicate 
	by her upset attitude, and at one tine during the luncheon 
	appeared to cry that the constant appearance of her none in 
	the headlines was beginning to get her down. MATTHEWS said 
	that she attempted to relax BENTLEY by making several jokes. 
	While at the luncheon, according to Mrs. MATTHEWS, BENTLEY 
	did wake mention of the fact that she was a little upset at 
	ROY COHN, former Assistant United States Attorney for the 
	Southern District of New York, and former Counsel to Senator 
	JOSEPH C. MCCARTHY'S Sub-committee, since he had not followed 
	through in rendering full assistance to her in preparing or 
	setting out her 1951 Income Tax Return which apparently had 
	been improperly prepared by some tax accountant. BENTLEY
	stated in the presence of Mrs. MATTHEWS and MATUSOW that 
	COHN was easy to contact and got hold of when he was looking 
	for her to be interviewed relative to testimony, and so forth, 
	but when she wanted to get through to him to ask some personal 
	questions, she met with difficulty. BENTLEY also mentioned at the luncheon that she was appreciative of the work given to he rby ALFRED KOHLBERG and that she was, at that time, doing some research work for him. MATTHEWS stated that BENTLEY did
	imply that she was financially strapped since she made refer- 
	ence to the fact that more than once she was anxious to secure 
	a regular employment in order to meet her financial obli- 
	gations. 

	Mrs. MATTHEWS pointed out that at time of the 
	luncheon, and whenever she was in MRs BENTLEY's company, 
	the latter never implied or indicated that she had given false 
	testimony to the government. 

	According to Mrs. MATTHEWS, LATUSOW, if he desired 
	to tell the truth, could only relate the above conversation 
	held at the luncheon, December 4, 1952. 



https://archive.org/stream/ElizabethBentley/Elizabeth%20T.%20Bentley%2015#page/n113/mode/2up

pg 115

	Interview of Dr. J. B. MATTHEWS
	and wife, RUTH on February 28, 1955


	...They stated an appointment book had been maintained by Mr.s MATTHEWS and reflected a luncheon date was had with HARVEY LATUSOW and ELIZABETH BENTLEY for Thursday, December 4, 1952 at the Hotel Abbey in New York City. RUTH MATHEWS exhibited the appointment book to the interviewing agents wehre the names of BENTLEY and LATUSOW appeared in ink and a notation of six dollars.

	...BETNLEY never made any remark or mention or gave any indication according to Mr.s MATTHEWS, regarding her testimony; hwoever, she did remark to MATTHEWS that she, BENTLEY, thought MATUSOW was "quite a character". Mr.s MATTHEWS advised taht BENTLEY, during their short walk from the hotel, was in an upset condition adn commented in an offhand manner "it just doesn't seem worth the struggle and sometimes, I think I should step out in front of a car and settle everything."

	Again, Mrs. MATTHEWS explained that the upset condition of ELIZABETH BENTLEY was apparently based on the fact that she had no regular type employment to meet her financial obligations.

	Dr. MATTHEWS and his wife advised that BENTLEY and MATUSOW were also invited to a buffet dinner party at thieir appartment in the London Terrace, 410 West 24th Street, New York City, on November 16, 1952

	...DR. MATTHEWS advised that the purpose of this ... diner was to introduce a visiting Belgian journalist by the name of A. G> SAMOY, who was touring the United States for some Belgian and Holland papers.

	...Both the MATTHEWS were of the opinion that as a result of their recollection and because of the type of discussion and the way of seating of the people, BENTLEY and MATUSOW had little or no time to hold a quiet conversation of their own. Both MATTHEWS advised it was their opinion that the people mentioend above would not be in a position to furnish any additional details regarding any quiet conversation of MATUSOW and BENTLEY since they were sure none took place while BENTLEY and MATUSOW were visiting in thier apartment on that date. The MATTHEWS concluded that this was the only supper party at which both MATUSOW and BENTLEY were in attendance, explaining hwoever, that each had vistited their apartment separately on various other occasions.


goes on with FBI interviewing people on Matasow and his relationship with Bentley

last interview makes him sound screwey, saying he was trying to get someone to forge a letter to help him on a game show and had a plan to murder Joseph McCarthy. This was an interview with Dorris Hibbard.



https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Harvey_Matusow

Matasow was a Russian communist, then an FBI informer, then a not very good one, then unemployed, then paid informant for the HUAC, then whistleblower on paid informants for HAUC saying he was paid to lie, then hippie music producer, then clown then morman. Along the way had 12 wives and was boyfriend of Elizabeth Bentley, who told the press she was drunk, depressed, and breaking down. He alleged the Sunday New York Times had 126 Communist infiltrators, although they had only 100 employees. 



http://spartacus-educational.com/USAbentleyE.htm
	Harvey Matusow - False Witness 

	Harvey Matusow appeared before the Internal Security Subcommittee on 21st February, 1955. He claimed the had lied under oath and now wanted to "undo some of the harm" caused by his false testimony. Matusow said he was not alone as Bentley had confessed to him that she did not tell the truth. (76) Later that year he published False Witness. As Ted Morgan, the author of Reds: McCarthyism in Twentieth-Century America (2003), has pointed out: "Publication was synchronized with a campaign for new trials... at a time when 134 Communist leaders had been indicted under the Smith Act, with eighty-three convictions. Thanks to Matusow, the party could claim that all Smith Act trials were rigged." Matusow admitted that he had named over 200 people as being members of the American Communist Party but admitted that "about 15% was based on hearsay". (77)

	Senator Margaret Chase Smith of Maine said: ''At long last, the shining truth about the false accusers, the half-truth artists, the professional fabricators, the prevaricators for pay is beginning to break up through the dark and ugly clouds of doubt they have so evilly blown up.'' However, Attorney General Herbert Brownell accused Matusow as being ''part of a concerted drive to discredit government witnesses.'' (78) 


Matusow wrote a book saying Bentley had told him she lied and trials of Soviet agents were based on lies and hearsay. Senator Margaret Chase Smith praised its "shining truth."

	In the book Matusow claimed he was a FBI agent who had been paid to lie about his former friends and some of these people were in prison because of his testimony, whereas others were blacklisted because of his lies. Matusow also said that Elizabeth Bentley and Louis Budenz were persistent perjurers. (79) John Steinbeck commented in The Saturday Review: "I suspect that government informers, even if they had told the truth, can't survive Matusow's testimony." (80) 


John Steinbeck wrote that government informers wouldn't be able to survive Matusow's testimony


	...In January 1957, a photograph of Elizabeth Bentley appeared next to the review of the movie The FBI Story. The girls at the Cathedral School of St Mary in Long Island now realised the true identity of their middle-aged teacher. Some of them managed to get copies of her book, Out of Bondage. One parent complained that her daughter returned home with the comments: "Did you know Miss Bentley was a mistress.... Did you know someone said they found a man murdered in her apartment when she was a Communist." The girl's mother threatened to withdraw her daughter from the school if Bentley remained in post. (82) That summer Bentley was told that she was dismissed.

	It took her until the autumn of 1959 before she got her next job at Long Lane School in Middletown. It was a penal institution for girls. She told J. Edgar Hoover, "We have no bars, no wardens and we attempt to rehabilitate the young through kindly and understanding discipline". She added that she hoped that she would be able to "build up good citizens", defeat Communism, and "contribute to a better America." (83) 



------


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1948/07/30/86905361.html?pageNumber=5

first mention of Bentley


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1948/07/31/85260702.html?pageNumber=4

short quote of Mary Price calling Bentley's testimony made-up


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1948/08/04/93796967.html?pageNumber=3

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1948/08/04/93796967.pdf

	REMINGTON DENIES ALL 'SPY' CHARGES

	By CLAYTON KNOWLES

	Tells Senate Inquiry He Never Gave Any Secret Data to Miss Elizabeth Bentley
	WASHINGTON, Aug. 3  Introduction of evidence that William W. Remington, Federal government career man, knew of many aspects of the Manhattan Project overshadowed today his flat denial that he ever gave secret information to Miss Elizabeth T. Bentley, confessed Communist spy. 


NY Times gives a charitable telling of Remington's defense against Bentley charges

don't as of yet give Bentley's side of the story


4th mention of Bentley, 2nd in major article:

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1948/08/11/85304425.html?pageNumber=1
	'HIGH' SOVIET AIDE PAID $2,000 TO SPY, INQUIRY HEAD SAYS

	FBI Has $20 Bills Handed to Miss Bentley on Street Here, Thomas Asserts 

	RED STAR AWARD ALLEGED

	Samarins Subpoenaed, Call to Mrs. Kosenkina in Doubt  3 Heard on Charge

	By C. P. TRUSSELL

	WASHINGTON, Aug. 10  The payment of at least $2,000 by a "high" representative of the Soviet Union for services in wartime by Communist espionage rings operating out of Washington was declared by the House Committee on Un-American Activities tonight to have been confirmed officially. 

	Representative J. Parnell Thomas, committee chairman, stated that the $2,000, in $20 bills, was handed to Miss Elizabeth T. Bentley, confessed courier for a spy ring, on a New York street corner late in October of 1945. It was passed to her, he added, by a man she had known only as "Al" in her mission of collecting American military and political secrets and forwarding them to Communist headquarters in New York or to Moscow.

	When Miss Bentley first testified before the Senate (Ferguson) investigating Committee July 30 she spoke of a Russian "contact" who was known as "Al." She said she later had identified "Al" through a photograph as "the first secretary" of the Russian Embassy in Washington.


headlines that Bentley confessed courier for spy ring and was paid $2,000


	Says FBI Has the Money

	Mr. Thomas stated that the passing of the $2,000 occurred after Miss Bentley had quit the Communist party and had taken her story of long and intensive espionage to the Federal Burea of Investigation. He said that she turned over the $2,000 to the FBI, along with the story of the street-corner meeting with "Al," as evidence that she had been in real espionage service with a Communist ring.


payment attempted after she defected. Rep thomas says she gave the money to the FBI.

	
	Other committee members declared that Miss Bentley had also received a Red Star decoration from the Soviet Supreme COuncil for her work, in which she has implicated in recent testimony many persons in New Deal Key positions.


NY Times reporting makes it sound like Bentley still a soviet agent. "FBI has the money," got red star, implicated many persons in New Deal positions

going for saying Soviets against the New Deal?

other publications by them point to politicizing the issue of Soviet espionage, like this one that reprints a speach by Wallace: https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1948/07/22/96429391.pdf


goes on to cover Mr. and Mr.s Mikhail Ivanovitch Samarin, who the Russian consulate wanted delivered to them intead of the HUAC, who wanted to question them on Russian spy rings


	...Mr. Samarin, a Russian teacher of children or Russian United Nations representatives, had sought protection of the FBI against his return to Russia.


Samarin gave testimony but so far can't find online. NY Times reported that he was missing at one point: https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1948/08/10/88122743.pdf


	...Representative Karl E> Mundt, who was acting chairman of the committee during the illness of Mr. Thomas, suggested that if Mr. and Mrs. Samarin were witnesses there might be no need for the testimony of Mr.s Kosenkina.


worth looking into later


goes on to report William Ullman refusing to answer questions to Congress and calling Bentley "a liar." NY Times reporting makes Ullman sound guilty and Bentley sound like a threat to him


report similar for journalist Robert T. Miller, but more charitable


	...Duncan Lee, cited by Miss Bentley as a supplier of secret information to her spy ring while he was a major and lieutentant colenel assigned to the Office of Strategic Services, denied that he was a Communist, or ever had been one. Miss Bentley testified taht she had collected party dues from him. He denied that and much more.

	Mr. Lee admitted that he was acquainted with Miss Bentley through an introduction by Miss Mary Watkins Price, named previously by Miss Bentley as a source of spy ring information from the files of Walter Lippmann, newspaper columnist, while she was his secretary.

	Miss Price, now an organizer in North Carolina for the Wallace Progressive party, has denied that she rifled Mr. Lippmann's files.

	Mr. Lee said that at first he looked on Miss Bentley as a charming, intelligent and well informed product of Vassar College. After about ten months, he testified; she was no longer welcome in their home.

	The reason he gave her, Mr. Lee said, was that her ideas and arguments were so far to the left that he believed he might be embarrased in his OSS post.

	The real reason, he testified, was that Miss Bentley had become a "personal nuisance"; "a very lonely and neurotic woman"; a "very frustrated woman"; and "an emotional weight around our necks." He stressed that he was speaking for himself and Mrs. Lee.


last part effectively a character attack on Bentley with help from NY Times

	
	Miss Bentley in Rebuttal

	Mis Bentley, recalled to the stand, said calmly that, despite Mr. Lee's testimony that he had given her no OSS information, he had discussed with her:

	Reports that, at the time, before the atomic bomb was revealed, there was something "super-secret" going on at Oak Ridge, Tenn., where research was in progress, although he did not know what it was.

	The OSS attitude toward the struggle in China between the Government of Generalissimo Chiang Kai-shek and the Communists.

	OSS plans concerning communistic control plans in the Balkans.

	A proposed "exchange" of twelve OSS operatives for twelve Russian secret police agents, a program that was never realized.

	Miss Bentley reiterated that she had not told Mr. Lee that information she was gathering was going to Russia but had told him it was going to Earl Browder, at that time in good grace as head af the American Communist party.


reports Bentley in rebuttal said: before a bomb revealed, lee told here there was something "super secret" going on at Oak ridge, the OSS attitude toward Chinese civil war, OSS plans about communism in Balkans, an an exchange of 12 OSS operatives for 12 Russian agents

reports Bentley said she didn't tell Lee this info was going to Russia but to Earl Browder, "at that time in good grace"


https://archive.org/stream/hearingsregardin1948unit/hearingsregardin1948unit_djvu.txt
	Mr. Stripling. You are referring now, Mr. Mundt, to Government 
	employees who were not members of either the Silvermaster or the 
	Perlo group. 

	Miss Bentlet. Would you like for me to start with that? 

	Mr. Stripling. Yes ; give those names to the committee. 

	Miss Bentley. Duncan Lee. 

	Mr. Stripling. Duncan Lee? 

	Miss Bextley. Yes. 

	Mr. Stripling. Where was he employed? 

	Miss Bentley. He was one of the legal advisers to Gen. William 
	Donovan in the OSS. 

	Mr. MuNDT. Was he a Communist? 

	Miss Bentley. Yes. 

	Mr. Rankin. And he was an assistant to whom? 

	Miss Bentley. Well, there was a circle of lawyers around General 
	Donovan in the OSS, and he was one of them. He had worked with 
	General Donovan in his law firm before he went into the OSS. 

	...Mr. Mundt. Is that all the information you have on Duncan Lee, 
	Miss Bentlej^ ? 

	Miss Bentley. What else would you like to know about him? 

	Mr. Mundt. Wliat kind of information can you give us ? 

	Miss Bentley. All types of information were given, highly secret 
	information, on what the OSS was doing, such as, for example, that 
	they were trying to make secret negotiations with governments in the 
	Balkan bloc, in case the war ended, that they were parachuting people 
	into Hungary, that they were sending OSS people into Turkey to 
	operate in the Balkans and so on. The fact that General Donovan 
	AN-as interested in having an exchange between the NKVD and the. 
	OSS, all sorts of information. 

	Mr. Mundt. Inasmuch as Duncan Lee was not a member, apparently, 
	of the Silvermaster group, how did you establish the first contact 
	with him ? 

	Miss Bentley. Well, Duncan Lee was a member of the IPR, or 
	Institute for Pacific Relations, in New York, and through that he 
	knew Mildred Price, who was Mary Price's sister. And when Duncan 
	Lee was sent down to Washington to join the OSS, Mary came to us, 
	told us about him, and we were to take him on. Mar}" took care of 
	him for awhile, and then Mary left Washington, and I took him over 
	at that ])oint. 

	Mr. MuxDT. Just how did you establish your first contact with 
	Duncan Lee when vou first came down? You said, "I am tlie gal 
	who IS going to be your contact? 

	80408  48 3 



	530 COMMUNIST ESPIONAGE 

	Miss Bentley. Well, he had been dealing with Mary. He knew 
	Mary personally, you see, through her sister, and Mary had told him 
	about me, and the name I had gone by, which was Helen, and I just 
	walked into his apartment and said, ''I am Helen," and spoke about 
	things that only the two of us would know, and that is how we made 
	our contact. 

	Mr. MuNDT. So you met him in his apartment to get the informa- 
	tion? 

	Miss Bentley. Well, all of this varied. It started with his apart- 
	ment, and then he got very nervous and wished to meet me in the 
	street, so we would meet in drug stores, and so on. All of this varied. 
	There was no standard practice. Sometimes it was one place and 
	sometimes another. 


Bentley testifies Lee gave her information on secret negotiations with Balkan bloc, troop movements, locations of OSS operatives

testified introduced to him by Price, who told Lee of Bentley, walked into apartment and introduced herself with code name and "spoke of things only the two of us would know"

Lee would get nervous and would ask to meet her and different locations



HUAC goes on to mostly ask Lee about meetings with Bentley


	...Mr. Stripling. When you met Jacob N. Golos, what were you told 
as to who he was and what he w' as in Washington ? 



	720 COMMUNIST ESPIONAGE 

	Mr. Lee. Mr. Stripling, may I go into a word of background in. 
	reply to that ? 

	Mr. Stripling. Yes. 

	Mr. Lee. When I met IMiss Bentley at Miss Price's, we found her, 
	as others have, attractive, well informed, a well-educated woman. We 
	found her attractive and she seemed to find us attractive and we had 
	a pleasant chat. She said she knew very few people in Washington 
	and would like to know us better and would like to look us up when 
	she next came to town. 

	She did so some weeks later. I think perhaps the second time she 
	called us up she said she had a friend with her and would like to 
	have us come down and meet her for drinks at this 823 Restaurant. 
	It is my recollection that at that time we first met this man. He 
	doesn't make a very strong impression on me. He was quite obvious- 
	ly ill. I am reasonably certain Miss Bentley described him as a 
	refugee writer. 

	The Chairman. Mr. Stripling, I would like to interrupt a second. 
	The record will show that Mr. Mundt is present. 


Lee denies being a Communist, admits to knowing Bentley, denies giving her classified information


	...Mr. Stripling. Why did you meet Miss Bentley at the drug stores 
on Wisconsin Avenue? 

	Mr. Lee. I will be glad to tell you, sir, but again I would like to 
	give this background. 

	As I say, wlien my wife and I both met Miss Bentley, we found 
	her an extremely attractive person. I think that maybe was partly 



	to 



	COMMUNIST ESPIONAGE 721 

	due to the fact that she seemed to find us even more so. We were glad 
	to see more of lier and were glad when she called ns up. 

	A^'e saw her, as I say, from time to time sporadically over a course 
	of maybe 15 months. For perhaps 10 months we continued to enjoy 
	Miss 13entley's company and it was only over a period of time that we 
	came to revise our opinion of her. 

	But after knowing her a good deal better than we did at first we 
	came to a quite contrary opinion of ]Miss Bentley. We came to the 
	conclusion that she was a very lonely and neurotic woman, that she 
	was a frustrated wom.an, that her liking and apparent ardent liking 
	for us Avas unnaturally intense. AVe began to feel she was an emo 
	tional weight around our necks and that really there was nothing in 
	the acquaintance that justified the intense way she did follow us up. 

	There was one other factor which I will also mention. 

	]Mr. Stku'lixg. Just a moment. Why did you meet her in the drug 
	stores on Wisconsin Avenue? 

	Mr. Lee. I-am coming to that, Mr. Stripling.. 

	]\lr. Stripling. All right. 

	Mr. Lee. One of the factors I would like to mention is when we 
	first met Miss Bentley she posed as a person who was a moderate 
	liberal, and that was one of the things we liked about her. As we got 
	to know her better her views l)ecanie increasingly left wing and in- 
	temperate and extreme. Frankly, I felt that it was a relationship 
	which for that reason might ju'ove embarrassing in my position. I 
	didn't want })eople to say that a friend of mine was talking in quite 
	as extreme a way as Miss Bentley was. 

	Xow, sir, to answer your question specifically, in October 1944 or 
	thereabouts my wife and I decided that this acquaintanca had to be 
	ended primarily because Miss Bentley had become a personal nuisance 
	to us, but also because of other reasons. 

	One evening when she called on us I put it to her quite bluntly that 
	we thought we should not see her any more. I decided to put it on 
	the grounds that her views and her expressed views were apparently 
	a good deal more extreme than we had originally thought. 

	Now, generally speaking, Mr. Stripling, I don't inquire too closely 
	into the political views of my friends and I consider it their business, 
	and as I say, in my position it seemed to be a situation that could be 
	c|uite embarrassing, and that is the way I put it to Miss Bentley. 

	Mv. Stkiplin(;. When was that ? 

	Mr. Lee. This was about October of 1943, 1 think, 

	Mr. Stripling. Where was it? 

	Mr. Lee. 1944 excuse me, sir. 

	Mr. Stripling. Where was it ? 

	Mr. Lee. It would have been at our house. 

	Mr. Stripling. I still want to know why you met her at the drug 
	stores. 

	Mr. Lee. Mr. Strijiling, I am coming to that, sir. 

	When we told Miss Bentley this her reaction was quite violent. She 
	cried, she protested that we meant a great deal to her. She said she 
	was intensely fond of us and she had to go on seeing us and she did 
	carry on, if I may put it that way, for about a half hour. Finally, she 
	suggested that, all right, if we felt it was unwise for her to continue 

	8040.848 15 



	722 COMMUNIST ESPIONAGE 

	visiting us at our home, would we continue to meet her occasionally 
	( lutside at some public place ? In order to get her out of the house, Mr. 
	Stripling, we agreed to do it. 

	Now, after that I think we met Miss Bentlej', at the most, three 
	times. I know that on one occasion my wife and I had dinner with 
	her at Martin's Restaurant, and I believe on two occasions after that 
	Avhen Miss Bentley called, she called from a neighboring drug store, 
	and on both those occasions either we couldn't get a sitter or my wife 
	didn't want to go out and simply told me to go out and see her and 
	get rid of her as quickly as possible, which I tried to do. 


Lee testified that Bentley became annoying and clingy and would call them from drugstores and Lee had to go out to be rid of her


goes on:


	...It is liard for me to believe that Miss Bentley 's statements are those 
	of a rational person. In trying to recall my acquaintance with Miss 
	Bentley I have been puzzled that I do not remember that she ever tried 
	to get any information out of me. In view of that fact I am tempted 
	to believe that Miss Bentley used her social relationship with me merely 
	to help her misrepresent to her employers for her own personal 
	l)uild-up that she had access through me to someone of the importance 
	of General Donovan. 

	Thank you, sir. 


going for saying Bentley is crazy and using social relationship with Lee for personal gain


	...Mr. Lee. I did know v,ho they were  at least I thought I knew who 
	they were. 

	Mr. Stripling. Did you know that Jacob N. Golos was a Soviet 
	agent ? 

	Mr. Lee. I did not ; no, sir. 

	Mr. Stripling. Did you make an investigation to determine who 
	he was ? 

	Mr. Lee. Mr. Stripling, I don't usually make investigations to de- 
	termine who every casual social acquaintance might be. 


says he met with Golos but didn't know he was a Soviet agent

Bentley took the stand afterward


	...The Chairman. Go ahead. 

	Miss Bentley. At that time Miss Mary Price was working for Mr. 
	Golos and myself. She was employed by Mr. Walter Lippmann and 
	she was giving us information which she had taken from Mr. Lipp- 
	mann's files. We had told Miss Price that if she ever found any likel}^ 
	prospect for giving information, she should let us know. 

	I think in May or June of 1942 she informed us that she knew Mr. 
	Lee through her sister. Miss Mildred Price, and Mr. Lee was being 
	transferred to Washington and that she felt he would be a good con- 
	tact for us. We told her then to have him disconnected from the 
	party in New York and when he came to Washington he should contact 
	Miss Price and keep in contact with her. 

	Miss Price continued to contact him until she was ill with virus 
	pneumonia in about December 1942, at which time she came to New 
	York and was ill, I think, 2 or 3- months. Since she couldn't contact 
	Mr. Lee, I went down to Washington on one of my trips, walked up 
	to JMr. Lee's apartmeiit on the fourtli floor of, I think it is 3014 Dent 
	Place, introduced iny;-e]f as Helen  he had previously been told who 
	I was by Miss Price  and that was the first time I saw him. 

	Mr. Stripling. Did you explain to him why you had contacted him ? 

	Miss Bentley. Yes ; I explained that since Miss Price was incapaci- 
	tated and ill, I would take her place temporarily. 

	Mr. Stripling. Temporarily doing what? 

	Miss Bentley. Well, we had expected tliat Mary would recuperate 
	and come back to Washington and renew the contact with him. 


testifies Price working for Golos, introduced to Lee while she was sick, and Bentley introduced herself to Lee saying she would take Price's place as contact with him

	
	...Mr. Stripling. When you first met Mr. Lee, was anyone present in 
	the room ? 

	Miss Bentley. Yes ; his wife was there. 

	Mr. Stripling. Did he ask her to leave the room ? 

	Miss Bentley. At first we had a rather social chat and then when 
	Ave came to discussing business he asked her to go to the kitchen. 

	Mr. Stripling. What business did you discuss ? 

	Miss Bentley. I discussed tlie fact that he had been giving infor- 
	mation from the OSS to Mary Price and I said that I would continue 
	witli tliat. I discussed with him what type of information would be 
	valuable, and so on. 

	Mr. Stripling. How long were you at his apartment? 

	Miss Bentley. The first time ? 

	Mr. Stripling. Yes. 

	Miss Bentley. I should say I was there possibly an hour and a half 
	or 2 hours. 

	Mr. Stripling. When did you see him next ? 

	Miss Bentley. I continued to see him at the apartment on Dent 
	Place I should say possibly that spring before he went to China, I 
	should say four or five times. I can't be sure of that. 


discussed "business" for 1-2 hours after asking lee's wife to leave the room. testified that she told Lee she knew he was passing information from OSS to mary price and that she would continue. Saw him four or five times after this.


	...Mr. Stripling. What occurred at this meeting between Mr. Lee and 
yourself and Mr. Golos? 

	Miss Bentley. I had told Mr. Golos about Mr. Lee, and he thought 
	that the ]n"ospect was very interesting. He wanted to meet him per- 
	sonally. Tlierefore, I had asked Mr. Lee wjiat would be a convenient 
	place for us to meet because I knew he knew so many people in Wash- 
	ington we would have to find a rather obscure place. He suggested 
	this German beer place at 823, Fifteenth Street, I think it is. 

	I remember it distinctly because it has a terrific flight of stairs going 
	down, and jNIr. Golos had a bad heart and I was worried whether he 
	could make the stairs going up and down. 

	At this meeting we sat and I think we drank beer, and Mr. Golos 
	introduced himself as a high functionary of the Communist Party, 
	explained that they were very much interested in the material Mr. 
	Lee was furnishing, and had a long chat with him on the type of in- 
	formation that was available and what he should look for. 

	Mr. Stripling. Was Mr. Lee in uniform at the time? 

	Miss Bentley. Yes, I recall that he was ; yes. 

	Mr. Stripling. Mr. Lee referred to a second meeting with Mr. 
	Golos in New York. Do you recall that meeting? 

	Miss Bentley. I don't recall any such meeting in New York. That 
	was only about a month before Mr. Golos died, you see, when he met 
	him. Mr. (toIos died November 25 of that year. 


testifies Lee interested in meeting Golos and picked a spot where he wouldn't be recognized, but was in uniform. Golos introduced himself as high up in CPUSA, interested in material Lee was furnishing, long chat on what to look for


	...Mr. Stripling. Did ]\Ir. Lee ever furnish you any information which 
	you in turn furnished to the Russian agents? 

	]Miss Bentley. Yes, he did. 

	Mr. Stripling. What type of information? 

	Miss Bentley. I would say it was various types of information that 
	was valuable to us. One type was checking on whether the OSS had 
	spotted any of our people who were then working for the OSS. 

	Mr. Stripling. What did he tell you about that ? 

	Miss Bentley. Originally in the fall of 1943 Miss Price had applied 
	to the OSS for a position there. She was turned down. They gave 
	her some routine excuse with no bad implications, but we asked Mr. Lee 
	to check and find out, if he could, the real reason. He told us, I think 
	2 or 3 months later, that he had checked through the files there and 
	found out that she had been turned down because of past Communist 
	affiliations and connections. 


testified Lee told Bentley why OSS didn't hire her after checking files and finding past Communist affiliations and connections

this combined with Lee's contacts with Price and the way Bentley introduced herself to Lee as Price's replacement probably would have been an explosive part of her testimony if reported


	]Mr. Stripling. Did Mr. Lee ever discuss with you a meeting at 
	which a proposal was submitted that the United States exchange 12 
	OSS agents for 12 NKVD agents with the Soviet Union ? 

	Miss Bentley. I think that was the number. It might have been 
	10 or 11, but it was around that number. 

	Mr. Stripling. Will you tell the committee the information you 
	have ? 

	Miss Bentley. I believe it was in the spring of 1944 that I met him 
	one evening outside his house, I believe, in one of the drug stores. He 
	was very much upset because he had found out that General Donovan 
	was interested in making an exchange of NKVD agents with OSS men. 
	He said this had been brought up in a meeting of, I should say, the top 
	command of the country  the top man from the Navy  Admiral Leahy 
	was there, J. Edgar Hoover, of the Federal Bureau, was there, I think 
	a representative of Roosevelt, and all the top people. He described 
	that meeting in detail to me. He even went into such details as the 
	fact that Admiral Leahy was definitely against such an exchange. 

	Mr. Stripling. ]Mr. Chairman, I don't think any interest would be 
	served in relating to us what was said by the officials. I think the 
	committee should hear that in executive session. 

	The Chairman. Without objection, it is so ordered. 

	Mr, Stripling. I think there is no purpose to having it in the record. 


this is one mentioned by NY Times: that Lee had discussed with Bentley a proposed spy exchange

Bentley testified met with Lee one evening ina drug store, where Le told him details of a meeting with Hoover, top admirals on the exchange. The HUAC stopped Bentley from telling the details on the record.


	What other information did Mr. Lee give you ? Did he ever discuss 
	China policy? 

	Miss Bentley. Yes; he did. I believe it was just before he went to 
	China in 1943 that he gave us the information that the OSS had 
	through, I believe, the Navy in China made a deal with Die Lee, who 
	was-; at tliat time head of the Chinese secret police, in which deal Mr. 
	Die Lee was to furnish information to the OSS and the OSS was to 
	provide arms and money to Die Lee. 

	As ]Mr. Lee told it to me, Mr. Die Lee was not keeping his part of 
	the bargain and he was getting arms and money and not giving the 



	728 COMMUNIST ESPIONAGE 

	information. It was my understanding that that was one of the rea- 
	sons that Mr. Lae was sent to China  to unscramble this thing. 


this might be another the NY times mentions--"	The OSS attitude toward the struggle in China between the Government of Generalissimo Chiang Kai-shek and the Communists.
"

Bentley testified that Lee told her of a secret deal between the OSS and the head of the Chinese secret police for information and the OSS furnishing weapons and money. Duncan Lee wanted the information and was sent to China to collect.

wiki on Die Lee or Dai Li: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dai_Li

fascist, head of intel for Chaing Kai-Shek, mysterious death


	Mr. Stripling. Did he ever tell j'oii anything about OSS operations 
	in the Balkans ? 

	Miss Bentley. Yes; he did. 

	Mr. Stripling. AVhat information did he relate to you regarding 
	that? 

	Miss Bentley. He had a number of pieces of information in regard 
	to Rumania. Bulgaria, and other Balkan countries. There were liberal 
	groups who were anxious not to have the Russians come in when 
	Germany was defeated, and these groups were carrying on secret 
	negotiations in many cases via Switzerland with the OSS. He told 
	me about those. 

	He told me about the OSS group that was stationed in Istanbul, 
	Turkey, as a jumping-oif point for operations in the Balkans. 


NY Times also mentions this, "	OSS plans concerning communistic control plans in the Balkans."

Bentley testified that Lee told her of secret negotiations between liberal groups anxious not to have Russians invade after Germany's defeat, carrying secret negotiations with OSS, OSS group in Istanbul


	Mr. Stripling. Did he ever tell you anything about Oak Ridge, 
	Tenn.? 

	Miss Bentley. Yes. Toward the end of the time I knew him, which 
	I would say would be November 19J:4, he told me that he had word that 
	something very secret was going on at that location. He did not know 
	what, but he said it must be something supersecret because it was 
	shrouded in such mystery and so heavily guarded. 

	The Chairman. What was that date again ? 

	Miss Bentley. I would say it was near the end of the time I knew 
	him. The last time I saw him was the end of December 1944. This 
	must have been October or November, I would say, along in there. 

	The Chairman. When he told 3'ou that about Oak Ridge, where was 
	that meeting? 

	Miss Bentley. That was one of our meetings where we met in the 
	drug store and walked around the neighborhood. 


NY times mentions this: "Reports that, at the time, before the atomic bomb was revealed, there was something "super-secret" going on at Oak Ridge, Tenn., where research was in progress, although he did not know what it was."

NY times seems right about this one except that Lee told it to her in a drugstore (which makes it even funnier)


	Mr. Stripling. Do you want to question Miss Bentley now? I 
	Avould like to call Mr. Lee back. \

	The Chairman. Mr. Mundt. 

	]\Ir. Mundt. You heard the testimony of Mr. Lee a feAv moments 

	Miss Bentley. Yes, I did. 

	Mr. MtTNDT. You recall his statement of your calling at his home 
	(iue night and he telling you that because of your Communist views 
	they were going to break off the acquaintanceship. Was that part 
	of his statement correct? Can you corroborate that part of his state- 
	nient ? 

	Miss Bentley. I am sorry, that didn't happen. That never 
	happened. 

	Mr. Mundt. That never happened? 

	Miss Bentley. No ; it never happened. 

	Mr. Mundt. You don't recall any stage of your acquaintanceship 
	with Mr. Lee where he made known to you that he may have suspected 
	you were a Commmiist ? 

	Miss Bentley. He knew all along I was a Communist. There was a 
	stage when he suspected I Avas a Soviet agent, if that is what you 
	mean, 

	Mr. Mundt. Up until then, though, he didn't feel that being a 
	Communist might in any way give you an association with the Soviet 
	Government? 



	COMMUNIST ESPIONAGE 729 

	Miss Bextley. Up until about the spring of 1944 I couldn't state 
	definitely. I just don't know. 

	Mr. MuxDT. From the spring of 1944 on he knew you were both a 
	Communist and a Russian agent ? 

	Miss Bentley. I imagine so. because that was apropos of that pro- 
	posed transfer between NKVD and the OSS, and I remember he was 
	quite frightened because he said, ''If they come over here, they will 
	come up to my house, knock on the door, shake my hand, and say 
	'Comrade, well done.' '" 

	I remember that distinctly. Tliat, of course, gave me the impres- 
	sion tliat he did believe I was, and he got very nervous during that 
	period. It was impossible to see him sometimes. 

	Finally his wife arranged a meeting for the thi'ee of us toward the 
	end of that summer. I believe, 1944, and he asked me point blank 
	if this was going to Russia or whether it was going to the Communist 
	Party, and I said it was going to Earl Browder. 

	Mr. MuNDT. The information? 

	Miss Bentley. Yes. 

	Mr. MuNDT. That is all. 


also reported by NY times on Bentley's testimony: "Miss Bentley reiterated that she had not told Mr. Lee that information she was gathering was going to Russia but had told him it was going to Earl Browder, at that time in good grace as head af the American Communist party."


Bentley testifies that Lee suspected she was a Soviet agent

she imagined he knew she was a Russian agent from spring 1944, because this was implicit in dicussion of proposed NKVD OSS transfer, and because he told her that they will shake his hand and say "comrade well done" (?)

testifies there was a period he believed she was a Soviet agent and was nervous during this period

when asked if the information was going to Russia or the Communist party, Bentley told him Earl Browder

(probably worth checking if OSS would have known Browder to be a Soviet agent by that time)

why would Duncan Lee be nervous about Bentley being a Russian spy? it didn't come off that he was nervous in his testimony on her

according to Venona, Lee himself was a Soviet agent https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Duncan_Lee

	
	...]Mr. Hebert. Let's differentiate now between the Communist Party 
and the Russian agent. Is there any difference in your mind? 

	Miss Bentley. There is no difference in my mind because I know 
	what the Communist Party stands for, but a good many people who 
	did join the Communist Party did make that distinction."^ 



NY Times article:

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1948/08/11/85304425.html?pageNumber=1

	Mr. Lee, a former member of the law firm of William J. Donovan, who headed the OSS, told the committee that he was sure Mr. Donovan would like to testify in his behalf.

	Accepted for the record was a telegram from Otto C. Doering Jr. sent from a Wisconsin vacation spot to Mr. Thomas. It said in part:

	"As former executive officer of OSS I would be glad to testify before your committee regarding Lee. I want to say now that I knew his work during the war and I completely believe in his loyalty to the OSS and to his country. I have absolute faith in his innocence of the charges made against him by Elizabeth Bentley."




Otto Doering Jr.  OSS executive officer sent telegram saying he would testify for Lee against charges by Bentley


	Proposes Perjury Action

	Members of the investigating committee conceded openly today that the testiony thus far had left them puzzled and disturbed.

	...Representative Mundth cut in:
	"some innocent-sounding people are guilty of infamous crimes or innocent people have been injured by infamous testimony. We must find the answer."

	Mr. Thomas said later that at the close of the hearings the committee would issue a report and a reccomendation. He declined to predict whether the reccomendation would be the calling of a blue-ribbon grand jury to sift the evidence or a demand that  Attoreny General Tom C. Clark initiate proceedings looking to the prosecution of perjurers.


compared to testimony, sets up dispute between Lee of OSS and Bentley. Emphasizes OSS backing up Lee and credentials. Includes Lee's story of Bentley being crazy but not Bentley calling Lee's story fabricated under oath. Charges against Lee by Bentley as reported by times were weak or inconsequential-sounding, in contrast to testimony which was explosive. In this context Times hints at proceding with perjury charges and ends the article there.


If the Times was looking to smear Bentley, where could they go with this from this point?

The article starts off raising suspicion of her: emphasizes she's a "confessed communist," got a red star, and Soviets tried to pay her after her defection. Also says FBI got the payment and quotes that she has been in full cooperation with FBI. So from here can go two ways at least: smear here as a Soviet agent causing trouble, or as someone being paid off by a nefarious FBI (ended up going with that later apparently.)

For some of the people Bentley names NY Times makes them look guilty, for other NY Times defends them. If this was part of forumlating an early strategy, it might be that they realized that some of her accusations could be corroborated and couldn't be refuted except with difficulty, while others could. It's telling that this hearing where she was first introduced to the public she was asked to testify about Duncan Lee, who according to Wikipedia at least was the "most senior alleged source" of the Soviets in U.S. intelligence. Perhaps this was no accident, and NY Times at least milks it for all its worth, basically setting it up as: are you going to believe our senior intelligence officers, or this one woman who's be called crazy?



first mention of bently NY Times 7/30

Remington denial 8/4


more chatter on Bentley around this time:


St Louis Dispatch 8/3 1948 pg 22


https://www.newspapers.com/image/138169258/?terms=Elizabeth+Bentley
	Truth or Votes the Object?

	In a court of law, counsel always may question the credibility of a witness. While congressional committee procedure is considerably less strict than that of the courts, its objective nevertheless is the same: the establishment of the truth. It would seem therefore that committees, too, would have some regard for the records of those whose stories they hear and broadcast.

	As the Washington Post says in an editorial which appears in The Mirror of PUblic Opinion today, both the House Committee on the Un-American Activities and the Senate expenditures subcommittee strayed rather far from this point in listening to Miss Elizabth Bentley's story of Russian espionage in the wartime Washington.

	The woman had her day in court, as the Post points out, and nothing came of it. Yet in spite of this and in spite of her own admission that she had embraced a disregard for the truth, she has been made into a pre-election sensation. Could the Post be right in assuming that she was called because her story was considered "useful for smearing and vote-getting?"


I think this is saying you shouldn't trust Bentley because she confessed to being a spy? Goes onto speculate she was brought on for political reasons (NY Times did something similar maybe, keeps mentioning connection of the accused to Wallace's campaign and gives him a few columns on front page)


first page of this issue of St Louis Dispatch has an AP story on Whittaker Chambers that mentions Bentley in passing:


https://www.newspapers.com/image/138169193/
	EX-RED SAYS STATE DEP OFFICIAL, NLRB ATTORNEY WERE IN 'UNDERGROUND'

	NAMES ALGER HISS, NATHAN WITT AND LEE PRESSMAN; JOHN ABT LEADER


	..."I knew it at its top level, a group of seven or so men, from among whom, in late years, certain members of Miss (Eliabeth T.) Bentley's organization were apparently recruited," Chambers continued.

	...Chambers testified he renounced Communism in 1937 becuase he had become convinced it is a "form of totalitarianism, that is triumph means slavery to men where they wall under its sway, and spiritual night to the human mind and soul."


iirc Chambers remained an active agent of theirs through this and beyond. What does this quote say about him? He wrote books on this, clearly understood the arguments against Communism, but kept working for them anyway.


	Miss Bentley, mentioned by Chambers, is the woman who told a sensational story last week of collecting information for the Russians from many Government employes during the war.

	...Went t oAuthorities.

	Chambers said he reported to Washington authorities what he know of the Communist infiltration of this Government two days after Hitler and Stalin signed their non-aggression pact nine years ago.

	After he broke with Communism, Chambers said, he lived in hiding for a year, "sleeping by day and watching through the night, with gun or revolver within easy reach."


goes on about background of Chambers and the people he accused


local news Press and Sun-Bulletin 28 Jul 1948

reprints U.P. story painting Bentley in better light


https://www.newspapers.com/image/252671177/?terms=%22Elizabeth%2BBentley%22
	U.S. Woman Spy For Reds Identified, Called by Probers

	New York--(U.P.)

	...NOT NAMED LAST WEEK

	In a series of dispatches last week the World-Telegram said that Miss Bentley, then unamed, actually headed a ring of agents, many of them government employes which gathered secret political and military information for Russia.

	...The newspaper said that Miss Bentley, New England born and a member of an old American family, suffered pangs of conscience about her work in 1945 and went to the FBI with her story.

	After a year and a half of investigation FBI men convinced themselves that her story was true, the newspaper said, and in June, 1947, the grand jury investigation was begun.


true that FBI were convinced? this is missing from the NY Times report, other reports who call for questioning her story based on comparing record, prestige of her and who she named

	Another phase of the grand jury's investigation led to the indictment of 12 top Communist leaders on charges they advocated the use of force and violence to overthrow the government.

	IN its articles in Miss Bentley's spy activities the newspaper, who then identified her only as "Mary," said that her agents stole some of the most closely guarded secrets of the war years.




Paul Gallico complaining she was called "blonde spy queen:" https://www.newspapers.com/image/221878782/?terms=Blonde%2BSpy



news Herald Franklin Pensylvania Aug 12 1948, pg 4

https://www.newspapers.com/image/53738308/?terms=lady%2Bspy

Frederick C Othman writes op-ed that Bentley upset that she was called a nuisance and neurotic, and this got to her head more than being called a liar.


	...Lee said he believed the trouble (oops!) was that she was a lonely frustrated spinster. Miss Bentley glared at him. She still was glaring when the tall, handsome and mustachioed Miller began to testify.

	He's a press agent now in New York; he used to be a diplomat at the State Department. He, too, had met Miss Bentley at a cocktail party and he, too, had dates with her frequently thereafter.

	"And," said he, while the female spy silently opened her mouth, "frankly, she became something of a nuisance."

	"Also," he added, "she must have been under some nervous tension, because she began to drink. She showed up at some of these meetings in a not very happy condition."

	Anyhow Miller agreed with Lee that he'd given her no secrets. Spent most of his time, as did Lee, figuring out how to get rid of her.

	Tough. If I were a galmorous lady spy, I believe I'd go out and have a good cry.


Othman so far comes off as a prick

troll type? I guess trolling FBI here: http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-srv/national/daily/march99/sinatra7b.htm

this says he was a New York World Telegram reporter: https://books.google.com/books?id=LnONAwAAQBAJ&pg=PA90&lpg=PA90&dq=Frederick+C.+Othman&source=bl&ots=fIVPsw__AI&sig=rGCe08CoBTT4FrhKDYTekxaFofA&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwj45Z69m43aAhVHMawKHXGvByo4FBDoAQgoMAA#v=onepage&q=Frederick%20C.%20Othman&f=false


another reprinting of the story: https://www.newspapers.com/image/358403479/?terms=lady%2Bspy titled "This Lady Spy Is Due For Great Big Cry"

article does contain useful information for someone who would want to smear here, that she was more sensitive to charges of being a nuisance or neurotic than a liar.


working theory is that for journalists who aim to discredit her, they aren't going to all go to a secret meeting or send each other secret telegrams to work out a strategy

this would add unneccessary risk if they could communicate ideas for a strategy through press, "reading between the lines" as in other communications through open-code of this type

possibly, Othman's article is of this type--an idea for an angle of attack that journalists could adopt if they like it

this would be something they'd need to decide on shortly after her testimony to HUAC, although assuming Lee was involved in a conspiracy to discredit her, Othman's was an angle of attack he had already decided on, apparently jointly with the journalist Miller named in Othman's article.

https://archive.org/stream/hearingsregardin1948unit/hearingsregardin1948unit_djvu.txt

apparently this was Robert T. Miller. Miller was accused by Bentley of being a Communist.

here are the dates of the hearings:

	July 31, 1948 : ^^^^ 

	Testimouy of Elizabeth Terrill Bentley 503 

	August 3, 1948 : 

	Testimony of David Whittaker Chambers 563 

	August 4, 1948 : 

	Testimony of  

	Nathan Gregory Silvermaster 5ST 

	Elizabeth T. Bentley 604 

	Louis J. Russell 612 

	August 5, 1948 : 

	Testimony of  

	Hon.'Fred E. Busbey 625 

	Alger Hiss 642 

	August 7, 1948 : 

	Testimony of David Whittaker Chambers 661 

	August 9, 1948 : 

	Testimony of  

	Alexander Koral 674 

	Victor Perlo 677 

	p:iizabeth T. Bentley 687 

	"Victor Perlo (resumed) 693 

	Gilda de Fi'ank Burke 701 

	Alexander Koral (resumed) 704 

	Louis J. Russell 711 

	August 10, 1948 : 
	Testimony of  

	Duncan Chaplin Lee 715 

	Elizabeth T. Bentley 725 

	Duncan Chaplin Lee (resumed) 733 

	William Ludwig Ullmann 761 

	Robert T. Miller 778 

	August 11. 1948: 
	Testimony of   

	Henry H. Collins 8r;2 

	Elizabeth T. Bentley 810 

	August 12, 1948 : 
	Testimony of  

	Charles Kramer 818 

	Abraham George Silverman 835 

	August 13, 1948 : 
	Testimony of  

	Lauchlln Currie ." 851 

	Harry Dexter White 877 

	Bela Gold 906 

	Sonia Gold 912 

	Frank Coe 915 

	Donald Hiss 928 

	August 16, 1948 : 

	Testimony of Alfter Hiss 9?15 

	August 17. 1948: 

	Testimony of Alger Hiss (Whittaker Chambers) 975 

	August IS, 1948 : 
	Testimony of  

	Nelson Frank 1003 

	Isaac Don Levine 1005 

	Mrs. Alger Hiss 1011 



	111 



	IV CONTENTS 

	August 20, 1948 : 

	Testimony of  Page 

	John J. Abt 1015 

	Lee Pressman 1022 

	Nathan Witt 10^>8 

	August 24, 1948 : 
	Testimony of  

	Louis Budenz 1035 

	Martha Pope 1013 

	Joseph Cherner 1052 

	Samuel A. Mensh 1060 

	Henry J. Gertler 1063 

	W. Marvin Smith 1071 

	August 25, 1948 : 
	Testimony of  

	Alger Hiss 1076 

	Whittaker Chambers 1078 

	Louis J. Russell 1111 

	Alger Hiss (resumed) 1115 

	Alger Hiss (resumed) 1118 

	WJ'ittaker Chambers (resumed) 1176 

	August 26, 1948 : 

	Testimony of William Rosen 1207 

	August 27, 1948 : 
	Testimonv of  

	Leon Cherner 1223 

	Henry Cherner 1227 

	Flovd Rhoda Brewer 1229 

	Samuel Bialek 1232 

	Robert Bialek 1240 

	Whittaker Chambers 1255 

	August 30, 1948: 
	Testimony of  

	Alexander Stevens (real name Goldberger; also known as 

	J. Peters) 1267 

	Whittaker Chambers 1271 

	Alexander Stevens (real name Goldberger; also known as 

	J. Peters) (resumed) 1271 

	Whittaker Chambers (resumed) 1278 

	Adolf A. Berle, Jr 1291 

	September 8, 1948 : 
	Testimony of   

	Mrs. Addie Rosen 1301 

	Louis Rosenberg ^^^"l 

	Irvin Augustus Farrell 1316 

	Henrv Cherner 1319 

	September 9, 1948 : 
	Testimony of  

	William Rosen 1329 

	Maurice Louis Braverman 1342 


Othman's article and the NY Times article pitting her vs. Lee comes right after her hearing with Lee on Aug 10th

looks like Silvermaster got wrecked in hearings on Aug 4

in Jul 31 hearing she says Harry Dexter White passed information through her

testified on Silvermaster group


Jul 29, 1948 Brooklyn Daily Eagle pg 1

https://www.newspapers.com/image/52901497/?terms=%22Elizabeth%2BBentley%22


says Bentley disappeared recently before hearing and was a window of Jacob Golos



Jul 29, 1948, Chicago Tribune pg 1:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/371163189/?terms=%22Elizabeth%2BBentley%22

Willard Edwards reporting that Bentley will soon be questioned by HUAC, more or less telling it straight I guess

calls her a "premuaturely gray woman of 35"

reports that "FBI agents are continuing to follow leads she has given"

one sub title "May Inolve Top Figures" and suggests there may be a political coverup

reports her information "went promptly to Soviet agents"


Willard Edwards on Tribune's next issue pg 4:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/371164912/?terms=%22Elizabeth%2BBentley%22

says Bentley's testimony helpful and incinuates on some deal by New Deal officials to supply weapons to Russia


Chicago Tribune Jul 31, 1948 pg 1

https://www.newspapers.com/image/371169445/

headline "RED SPY TELLS HER STORY!"

"Ex-Agent Says High Government Figures Aided Soviet"


NY Times same day has a front-page story on her:


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1948/07/31/issue.html
	WOMAN LINKS SPIES TO U.S. WAR OFFICES AND WHITE HOUSE

	Elizabeth T. Bentley Accuses Commerce Official as Source of Data Sent to Russia

	WALLACE LEADER NAMED

	Senate Inquiry Witness Says Informer in President's Home Warned of 'Broken' Code

	By C. P. TRUSSELL

	Special to the New York Times

	WASHINGTON, July 30  Miss Elizabeth T. Bentley, the confessed former Communist espionage agent whose testimony led to the recent indictment of twelve national leaders of that party, dramatically identified a Department of Commerce official, William W. Remington, today as one of many Government aides who had given her military information which she forwarded to Russia. 


starts off saying her espionage group had "contacts" and "sympathizers" in high level wartime government positions and the White House.

describes her as "blonde and dressed in black" then on the next page has a picture of her with messy dark hair that looks kindof silly

on first page says she and Price copied Lippman's files on US-British relations and sent to Russia. Quotes Lippman saying "news to me."


	That the White House informant, who remained unidentified, gave the word that the Americans "were about to break--or translate the Russian code." When excited Russians asked "which code" she was at a loss for an explanation "and so was this contact man," she said.

	...The she took on the espionage job partly because she had embraced an ideology which caused her to conclude that it was not disloyal to work for a transformation of American democracy into commnism, and largely because she had fallen in love with her immediate superior, the late Jacob Golos.


times story is mostly positive of Bentley, except in indirect ways

tells some of her story and that she testified on Remington

a section in their suggested she was motivated by hatred of Golos and was quizzed on this


https://www.newspapers.com/image/371169445/
	LINKS FORMER ATTACHE OF WHITE HOUSE TO RING

	Name Withheld; Reveal He Is Still Alive

	BY WILLARD EDWARDS

	(Chicago Tribune Press Service)

	Washington, July 30-A soviet spy ring obtained military secrets and other confidential information from some 50 government officials and employes, including a White House attache, during the war years, congress was told today.

	The witness was Miss Elizabeth T. Bentley, a cursesome and attractive woman in her thirties, who testified that she served as a go-between for Russian agents and men and women employed in high positions in a number of government departments.


why does the press keep commenting on her looks? next to this there's practically a whole column on this

says more or less same thing as NY Times--military secrets being sent to Russia through high level officials, but doesn't white-wash it as much as NY Times

points out Remington had access to atomic energy develpment secrets


describes her story and spy duties, with some quotes by her


	..."They gave me information ranging from political to military. Golos told me that if they were not working in strategic places where they had access to information, I should pull strings to get them transferred."

	..."How could that be done?" asked Ferguson.

	"There was a man in the executive officer who helped to do this," said Miss Bentley. Further questioning indicated that this person was close to the late President Roosevelt. Despite Ferguson's frowns, some committee members tried to learn the identity of this White House official.


NY Times on this:

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1948/07/31/85260782.html?pageNumber=4
	Official Aided Transfer

	Thomas C. Blaisdell Jr., Acting Assistant Secretary of Commerce, who preceeded Miss Bentley to the witness chair, admitted readily to having been highly instrumental in getting Mr. Remington his transfer from the WPB to his department. He conceded also that he had known that Mr. Remington was under a "loyalt" invesgiation at that time.

	He insisted that he still knew "nothing" about charges or findings related t Mr. Remington. He said he had known hm for years and had found him a conscientous and hard-workgin director of the export programs staff of the Office of International Trad.e

	Mr. Blaisdell's answer to questions were cut off by the appearance of Miss Bentley.

	Blazed at by cameras and amid signals for the opening of radio and television circuits, Miss Bentley strode calmy to the witness chair and, after taking the oath and mopping her brow because of the height of the kleig lights, told her story.

	...Under terrific spotlight heat, Miss Bentley, interrupted frequently by questionts, gave a picture of herself and her espionage activites that ran as follows:

	Born of Republican parents in New Milford, Conn., some thirty-six years ago (she declined to enter the age into the record)


NY Times comes off as mocking her

like there's an understanding by them that Bentley is some big shot super-star, and they are pissy about that

this was Jul 31, about a week before the testimony with Lee and when articles started panning her

maybe something building up to that?


https://www.newspapers.com/image/371169484/

tribune gets into sepcifics of the information supplied to Bentley, like airplane tech

goes into detail on the nature of her contacts with these officials

quotes Price trying to politicize it


	...She's now in charge of the Wallace party campaign in North Carolina," said Hoey.

	Miss Price described Miss Bentley's statements as "fantastic." It is an obvious effort to "smear" the great new Progressive party and will, I feel sure, be understood as such by thinking people."




------

reporting Aug 1 on her testimony


ny times:

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1948/08/01/issue.html
	CURRIE ACCUSED OF HELPING SPIES; A ROOSEVELT AIDE

	Miss Bentley Says He Gave Code 'Tip'--White, Formerly of Treasury, Also Named

	BOTH DENY HER TESTIMONY

	Ring Knew of D-Day and B-29 Witness Says, Identifying Many Other Officials

	By JOSEPH A. LOFTUS


	WASHINGTON, July 31--Miss Elizabeth T. Bentley, confessed wartime courier for a Communist espionage ring, today named Lauchlin Currie, a trusted assistant of the late President Roosevet for six years, and harry Dexter White, a former aAssstant Secretary of the Treasury, as two sources of secret information that was transmitted to the Soviet Union.

	She told the House Committee on Un-American Activities taht Mr. Currie "tipped off" the ring that we were on the verge of discovering the key to a Russian code.

	She admitted to never having had direct contact with either of these officials and only "suspected" that they knew that the information they gave was relayed to a foreign government. She said definitely that Mr. Currie was not a Communist.

	...Miss Bentley related that Mr. Silvermaster once told her of information supplied by Mr. Currie to Geroge Silverman, a Government employe in the "Silvermaster Group."

	"One day Mr. Currie came dashing into Silverman's house and said we were in the verge of breaking the Russian code," she said, adding that Currie had been used to protect members of the ring in their jobs.





testimony:

https://archive.org/stream/hearingsregardin1948unit/hearingsregardin1948unit_djvu.txt
		Are there any other names. Miss Bentley, of the Silvermaster group 
	that you have not mentioned? 

	Miss Bentley. Just one. The man was not a Communist but he 
	did give information. Lauchlin Currie. 


names Currie as member of Silvermaster group, "was not a Communist"


	JNIr. Stripling. What type of information did he give ? 


	...Miss Bentley. He furnished inside information on this Govern- 
	ment's attitude toward China, tow^ard other governments. He once 
	relayed to us the information that the American Government was on 
	the verge of breaking the Soviet code, various things. 

	Mr. Stripling. But Mr. Currie was not a member of the Communist 
	Party to your knowledge? 

	Miss Bentley. Not to my knowledge ; I don't believe so. 


testifies Curry relayed information on China policy and breaking Soviet code, "don't believe" he was member of Communist party

	
	...Mr. Rankin. I see. You tell the committee that this man Currie, 
	while he was employed in the White House, was giving your Com- 
	munist organization secret information? 

	Miss Bentley. Yes.


testifies Curry gave Soviets secret information


	...Mr. Stripling. We have a very voluminous file which the Civil Serv- 
	ice Commission accumulated on Nathan Gregory Silvermaster. From 
	time to time they would hear him regarding his alleged Communist 
	affiliations. We have a memorandum which states that after hearing 
	Mr. Silvermaster they were referred to Lauchlin Currie to get the true 
	facts on Silvermaster. After conferring with Lauchlin Currie, Mr. 
	Silvermaster remained in his employ. That is according to the files of 
	the Civil Service Commission. 

	Miss Bentley. May I say something, Mr. Stripling? 

	The Chairman. Miss Bentley. 

	Miss Bentley. It was definitely from my own knowledge due to Mr. 
	Currie's influence that Mr. Silvermaster was not ousted from his job 
	in the BEW but was permitted to return to the Agriculture Depart- 
	ment without any stigma on him. 


Silvermaster was at risk of losing his job do to his Communist affiliations, and Currie was asked to "get the true facts." Bentley testified that Currie stopped him from being ousted


	...Mr. Stripling. Lauchlin Currie ? 

	Miss Bentley. Yes ; he was a specialist on China. 

	Mr. MuNDT. Was he a Communist? 

	Miss Bentley. He was not a member of the party here because he 
	was an Englishman, English born, and subsequently, I believe, became 
	an American citizen. But at that time the Communist Party would 
	not accept aliens  for what reason, I do not know  and, therefore, 
	although he had been a member in England, I understand he was 
	not a member of the American [Communist] party at that time. 


testified that Curry was not a member of the party since CPUSA would for some reason not accept forigners at that time and Currie was English. Currie was a Communist member in England but not in US


	...Mr, Nixon, How did you know that Mr. Currie gave this informa- 
	tion to Mr. Silverman? 

	Miss Bentley, Because I was told that by Mr, Silvermaster and Mr. 
	Ullmann. 

	Mr. Nixon. I see. And the information that was received from Mr. 
	Currie via Mr. Silverman was taken by you and turned over to the 
	Russian agents? 

	Miss Bentley. That is correct. 

	Mr. Nixon, That is correct. As to any specific information that was 
	obtained in this manner, is it my understanding that you testified that 
	the information concerning the breaking of the Russian code was ob- 
	tained through Mr. Ciirrie? 

	Miss Bentley. That is correct. 

	]\lr, Nixon. How do yon know that? 

	Miss Bentley. Well, Mr. Silverniaster told me that one day Mr. 
	Currie came dashing into Mr. Silverman's house, sort of out of breath, 
	and told him that the Americans were on the verge of breaking the 
	Soviet code. Mr. Silverman, of course, got immediately  in due 
	course, got in touch with Mr. Silvermaster. 

	Mr. Nixon. And Mr. Silvermaster conveyed that information to 
	you? 

	Miss Bentley. That is correct. 

	...Mr. NisoN. Was there any other information, specific information, 
	that you know of that was obtained through Mr. Currie? 

	ISIiss Bentley. Yes ; some of the information on our relations with 
	China  I mean whether this Government would support Chiang Kai- 
	shek, or the Eighth Eoute xlrmy people. His value also lay, as I said, 
	in helping Mr. Silvermaster into his job and easing him out of his job, 
	and so on. He was sort of a friend of court. 

	Mr. Nixon. He was a friend at court in seeing that the members of 
	the ring obtained positions in Government where they could be produc- 
	tive. As you indicated. 

	Miss Bentley. That is correct.


bentley testified that Currie was seen as a "friend of the court." He helped Silvermaster in and out of jobs where he could be productive. Testifies that Silvermaster told her he once came dashing into Silverman's house out of breath and told him Americans on verge of breaking Soviet code. Bentley turned this information over to the Russian government.



how this same testimony got reported in Chicago Tribune (article by Willard Edwards):


https://www.newspapers.com/image/371155541/
	Agents "Much Excited"

	"Silverman reported one day that Currie had dashed into this home and said the Americans wer eon the verge of breaking the Russian code," Miss Bentley testified. He imediately told Silvermaster who reported it to me. The Russian agents were much exited about this information.


Besides Currie implicitly, Bentley never says that "Russian agents" were excited by this information.


	"Currie also gave information about whether this government would support Chiang Kai-shek in China. he was one of the people who arranged to have Communist informants placed in key government positions. Mr. White was another and there certainly were others."


she never said this either--said Currie a "friend of the court" who helped at least with moving Silvermaster into his job, keeping job and "easing him out"


	The witness said Ullman and Silvermaster were definately aware that the information was going to Russian agents. White "knew where it was going but preferred not to mention the fact," she added.

	..."I am certain Currie knew where the information was going," she declared.


that quote can't be found in transcript. From testimony:


https://archive.org/stream/hearingsregardin1948unit/hearingsregardin1948unit_djvu.txt
	...Mr. Nixon. Well, now, those who did not know, why did they give 
	you the information % Why did they think they were giving to it you ? 
	For what purpose? 

	Miss Bentley. That is a question I do not know the answer to. I 
	know that both the Silvermasters and Ullmann knew exactly where 
	it was going. From what they said, Mr. White knew where it was 
	going but preferred not to mention the fact. They were undecided 
	as to whether Mr. Currie knew or not. but they suspected that he did. 
	Others of them, I am not sure about. Some of them may have thought 
	it was going to the Communist Party headquarters for use by Earl 
	Browder, or others may have guessed" the truth. It just was not dis- 
	cussed, and, therefore, I cannot give you the answer. 




https://archive.org/stream/hearingsregardin1948unit/hearingsregardin1948unit_djvu.txt
	Mr. Nixon. To the Soviet agents, as far as they were coricerned, did 
	they realize that by giving that information, making that information 
	available to the Russians, it was not in the best interests of the United 
	States? 

	Miss Bentley. I would say that their point of view was roughl}' the 
	fact that as Communists they were interested in Russia because Rus- 
	sia already had a Communist government. They wished for a Com- 
	munist government in this country. Therefore, they felt that it was 
	their duty to aid a country vshich had a Communist govermnent. They 
	also felt that Russia was bearing the brunt of the war  you remember, 
	the Germans drove straight through  that she was inadequately^ pre- 
	pared, and they told me that in the course of their dealings with the 
	American Government they felt that thei'e were elements in the Ameri- 
	can Government who were blocking aid in Russia at the time when they 
	felt it was absolutely necessary for her survival. 

	Mr. Nixon. Were they aware of the fact that by furnishing this in- 
	formation to Russia they were violating the laws of the United States? 

	Miss Bentley. I would think so, because I imagine most of them  
	hadn't they signed affidavits or something when they took these secret 
	jobs that said 3'OU should not give out that information? 

	Mr. Nixon. In other words, as far as these people were concerned, 
	they were placing the interests, during the war  they were placing the 
	interests of the Soviet Government above that of their own Govern- 
	ment ? 

	Miss Bentley. I would say that was correct ; yes. 

	Mr. Nixon. And when they furnished this information, they knew 
	that they were doing something which was not in the best interests of 
	the Govermnent of the United States as it then existed, and as they 
	w^orked for it. 



	COMMUNIST ESPIONAGE 555 

	Miss Bextley. I hardly know how to answer that, because they felt 
	they were acting in the best interests of the American Government ; 
	that is to say, the elements which they approved of. 

	]Mr. Nixon. I see. 

	Miss Bentley. But they felt that they were acting against the ele- 
	ments who were anti-Russian, so it is hard to break the thing down. 

	Mr. Nixon. They knew they were not acting in the best interests of 
	the non-Communist American Government? 

	Miss Bentley. That is correct ; yes. 

	IVIr. Nixon. And they would act in the best interests of the American 
	Government where they felt that that Government was serving com- 
	munistic purposes; isn't that the case? 

	Miss Bentley. That is correct; yes. 


	...Mr. McDowell. I have only one or two questions. 

	You feel that the American Communists have been made suckers 
	of by the Russians ? 

	Miss Bentley. With the exception of that small group of people 
	who actually run the American Party, I would say that the vast 
	majority of the rank-and-file people in the Communist Party are; 
	yes. 

	Mr. McDowell. Suckers? 

	Miss Bentley. Right.



Why is Willard Edward making up quotes and putting words in her mouth?

in some ways he makes her testimony sound more certain about some things or more bitter about her contacts and espionage colleagues


iirc Chicago Tribune did a similar thing in the Leopold Loeb case with the transcript of their confessions


why do the Tribune and NY Times seem similar 24 years later, down to the attitude and tactics?


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/local/1990/12/23/willard-edwards-88-washington-newspaperman/612e5150-c78e-4828-a32e-bb3d0241b802/?utm_term=.c7a7cc03b359

worked for City News Burea 1920, Chicago Tribune 1922

assigned to Washington 1935 covered trial of guy who kidnapped Charles Lindbergh

covered FDR and Senate in washington


http://articles.chicagotribune.com/1990-12-23/news/9004170502_1_mr-edwards-lee-edwards-communist-activities

"reputation as an adviser to young reporters"


	FOR THE RECORD - Additional material published Dec. 30, 1990:
	Corrections and clarifications
	An obituary of former Tribune reporter Willard Edwards that ran Dec. 23 said that the former New York Daily Worker, a Communist
	publication, had called Edwards ``one of the most dangerous`` reporters of Soviet influence. Actually, the Daily Worker had said that Edwards, a strong anti-Communist, was a dangerous reporter to the Soviet cause. The Tribune regrets the error.

	He was a friend of Richard Nixon and worked closely with him in the Alger Hiss case when Nixon was a young California congressman. Mr. Edwards was such an authority on the late Sen. Joseph McCarthy of Wisconsin that he was a research source during his retirement for authors writing about McCarthy.


this says joined Tribune in 1925


	...He covered 20 national political conventions during his career and in the late 1940s and 1950s became a specialist on Communist activities.

	He had dozens of exclusives during that era and liked to cite an observation by the former New York Daily Worker, a Communist publication, that called him ``one of the most dangerous`` reporters of Soviet influence.


hmmm


not so effective if he lies

maybe effective at something different from exposing communist tricks

what did the communist newspapers say about him?


this is interesting:


https://books.google.com/books?id=sNAkHe0z4RYC&pg=PT115&lpg=PT115&dq=%22Daily+Worker%22+%22Willard+Edwards%22&source=bl&ots=MKpAPvZMHl&sig=rPxN-s5f1qk3cd2lLoeKbefKJP0&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjvgKeJ1o3aAhUn7IMKHa2sD7oQ6AEIPDAE#v=onepage&q=%22Daily%20Worker%22%20%22Willard%20Edwards%22&f=false
	Roy Cohn made his friend G. David Schine the unpaid "chief consultant" to the subcommittee, despite his scant credetials for the job. The two self-indulgent young men operated in a heady, unrestraiend atmosphere that fostered sadistic treatment of witnesses.


Bentley's "friend" Ruth Matthews told FBI Bentley was upset at Roy Cohn for not helping her with taxes which were prepared incorrectly when he said he would

it was said Roy Cohn was with Matasow at the McCarthy dinner with Bentley that caught FBI attention and Cohn once had to threaten Matasow for some reason

he was a counsel to McCarthy's committee

something going on with Roy Cohn?

	
	An investigation of the books stocked by the U.S. Information Agency's libraries ovrseas gave McCarthy carte blanche to call any author whose book the govenrment might have purchased to question the authors' personal politics in order to discredit the USIA. Among those interrogated was one of his most outspoken critis, the editor of the New York Post, James Wechsler, who as a college student and member of the Young Communist League had written Revolt on the Campus in 1935. Wechsler later broke with the Communists and his anti-Communsit editorial line at the Post regularly drew fire from the Daily WOrker. Wchsler was astonished when McCarthy asked whether he had actually inspired the Daily Worker's attacks upon himself as a form of voer. "That way madness lies," the conservative James Burnham wrote, castigating McCarthy's logic. "By this kind of reasoning, no one could ever prove his loyalty If you support Communist objectives, you are obviously a Communist; if you attack them, this is a deception maneuver, and you are still a Communist."


what about attacking the Communists and doing a shit job of it?

	
	Liberals suspected that the hearings were intended to silence the press, and indeed many of the witnesses before McCarthy's subcommittee were asked both "Do you read the Daily Worker?" and "Do you read the New YOrk Post?"

	...McCarthy's wandering attention finally settled on the Army Signal Corps at Fort Monmouth, New Jersey. He set out to make a case that several engineers who had been suspended as security risks had actually been engaged in espionage. At one of the many closed-door sessions he held, reporters watched an ashen-faced witness being escorted from the hearing. Senator McCarthy informed them that the witness had broken down and cried after "some rather vigorous cross-examination by Roy Cohn." The senator solemnly added, "I have just recieved word that the witness admits that he was lying the first time and now wants to tell the truth," proclaiming it the "most important development" of the investigation. In the Chicago Tribune's lead story the next day, Willard Edwards hyped McCarthy's charges, writing "an army signal crops employee suddenly burst into tears, hysterically confessing perjury." The chairman asked reporters not to identify the witness, but they published his name anyway. Carl Greenblum, a technician at the army facility, had a hammer and sickle painted on his house after his name appeared in the papers. He later explained to the press that the death of his mother two days earlier had left him emotionally distraught. He had sent word that he wanted to tell his story over from the beginning, which McCarthy interpreted to mean that he had lied earlier, "but that certainly was not the case."


goes on to say McCarthy attacked mil officer Ralph Zwicker for promoting a communist, got personal with "you're not fit to wear that uniform!"

Chicago Tribune editorials, H.V. Kaltenborn, and Edwards, previously sympathetic (at least latter two), called McCarthy to cool it. WH aids told reporters Eisenhower was going to defend Zwickerm, but Eisenhower just said show more courtesy at hearings and praised Zwicker. Edwards saw this as olive branch and went to advise McCarthy to patch up with Ike, but McCarthy was already handing out press releases rebuking president. Edwards said from that day on it was "all downhill" for McCarthy. 

Book author says the press, led by New York Times and Washington post, "intensified its fire on McCarthy"

	...The conservative Washington correspondent Allen Dury complained that newspapers seemd to have only three ways of dealing with news in those days. It was either "He Didn't Mention McCarthy But We Know He Meant To, So We'll Do IT For Him," or "He Said Five Thousand Words on Something Else And Fifteen On McCarthy And It's Up To Us To PUt It In Proper Perspective," or "Nobody Even Thought About McCarthy And We Just Can't Conceal Our Surprise." The senator might have had a knack for planting himself in the center of things, Drury conceded, but most of his publicity came from the media's "sick obsession" with him.


goes on to say even Whittaker Chambers turned on McCarthy

says Eisenhower had a theory that "turning off the spigot of publicity would cause McCarthyism to dry up"


	..."If the Communists had wanted to pick someone to attack them, they couldn't have done better," Willard Edwards commented.


hehe

Edwards honest sometimes?

the paper on active measures by a U.S. officer said something similar, like "McCarthy wasn't a Soviet spy but he might have well as been"


	...Ultimately, Joe McCarthy's impact proved more anti-ideological than anti-Communist. Having begun as a movement to stigmatize the left, McCarthyism marginalized the right. "In the end vindictiveness reigned," wrote Ralph De Toledano, "directed primarily against the Senator, and those who supported him found themselves marked, misrepresented, and therefore embittered." The friends of Joe McCarthy had believed that ridding Communists from the government trumped individual rights and justified the means to that end. Convincing themselves that traitors had sabotaged U.S. foreign policy, the McCarthyites underestimated the actualy accomplishments of the Truman and Eisenhower administrations. The architects of America's Cold War strategies, whom McCarthy relentlessly assailed, eventually prevailed. McCarthy's own ruin flattened political discourse and narrowed the range of acceptable argument, fostering a Cold War political concensus that left little room for his supporters.


did Bentley kick-off all this?

I guess it's weird McCarthy became the voice of rooting out anti-Communist subversion and not her

strategy seems to be trash someones reputation by association, and politicize

Bentley could become "just another McCarthyite"

I guess Edwards was doing something like that in his reporting for Chicago Tribune--reported favorably of her, opened article by calling her pretty and badass, then spent half the rest of the article flat out lying

so the public might wonder: why are all the people trying to root out communist subversion liars?


https://books.google.com/books?id=sNAkHe0z4RYC&pg=PT115&lpg=PT115&dq=%22Daily+Worker%22+%22Willard+Edwards%22&source=bl&ots=MKpAPvZMHl&sig=rPxN-s5f1qk3cd2lLoeKbefKJP0&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjvgKeJ1o3aAhUn7IMKHa2sD7oQ6AEIPDAE#v=onepage&q=venona&f=false

talks of theatrics between Chambers, Hiss and press around same time of Bentley's testimony


------

Willard Edwards a suspicious person

why did he report on Bentley's testimony with made-up quotes and lies when he could have just told the truth for more or less the same effect?


at the time he started working at the Tribune, they clearly had something strange going on, as shown by the Leopold-Loeb case


interview with him:


https://www.trumanlibrary.org/oralhist/edwardsw.htm

sad he was late to Valentine's day massacre

has some cool stories about reporting on Gang violence in Chicago

had a gansgeter friend he was supposed to hang out with for info, went to parties with him

	EDWARDS: Right. And I had numerous stories about gangland figures, but you wouldn't be interested in that I think.

	JOHNSON: Is that on tape, or on the record somewhere else?

	EDWARDS: I don't believe so. I will tell just one story.

	JOHNSON: All right.

	EDWARDS: It was necessary in those days to have a gangster friend, so you could get some information from his side of the story. I became a friend of a figure known as "Dingbat Oberta;" and he was a jolly, gay, companion. We got together along very well, and I got a little information from him. And then I was awakened to the

	fact that he was not such a good companion after all. We were double-dating and dancing in the rear room of a saloon on the south side of Chicago. I happened to be looking at him. He was dancing with a girl with a bare shouldered dress, and just out of pure whimsy, he put his lighted cigarette into her shoulder. As she screamed, he put his head back and laughed; that was the funniest thing he had ever seen in all his life. I thought, "These are a different breed of men."

	JOHNSON: Dingbat.

	EDWARDS: Dingbat Oberta. He was found dead about a year later in a ditch, full of holes.

	JOHNSON: Was he considered a member of the gang?

	EDWARDS: He was a member of the gang, and he apparently offended somebody higher up. He did something that was wrong.

	JOHNSON: Was Bugs Moran involved?

	EDWARDS: Bugs Moran was a member of the northside mob, in opposition to the Capone gang.

	JOHNSON: You didn't get in on that Valentine's Day massacre?

	EDWARDS: I was there, but I got there late. I wish I could say I was there.


comes of as thrill-seeking guy, interesting, personable (it would be a shame if someone told him that this makes him a superior being and should therefore devote his energies to slaughtering and/or enslaving everybody else...)


	...JOHNSON: How did these Presidents handle their conferences in comparison with each other? Who do you think was the best in handling news conferences of all the Presidents?

	EDWARDS: Well, Jack Kennedy, of course, was a master. He somehow was kind of a newspaperman himself. He liked just what they liked. Bobby Kennedy and I were very close friends.

	JOHNSON: Well, how about Roosevelt? He used to have very good rappport.

	EDWARDS: Yes, as far as I was concerned, and I was part of it. He would make a joking remark in reply to something I said.


	...JOHNSON: You were there in the Johnson years, and Nixon?

	EDWARDS: Yes.

	JOHNSON: Right up to Watergate.

	EDWARDS: Don't ask me about Nixon; I got to be very palsy-walsy with him.



was he really friends with Nixon? answer here says something, like he's the kind of guy who can get "palsy-walsy" with someone while not necessarily liking them


...


time to solve another 100 year old murder mystery?


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Charles_Lindbergh

Lindbergh's father a U.S. Congressman, wikipedia says one of the only to vote in opposition to WWI

Lindberg got interested in flying, would fly people around like a doctor that needed to get to patient in a flood, his dad to a Senate campaign rally

got some funding for a plane

made a challenging flight for a prize to fly from NY to paris and was the first to do it

was very famous after he did it

	
	...Lindbergh received unprecedented adulation after his historic flight. People were "behaving as though Lindbergh had walked on water, not flown over it".[58]:17 His mother's house in Detroit was surrounded by a crowd estimated at about 1,000.[59] Countless newspapers, magazines, and radio shows wanted to interview him, and he was flooded with job offers from companies, think tanks, and universities.

	The French Foreign Office flew the American flag, the first time it had saluted someone who wasn't a head of state.[60] Lindbergh also made a series of brief flights to Belgium and Great Britain in the Spirit before returning to the United States. Gaston Doumergue, the President of France, bestowed the French Lgion d'honneur on Lindbergh,[61] and on his arrival back in the United States aboard the U.S. Navy cruiser USS Memphis (CL-13) on June 11, 1927, a fleet of warships and multiple flights of military aircraft escorted him up the Potomac River to the Washington Navy Yard, where President Calvin Coolidge awarded him the Distinguished Flying Cross.[62][63] The U.S. Post Office Department issued a 10-cent Air Mail stamp (Scott C-10) depicting the Spirit and a map of the flight.


Wikipedia emphasizes that he became a symbol of American pride


	...On December 14, 1927, a Special Act of Congress awarded Lindbergh the Medal of Honor, despite the fact that it was almost always awarded for heroism in combat.[71] It was presented to Lindbergh by President Coolidge at the White House on March 21.[72] Other noncombat awards of the Medal of Honor were made to naval aviators Richard E. Byrd and Floyd Bennett, as well as arctic explorer Adolphus W. Greely.


maybe went overboard? but wikipedia goes on about all the awards he got and the fame he had


	...Lindbergh was honored as the first Time magazine "Man of the Year" when he appeared on that magazine's cover at age 25 January 2, 1928; he remains the youngest Man of the Year ever.[73] The winner of the 1930 Best Woman Aviator of the Year Award, Elinor Smith Sullivan, said that before Lindbergh's flight,

    	People seemed to think we [aviators] were from outer space or something. But after Charles Lindbergh's flight, we could do no wrong. It's hard to describe the impact Lindbergh had on people. Even the first walk on the moon doesn't come close. The twenties was such an innocent time, and people were still so religiousI think they felt like this man was sent by God to do this. And it changed aviation forever because all of a sudden the Wall Streeters were banging on doors looking for airplanes to invest in. We'd been standing on our heads trying to get them to notice us but after Lindbergh, suddenly everyone wanted to fly, and there weren't enough planes to carry them.[74]


maybe Lindbergh and aviators then could be compared to astronaughts in 60's

Lindberghe said to have popularized flight and got Wall Street interested in it


get impression whoever wrote his wikipedia article didn't like him--why?


	...American family

	In his autobiography, Lindbergh derided pilots he met as womanizing "barnstormers;" he also criticized Army cadets for their "facile" approach to relationships. He wrote that the ideal romance was stable and long-term, with a woman with keen intellect, good health, and strong genes,[89] his "experience in breeding animals on our farm [having taught him] the importance of good heredity".[90]


Lindbergh wrote in favor of stable-long term relationships, but wikipedia says he had 7 kids out of wedlock--Lindbergh a hypocrite?

quotes chosen about "strong genes" make him sound a little fascist

	
	...Lindbergh saw his children for only a few months a year. He kept track of each child's infractions (including such things as gum-chewing) and insisted that Anne track every penny of household expenses in account books.[94]

	Kidnapping of Charles Lindbergh Jr.
	Main article: Lindbergh kidnapping
	On the evening of March 1, 1932, twenty-month-old Charles Augustus Lindbergh Jr. was abducted from his crib in the Lindbergh's rural home, Highfields, in East Amwell, New Jersey, near the town of Hopewell.[N 4] A man who claimed to be the kidnapper[96] picked up a cash ransom of $50,000 on April 2, part of which was in gold certificates, which were soon to be withdrawn from circulation and would therefore attract attention; the bills' serial numbers were also recorded. On May 12 the child's remains were found in woods not far from the Lindbergh home.[97]

	In response to what was widely called "The Crime of the Century", Congress passed the so-called "Lindbergh Law", which made kidnapping a federal offense if the victim is taken across state lines or (as in the Lindbergh case) the kidnapper uses "the mail or ... interstate or foreign commerce in committing or in furtherance of the commission of the offense", such as in demanding ransom.[98]

	Richard Hauptmann, a 34-year-old German immigrant carpenter, was arrested near his home in the Bronx, New York, on September 19, 1934, after paying for gasoline with one of the ransom bills. $13,760 of the ransom money and other evidence was found in his home. Hauptmann went on trial for kidnapping, murder and extortion on January 2, 1935 in a circus-like atmosphere in Flemington, New Jersey. He was convicted on February 13,[99] sentenced to death, and electrocuted at Trenton State Prison on April 3, 1936.[100]


Lindbergh's 20 month old kid was kidnapped in East Amwell, JH, got paid in ransom but the baby was found dead in the woods

this also was called "the crime of the century", and Congress passed "Lindbergh law" after this making kidnapping a federal crime in certain cases

arrested Richard Haputmann for the murder


	...An intensely private man,[101] Lindbergh became exasperated by the unrelenting public attention in the wake of the kidnapping and Hauptmann trial,[102][103] and was concerned for the safety of his three-year-old second son Jon.[104][105] Consequently, in the predawn hours of Sunday, December 22, 1935, the family "sailed furtively"[102] from Manhattan for Liverpool,[106] the only three passengers aboard the United States Lines freighter SS American Importer.[N 5] They traveled under assumed names and with diplomatic passports issued through the personal intervention of Treasury Secretary Ogden L. Mills.[108]


Lindbergh was worried for his family's safety afteward, and sailed icognito to Liverpool afterward

went around europe for awhile until 1938, when Genral H. H. Hap Arnold called him back to help Air Corps with readiness for war

was interested in rocket science and invented some medical science things

he surveyed German and Soviet aircraft from 1936 to 1939 at the request of the U.S. military (like a spy?)


	...In 1938, Hugh Wilson, the American ambassador to Germany, hosted a dinner for Lindbergh with Germany's air chief, Hermann Gring and three central figures in German aviation, Ernst Heinkel, Adolf Baeumker, and Willy Messerschmitt. At this dinner Gring presented Lindbergh with the Commander Cross of the Order of the German Eagle. Lindbergh's acceptance proved controversial after Kristallnacht, an anti-Jewish pogrom in Germany a few weeks later. Lindbergh declined to return the medal, later writing: "It seems to me that the returning of decorations, which were given in times of peace and as a gesture of friendship, can have no constructive effect. If I were to return the German medal, it seems to me that it would be an unnecessary insult. Even if war develops between us, I can see no gain in indulging in a spitting contest before that war begins."[132]


got a medal from Hermann Goring in 1938, and there was a pogrom a few weeks later. Lindbergh didn't want to give the medal back and later wrote about this.


	...Non-Interventionism and America First involvement

	At the urging of U.S. Ambassador Joseph Kennedy, Lindbergh wrote a secret memo to the British warning that a military response by Britain and France to Hitler's violation of the Munich Agreement would be disastrous; he claimed that France was militarily weak and Britain over-reliant on its navy. He urgently recommended that they strengthen their air power to force Hitler to redirect his aggression against "Asiatic Communism".[130] In a controversial 1939 Reader's Digest article he wrote, "Our civilization depends on peace among Western nations ... and therefore on united strength, for Peace is a virgin who dare not show her face without Strength, her father, for protection."[133][134] Lindbergh deplored the rivalry between Germany and Britain, but favored a war between Germany and Russia.[130]


Lindbergh wanted Western nations to have a strat of getting Hitler to attack Communists


	Following Hitler's invasion of Czechoslovakia and Poland, Lindbergh decried suggestions that the United States should send aid to countries under threat,[further explanation needed] writing "I do not believe that repealing the arms embargo would assist democracy in Europe" and[135] "If we repeal the arms embargo with the idea of assisting one of the warring sides to overcome the other, then why mislead ourselves by talk of neutrality?"[135] He equated assistance with war profiteering: "To those who argue that we could make a profit and build up our own industry by selling munitions abroad, I reply that we in America have not yet reached a point where we wish to capitalize on the destruction and death of war."[135]

	In late 1940 Lindbergh became spokesman of the non-interventionist America First Committee,[136] soon speaking to overflow crowds at Madison Square Garden and Chicago's Soldier Field, with millions listening by radio. He argued that America had no business attacking Germany; he later wrote:

	    I was deeply concerned that the potentially gigantic power of America, guided by uninformed and impractical idealism, might crusade into Europe to destroy Hitler without realizing that Hitler's destruction would lay Europe open to the rape, loot and barbarism of Soviet Russia's forces, causing possibly the fatal wounding of western civilization.[137]


Lidbergh apparently saw WWII as a conflict between Nazis and Soviets from early on, and didn't want to help Soviets. Apparently his solution to this was appeasement? or "non-interventionalism"


	In his 1941 testimony before the House Committee on Foreign Affairs opposing the Lend-Lease bill, Lindbergh proposed that the United States negotiate a neutrality pact with Germany.[138] President Franklin Roosevelt publicly decried Lindbergh's views as those of a "defeatist and appeaser", comparing him to U.S. Rep. Clement L. Vallandigham, who had led the "Copperhead" movement that had opposed the American Civil War. Lindbergh promptly resigned his commission as a colonel in the U.S. Army Air Corps, writing that he saw "no honorable alternative" given that Roosevelt had publicly questioned his loyalty.[139]


cites ""Urges Neutrality: Aviator Testifies He Wants Neither Side to Win Conflict". The New York Times, January 24, 1941, p. 1."

stalin-hitler pact in 1939, operation barbarossa June 22 1941, Lend-Lease for allies signed March 11, 1941, holocaust first reported 1942 (and should look into this https://www.theguardian.com/media/greenslade/2015/jan/27/daily-telegraphs-holocaust-article-in-1942-that-went-unheralded)

so while Hitler was invading Europe, and still ostensibly had non-agression pact with Soviets, he wanted the U.S. to sign their own non-aggression pact with Hitler


	At an America First rally in September, Lindbergh accused three groups of "pressing this country toward war[:] the British, the Jewish, and the Roosevelt Administration":[140]

	    Instead of agitating for war, the Jewish groups in this country should be opposing it in every possible way for they will be among the first to feel its consequences. Tolerance is a virtue that depends upon peace and strength. History shows that it cannot survive war and devastation.[141]

	He went on to warn of "large [Jewish] ownership and influence in our motion pictures, our press, our radio, and our government", though he condemned Germany's antisemitism: "No person with a sense of the dignity of mankind can condone the persecution of the Jewish race in Germany." He continued,

	    I am not attacking either the Jewish or the British people. Both races, I admire. But I am saying that the leaders of both the British and the Jewish races, for reasons which are as understandable from their viewpoint as they are inadvisable from ours, for reasons which are not American, wish to involve us in the war. We cannot blame them for looking out for what they believe to be their own interests, but we also must look out for ours. We cannot allow the natural passions and prejudices of other peoples to lead our country to destruction.[142]


Lindbergh said there was some kind of Jewish conspiracy in hollywood and the press pushing the country toward war...


	Responding to criticism of his speech,[143] Lindbergh denied he was anti-Semitic but did not back away from his positions.

	Anne Lindbergh felt that the speech might tarnish Lindbergh's reputation unjustly; she wrote in her diary:

	    I have the greatest faith in [Lindbergh] as a personin his integrity, his courage, and his essential goodness, fairness, and kindnesshis nobility really ... How then explain my profound feeling of grief about what he is doing? If what he said is the truth (and I am inclined to think it is), why was it wrong to state it? He was naming the groups that were pro-war. No one minds his naming the British or the Administration. But to name "Jew" is un-Americaneven if it is done without hate or even criticism. Why?[144]

	Interventionists created pamphlets pointing out his efforts were praised in Nazi Germany and included quotations such as "Racial strength is vital; politics, a luxury". They included pictures of him and other America Firsters using the stiff-armed Bellamy salute (a hand gesture described by Francis Bellamy to accompany his Pledge of Allegiance to the American flag); the photos were taken from an angle not showing the flag, so to observers it was indistinguishable from the Hitler salute.[145]


Anne Lindbergh started freaking out and the Nazis celebrated and started putting his pictures on things


	Roosevelt disliked Lindbergh's outspoken opposition to his administration's interventionist policies, telling Treasury Secretary Henry Morgenthau, "If I should die tomorrow, I want you to know this, I am absolutely convinced Lindbergh is a Nazi."[146]


hmm


	Attitudes toward race and racism

	Lindbergh elucidated his beliefs regarding white race in a 1939 article in Reader's Digest:

	    We can have peace and security only so long as we band together to preserve that most priceless possession, our inheritance of European blood, only so long as we guard ourselves against attack by foreign armies and dilution by foreign races.[148]


Lindbergh wrote in "Reader's Digest" that "european blood" our most "prized posession" to be protected from "dilution by foreign races"


	Lindbergh's reaction to Kristallnacht was entrusted to his diary: "I do not understand these riots on the part of the Germans," he wrote. "It seems so contrary to their sense of order and intelligence. They have undoubtedly had a difficult 'Jewish problem', but why is it necessary to handle it so unreasonably?"[151] Lindbergh had planned to move to Berlin for the winter of 193839. He had provisionally found a house in Wannsee, but after Nazi friends discouraged him from leasing it because it had been formerly owned by Jews,[152] it was recommended that he contact Albert Speer, who said he would build the Lindberghs a house anywhere they wanted. On the advice of his close friend, Alexis Carrel, he cancelled the trip.[152]

	In his diaries, he wrote: "We must limit to a reasonable amount the Jewish influence ... Whenever the Jewish percentage of total population becomes too high, a reaction seems to invariably occur. It is too bad because a few Jews of the right type are, I believe, an asset to any country."


hmmm


sounds like he was a Nazi


	...Lindbergh developed a long-term friendship with the automobile pioneer Henry Ford, who was well known for his anti-Semitic newspaper The Dearborn Independent. In a famous comment about Lindbergh to Detroit's former FBI field office special agent in charge in July 1940, Ford said: "When Charles comes out here, we only talk about the Jews."[157][158]



here's a working theory so far


Lindbergh started off as normal guy

flew across ocean and became symbol of American patriotism

Neisctheite tyrants upset

fuck him up and get him involved in conspiracy theories

turn him into Nazi


	...Yet Berg also noted, "As late as April 1939after Germany overtook CzechoslovakiaLindbergh was willing to make excuses for Hitler. 'Much as I disapprove of many things Hitler had done,' he wrote in his diary on April 2, 1939



usually not a good way to start a sentence


apparently some weird things started happening to Lindbergh around the time his son was kidnapped--that's when he tried to hide, flee to Europe and lay low, ended up working for U.S. military on espionage-sounding things

guessing so far he was made out as a target? He became famous and symbol of American pride, I guess like the Buzz Aldrin of the 1920'-30's, apparently was willing to work for and advise the U.S. military, showed later signs of obsessive ire against communists bordering on perversion

seems to be a general pattern that when people oppose them they respond by brainwashing them into being fascists (see: Trump supporters, entire country of Germany)


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lindbergh_kidnapping
	At 7:30 p.m. on March 1, 1932,[10] family nurse Betty Gow put 20-month-old Charles "Egg" Lindbergh Jr. into his crib. Around 9:30 p.m. Charles Lindbergh was in the library just below the baby's room when he heard a noise that he imagined to be slats breaking off a full crate in the kitchen. At 10:00 p.m., Gow discovered that the child was not in the crib. The nurse also found that the baby was not with his mother, Anne Morrow Lindbergh, who had just left a bath. Gow then alerted Charles Lindbergh, who went immediately to the child's room, where he found a note in an envelope on the windowsill. It was a ransom note written by the kidnapper and contained bad grammar and handwriting. He then took a gun and went around the house and grounds with butler Olly Whateley.[11] They found impressions in the ground under the window of the child's room and pieces of a cleverly designed wooden ladder.[11] Whateley telephoned the Hopewell police department to inform them of the missing child.[11] Charles Lindbergh then contacted his attorney and friend, Henry Skillman Breckinridge, and the New Jersey state police.[11]

	Within 20 minutes, police were en route to the home.


nurse Gow put "Egg" Lindbergh in crib March 1, 1932, 7:30 PM, Lindbergh heard sound 9:30, Gow discovered not in crib 10:00, alerted Lindbergh, found ransom note. Took gun and investigated with Butler Wateley, found footprints and peives of ladder. Called police who were en route in 20 minutes.


	Hopewell Borough police and New Jersey State Police officers conducted an extensive search of the home and its surrounding area.

	After midnight, a fingerprint expert examined the ransom note and ladder; no usable fingerprints or footprints were found, leading experts to conclude that the kidnapper(s) wore gloves and had some type of cloth on the soles of their shoes.[12] No adult fingerprints were found in the baby's room, including in areas witnesses admitted to touching, such as the window, but the baby's fingerprints were found.

	The brief, handwritten ransom note was riddled with spelling mistakes and grammatical irregularities:

	    Dear Sir!
	    Have 50.000$ redy 25 000$ in
	    20$ bills 15000$ in 10$ bills and
	    10000$ in 5$ bills After 24 days
	    we will inform you were to deliver
	    the mony.

	    We warn you for making
	    anyding public or for notify the Police
	    The child is in gut care.
	    Indication for all letters are
	    Singnature [Symbol to right]
	    and 3 hohls.[13]

	At the bottom of the note were two interconnected blue circles surrounding a red circle, with a hole punched through the red circle and two more holes to the left and right.


couldn't find adult fingerprints even where witnesses said they touched for some reason. Ransom note written very poorly

I guess couldn't conclude it was an "educated person" based off the ransom note... 


	Prominence

	Word of the kidnapping spread quickly. Hundreds of people converged on the estate, destroying the footprint evidence.[14] Along with police, well-connected and well-intentioned people arrived at the Lindbergh estate. Military colonels offered their aid, although only one had law enforcement expertiseHerbert Norman Schwarzkopf, superintendent of the New Jersey State Police. The other colonels were Henry Skillman Breckinridge, a Wall Street lawyer; and William J. Donovan, a hero of the First World War who would later head the Office of Strategic Services (OSS). Lindbergh and these men speculated that the kidnapping was perpetrated by organized crime figures. They thought that the letter was written by someone who spoke German as his native language. At this time, Charles Lindbergh used his influence to control the direction of the investigation.[15]


word spread quickly, people came and destroyed footprint evidence of crime scene. famous people including William Donovan showed up to offer support. They and Lindberghe decided it was a German-speaker from organized crime.


	They contacted Mickey Rosner, a Broadway hanger-on rumored to know mobsters. Rosner, in turn, brought in two speakeasy owners: Salvatore "Salvy" Spitale and Irving Bitz. Lindbergh quickly endorsed the duo and appointed them his intermediaries to deal with the mob. Several organized crime figures  notably Al Capone, Willie Moretti, Joe Adonis, and Abner Zwillman  spoke from prison, offering to help return the baby in exchange for money or for legal favors. Specifically, Capone offered assistance in return for being released from prison under the pretense that his assistance would be more effective. This was quickly denied by the authorities.


Lindbergh was involved with investigation and got in contact with the mob. A bunch of mob figures offered support in exchange for favors, including Al Capone.


	The morning after the kidnapping, authorities notified President Herbert Hoover of the crime. At that time, kidnapping was classified as a local crime and the case did not seem to have any grounds for federal involvement. Attorney General William D. Mitchell met with Hoover and announced that the whole machinery of the Department of Justice would be set in motion to cooperate with the New Jersey authorities.[16]


this seems to be a theme with Lindbergh--every time he does something imrpessive, the whole government there to praise him. When he needs help, the whole government professes to come help him.


	The Bureau of Investigation (not yet called the FBI) was authorized to investigate the case, while the United States Coast Guard, the U.S. Customs Service, the U.S. Immigration Service and the Washington, D.C. police were told their services might be required. New Jersey officials announced a $25,000 reward for the safe return of "Little Lindy". The Lindbergh family offered an additional $50,000 reward of their own. At this time, the total reward of $75,000 was a tremendous sum of money, because the nation was in the midst of a Great Depression where few people had money and many people were out of work.


maybe this pattern doesn't help him in some ways--makes him look priviliged

this seems excessive, even for the "Buzz Aldrin of the 20's"


	During this time, Lindbergh flew to Round Hill Airport to investigate a lead suggesting that his son was on a boat off the Elizabeth Islands.[citation needed]

	On March 6, a new ransom letter arrived by mail at the Lindbergh home. The letter was postmarked March 4 in Brooklyn, and it carried the perforated red and blue marks. The ransom had been raised to $70,000. A third ransom note postmarked from Brooklyn, and also including the secret marks, arrived in Breckinridge's mail. The note told the Lindberghs that John Condon should be the intermediary between the Lindberghs and the kidnapper(s), and requested notification via newspaper that the third note had been received. Instructions specified the size of the box the money should come in, and warned the family not to contact the police.


wikipedia says Lindbergh flew around Elizabeth islands chasing leads

new ransom letter March 6th, raising ransom, postmarked March 4 Brooklyn. Third ransom letter to his attorney Breckinridge saying John Condon should be intermediary. 


Condon got involved in elaborate interaction with kidnappers involving talking to shady man hidden by shadows, making deals and sending the baby's suit

ended up giving Condon's contact "John" $50,000 for ransom payment


Body discovered May 12 by truck driver William Allen

officials suspected inside job and questioned houshold servant Violet Sharp, who gave contradictory testimony earlier. She committed suicide June 10, 1932. 

	
	In June 1932, officials began to suspect that the crime was an inside job that was perpetrated by someone the Lindberghs knew and trusted. Suspicions fell upon Violet Sharp, a British household servant at the Morrow home. She had given contradictory testimony regarding her whereabouts on the night of the kidnapping. It was reported that she appeared nervous and suspicious when questioned. She committed suicide on June 10, 1932,[26] by ingesting a silver polish that contained potassium cyanide just before what would have been her fourth time being questioned.[27][28] After her alibi was confirmed, it was later determined that the possible threat of losing her job and the intense questioning had driven her to kill herself. At the time, the police investigators were criticized for heavy-handed tactics.[29]


later her alibi was confirmed and intense questioning by police critized for heavy-handed tactics and threat of losing her job was cited as reason for her suicide

Condon was investigated by police after this, but Lindbergh stood by him

Condon fell under public suspicion but continued his "investigation" to find "John" in weird ways. His actions regarding the case were "increasingly flamboyant," called a "vaudeville act." Talked to press about it and apparently enjoyed fame.


later, police tracked the ransom bills, which lead them to Richard Hauptmann. 


	...Hauptmann was arrested, interrogated, and beaten at least once throughout the following day and night.[20] Hauptmann stated that the money and other items had been left with him by his friend and former business partner Isidor Fisch. Fisch had died on March 29, 1934, shortly after returning to Germany.[5] Hauptmann stated he learned only after Fisch's death that the shoe box that was left with him contained a considerable sum of money. He kept the money because he claimed that it was owed to him from a business deal that he and Fisch had made.[5] Hauptmann consistently denied any connection to the crime or knowledge that the money in his house was from the ransom.

	When the police searched Hauptman's home, they found a considerable amount of additional evidence that linked him to the crime. One item was a notebook that contained a sketch of the construction of a ladder similar to that which was found at the Lindbergh home in March 1932. John Condon's telephone number, along with his address, were discovered written down on a closet wall in the house. A key piece of evidence, a section of wood, was discovered in the attic of the home. After being examined by an expert, it was determined to be an exact match to the wood used in the construction of the ladder found at the scene of the crime.


Hauptmann denied involvement and said he got money from Isidor Fisch, but additional evidence was found in his home.


	...Hauptmann was charged with capital murder, which meant that a conviction could result in the death penalty. The trial was held at the Hunterdon County Courthouse in Flemington, New Jersey, and was soon dubbed the "Trial of the Century".[37] Reporters swarmed the town, and every hotel room was booked. Judge Thomas Whitaker Trenchard presided over the trial.

	...Hauptmann turned down a large offer from a Hearst newspaper for a confession and refused a last-minute offer to commute his execution to a life sentence in exchange for a confession. He was electrocuted on April 3, 1936, just over four years after the kidnapping.


Hauptmann was executed April 3, 1936



...


anything interesting in papers leading up to kidnapping?


https://www.newspapers.com/image/59871947/?terms=Charles%2BLindbergh

a lot rport on Anne Lindbergh giving radio talk on flood relief in China. Don't think that's anything interesting except that's what shows up a lot in newspaper search.


Feb 4 Central Jersey Home News report on Feb 4 1932 about Lindbergh being charming and popular on his birthday from AP:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/313927355/?terms=Charles%2BLindbergh


racist-sounding article from A. P. in Philidelphia Inquirer 22 Feb 1932 about Mr. and Mr.s Lindbergh raising awareness about flood in China:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/173761080/?terms=Charles%2BLindbergh

Lindbergh flew with two doctors to China to deliver medicine, Anne not there but spoke about it on radio

article a little off


a few random articles mentioning Charles Lindberg's birthday:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/355046144/?terms=Lindbergh


https://www.newspapers.com/image/380564965/?terms=Charles%2BLindbergh


no idea what to make of this except that it showed up in newspaper search, and I guess its a little odd to have an article on that (if you did that for every famous person's birthday every year you'd run out of printing space)


https://www.newspapers.com/image/299309758/?terms=Charles%2BLindbergh

weird article that mentions Lindbergh but doesn't really say anything, followed by a bunch of fruit cocktail recipes


https://www.newspapers.com/image/355046668/?terms=Lindbergh

another kindof pointless Lindbergh birthday article. Mentions Lindbergh's "orient voyage" cutrailed by "the untimely death of his father-in-law, Senator Dwight w. Morrow"


another article on Lindbergh's birthday that sounds a little resentful:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/333459000/?terms=Charles%2BLindbergh%2Bbeat%2Bhours


another birthday article but at least mentions interesting things like Lindbergh's flight to China and South America and having one son:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/5288826/?terms=Charles%2BLindbergh%2Bbeat%2Bhours



1931 Chinese flood was huge:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/1931_China_floods

~4 million peopled dead, 53 million affected

this was contemporary with the Mukden incident and an apparent shift in Okhrana operations in China

Lindbergh proved himself a force that could influence public opinion--if he ended up improving relations between U.S. and China, would that have made him a threat?

only reason guessing this is because this something that happened right before the kidnapping--could be anything


http://www.historynet.com/lindbergh-canada.htm

http://www.charleslindbergh.com/history/china.asp

they were flying around China looking for a new commercial air route, met some flood victims, met with Chaing Kai-Sheck who pinned another medal on Lindbergh, had to cancel early because of Anne's father's death then came back and told press about it, although history net calls it his "forgotton flight"


https://www.newspapers.com/image/355049454/?terms=Lindbergh

Feb 9 news of a "radical Republican" senator proposing minting silver coins with picture of Lindbergh on them


in the news in modern times:

http://nymag.com/daily/intelligencer/2016/11/charles-lindbergh-is-a-cautionary-tale-for-republicans.html
	"Charles Lindbergh Is a Cautionary Tale for Republicans - NYMag"

	Trumps Appeasers

	Charles Lindbergh was a national hero, then a fascist sympathizer. History will be just as brutal to more than a few current Republican leaders.
	By Frank Rich



NY TImes Jan 2 1931:

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1931/01/02/96378588.html?pageNumber=13
	ISLAND FOR THE LINDBERGHS
	Purchase Is Near Summer Home of Senator Morrow in Maine.


NY TImes Feb 3 1931

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1931/02/03/102210065.html?pageNumber=19
	LINDBERGH HOME DESIGNED.
	Colonel Denies Report of Delay in Plans Because of Well Operations.


NY Times Feb 5 1931:

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1931/02/05/102210699.html?pageNumber=6
	LINDBERGH BIRTHDAY QUIET
	Colonel, 29, Spends Part of Day Here and Dines at Morrow Home.


this and previous article short and pointless sounding

there were a few more short pointless articles mentioning Lindberghs before this one


NY TImes Jan 3 1931:

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1931/01/03/102204562.html?pageNumber=5
	Lindberghs Deny Buying Island.

	...Cololen Lindbergh said that he and Mr.s Lindbergh had been in Maine on the Summer estate of Mr. and Mr.s Dwight W. Morrow and it was possible that this was the cause of the report.


Feb 18 1931 rambling NY Times article saying vote had been cast to have Lindbergh go to "Pan American goodwill program" in South America and they hope his wife could come too:

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1931/02/19/98322894.html?pageNumber=2



^ searched wrong date range, kidnapping March 1 1932, not 1931

suggests small pointless articles on Lindbergh were apparently a normal occurance for at least a year before the kidnapping



weird, rambling and slightly creepy letter to editor of Miami News mentioning Sen Morrow's death, the Lindbergh baby, American indifference to the Japanese invasion of Manchuria:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/299322787/?terms=lindbergh


signed "Will Rogers"


Feb 24 1932 article in Miami news pg 4 aoubt Charles Levine, saying he tried to fly like Lindbergh but had the wrong equipment but ended up in the hospital:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/299331320/?terms=lindbergh


Jan 10, 1932 NY Times:


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1932/01/10/100683793.html?pageNumber=166
	TEN MEN WHO STAND AS SYMBOLS
	In Each Is Something Fundamental Which Appeals to Our Imagination
	THERE are certain individuals whose personalities have caught the imagination of mankind. They are not, of necessity, the most important persons nor the people whose names will lire longest in history. But, for the moment, they may be described as the supermen of publicity. 


the ten men are: Prince of Wales, Mussolini, Stalin, The Pope, Ford, Gandhi, Lindbergh, Einstein, Chaplin, Shaw



Feb 11 1932 NY Times:


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1932/02/11/105778419.html?pageNumber=44

says Anne Lindbergh expected to appear on radio about Chinese Flood relief and "tell of the desolation there"

	...Religious groups and benevolent organizations are calling this broadcast to the attention of listeners in their communities in an effort to awaken public interest in the plight of millions left homeless and starving by the flood.


but religious groups and benevolent organizations are NY Times least favorite thing!


Feb 21 1932 article saying aviators went to China to fight Japanese, but were dissapointed:

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1932/02/21/105784203.html?pageNumber=63


Feb 22 1932 NY Times prints Anne Lindburgh's radio address:

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1932/02/22/105784913.html?pageNumber=18

sounds like she wanted to call for more aid to China


Feb 23, 1932:

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1932/02/23/105785481.html?pageNumber=19

pointless short article about Lindberghs transport license expiring soon


...


the "Will Rogers" letter is the weirdest one

don't know what to make of these except the China aid thing was the biggest thing in the news related to him leading up to the kidnapping and that some newspapers liked to print short and pointless articles mentioning him, including that he was doing nothing on his birthday (?)

also learned NY Times considered him a "superman of publicity" alongside Stalin and Gandhi

among the short and pointless articles mentioning him, allusions to the Sino-Japanese conflict stand out. Mentioned in the "Will Rogers" letter and the NY Times article about dissapoitned airmen travelling to China which naturally brings the mind to Lindbergh who flew there and met Chain-Kai shek.

Did Lindbergh have hopes of getting involved in the Sino-Japanese conflict? worth checking

to indulge in speculation further, if Lindbergh saw weird articles written about him, especially after his son's murder, that might have fueled conspiracy theories by him about Jews in the press and so on (I think something similar happened in Germany were people were frantic about Jewish conspiracies in the press and called them "lying press")


this says Lindbergh's visit to China garnered worldwide attention and migth have warmed relations between the U.S. and China:

https://books.google.com/books?id=uVpziLD6u5IC&pg=PA83&lpg=PA83&dq=Charles+Lindbergh+Chiang+Kai-Shek&source=bl&ots=2RBp1oXgr8&sig=_m7ruS0nOiIPb9Q5EIOGEkzz4Fg&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjMxOXWp47aAhXH6oMKHQDsD40Q6AEIdDAN#v=onepage&q=Charles%20Lindbergh%20Chiang%20Kai-Shek&f=false
	...The First Family's public image soon became more controlled. A major public relations coup focused on Charles Lindbergh and his wife Anne and their goodwill visit to Nanking in 1931. The trans-Atlantic pioneer on an extensive air trip around the world stopped in China, had tea with the Chiangs, and in a private ceremony received the first Chinese medal awarded for distinguished service in aviation.

	The Lindberghs offered their services to aid victims of the devestating Yangtze floods to the north--the worst in decades left millions homeless. Lindbergh volunteered to deliver by air vital medical supplies. His seaplane landed in flooded rice fields. This attempt to bring medical packets to the desparate Chinese attraced hundreds of sampans that quickly jammed around the plane and put it in harm's way. The crowds doomed further landings along the river. His caring gesture, nevertheless, made him a hero among the Chinese and garnered worldwide headlines for both the Lindberghs and the Chiangs on measure sto relieve the suffering of the Chinese people. Sever days later the Lindberghs' air expedition met serious trouble. A mooring mishap in the Yangtze flipped their craft onto its back, nearly drowning the couple. Wing damage ended the goodwill journey and its land survey flights, and both the plane and its celebrated pilot and navigator-wife headed back to America aboard ship.



more on Lindbergh's mind:


https://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/worldnews/asia/japan/1495651/American-troops-murdered-Japanese-PoWs.html
	American troops 'murdered Japanese PoWs'

	...He said: "We have this stereotypical idea that the Japanese were all cruel and robotic while the Allied forces were tough but fair in their treatment of the enemy.

	"But I was very surprised by much of what I found and had to rethink all those stereotypes."

	Prof Aldrich found several examples confirming what became an American policy in some parts of the Pacific theatre not to take prisoners of war.

	He quotes the diaries of Charles Lindbergh, the American aviation pioneer, who toured the Far East visiting United States units. On one occasion he commented to a group of senior officers that very few Japanese seemed to be taken prisoner.

	"Oh, we could take more if we wanted to," one of the officers replied. "But our boys don't like to take prisoners.

	"It doesn't encourage the rest to surrender when they hear of their buddies being marched out on the flying field and machine-guns turned loose on them."

	Although Lindbergh was sympathetic to the Nazis and was suspected of deliberately portraying his fellow countrymen in a very negative light, his allegations are supported by other American diarists, who report that the US marines, in particular, did not take many prisoners. Prof Aldrich also discovered new diaries showing that American generals worried about the abuse of human remains by their troops.



https://archive.nytimes.com/www.nytimes.com/books/98/09/27/specials/lindbergh-lost.html
Lindbergh Says U.S. 'Lost ' World War II
	By ALDEN WHITMAN

	Charles A. Lindbergh, who was one of America's leading opponents of entry into World War II, still believes that he was right in urging the country to stay out of the conflict. Indeed, he contends that the United States, in the perspective of the last 30 years, lost the war.

	This conviction is disclosed in "The Wartime Journals of Charles A. Lindbergh" to be published Sept 30 by Harcourt Brace Jovanovich.

	The 1,000-page book, which tells for the first time the flier's innermost thoughts about the war, also reveals in diary form his intensive public and behind-the-scenes activities aimed at keeping the nation out of the war. These include his assessment of the Nazi military-aviation potential as communicated to senior American military men and his controversial association with the America First Committee.

	The 400,000-word journal also recounts Mr. Lindbergh's role in the early years of the war in the Ford Motor Company's reproduction of B-24 bombers and his subsequent 50 combat missions as a civilian flier in the Pacific.

	The book also describes his postwar inspection tour of Germany. Recounting his prewar activities, the book repeatedly makes clear his belief that the Roosevelt Administration, pro-British elements and the Jews were trying to push the United States into the war. And it provides intimate glimpses of Mr. Lindbergh's private life.

	Meditating on the war in a letter to William Jovanovich, his publisher, which is printed in the introduction to the book, Mr. Lindbergh writes.

	"Your ask what my conclusions are, rereading my journals and looking back on World War II from the vantage point of quarter century in time? We won the war in a military sense; but in a broader sense it seems to me we lost it, for our Western civilization is less respected and secure than it was before.

	"In order to defeat Germany and Japan we supported the still greater menaces of Russia and China - which now confront us in a nuclear weapon era. The British empire has broken down with great suffering, bloodshed and confusion. France has had to give up her major colonies and turn to a mild dictatorship herself."

	"Much of our Western culture was destroyed. We lost the genetic heredity formed through eons of many million lives. Meanwhile, the Soviets have dropped their Iron Curtain to screen off Eastern Europe, and an antagonistic Chinese Government threatens us in Asia. 

	 "More than a generation after the war's end, our occupying armies still must occupy, and the world has not been made safe for democracy and freedom. On the contrary, our own system democratic government is being challenged by that greatest of dangers to any government - internal coordinating and unrest.

	"It is alarmingly possible that World War II marks the beginning of our Western civilization's breakdown..." 


wtf happened to him


	... He feared that "if England and Germany enter another major war on opposite sides, Western civilization may fall as a result." he believed, however, that Germany's expansion eastward toward the Soviet Union would not present so great a peril.

	As for the United States, he wrote, that "we are not prepared for a foreign war" and "it seems improbable that we could win a war in Europe" if the nation had to land and maintain troops against German opposition. He also believed that "Japan is in a position to cause trouble in the Pacific" if all America's efforts were in Europe.

	Prior to April, 1941, his journal now discloses, Mr Lindbergh was exceedingly active behind the scenes in generating antiwar sentiment. The flier worked intimately with Robert R. McCormick, the publisher of the Chicago Tribune; Robert Wood, board Chairman of Sears, Roebuck; former president Herbert Hoover, Henry Ford, Senator Harry F. Byrd of Virginia, Handford MacNider of the American Legion, Senator Burton K. wheeler of Montana and John T. Flynn, the economist.

	At the same time , the journal relates, Mr Lindbergh then a colonel in the Army Air Corps, was an off stage advocate of increased American airplane production. And he also sought to impress such military men as Gen H. H. (Hap) Arnold of the Air Corps with Germany to assess the situation for himself.

	As Mr. Lindbergh saw it in his journal, the bulk of the American people were against entering the war; but they were being pushed toward it by President Franklin D. Roosevelt and his Administration. the flier met Mr. Roosevelt, who was later to excoriate him as a "Copperhead," for the first and only time in April, 1939. Mr Lindbergh's initial impression was this:

	"He is an accomplished suave, interesting conversationalist. I liked him and felt I could get along with him. Acquaintanceship would be pleasant and interesting."

	On reflection, however, he wrote;

	"But there is something about him I did not trust, something a little too suave, to pleasant, too easy..."

	As time passed, Mr Lindbergh, the diaries show, became implacably convinced that the President, described in one entry as "dramatic and demagogic," was driving the country toward war "as rapidly as he can."

	In addition to the Roosevelt Administration, Mr Lindbergh wrote, the chief prowar forces were pro-British elements and the Jews. As early as June 1939, he voiced his concern in a conversation in Washington with Vice-President John Garner.

	"We are both anxcious to avoid this country being pushed into a European war by British and Jewish propaganda," he wrote. "I can understand the feeling of both the British and the Jews, but there is far too much at stake for us to rush into a European war without the most careful cool consideration."

	Several other diary entries underline Mr. Lindbergh's belief that the Jews were behind a great deal of the pro-war propaganda in the United States.

	These beliefs were expressed publicly in a speech Mr. Lindbergh made Sept. 11 1941 at an America First rally at Des Moines, Iowa.

	"It is not difficult to understand why Jewish people desire the overthrow of Nazi Germany." he said then "the persecution they suffered in Germany would be sufficient to make bitter enemies of any race. No person with a sense of the dignity of mankind can condone the persecution of the Jewish race suffered in Germany. but no person of honesty and vision can look on their prowar policy here today without seeing the dangers involved in such a policy, both for us and for them." 


after the death of his kid he became very politically active and a conspiracy theorist. Was he like that in any way before?


	... During his Pacific tour Mr Lindbergh repeatedly recorded his shock over American treatment of Japanese soldiers. In an entry for June 28, 1944 he wrote:

	"I am shocked at the attitude of our American troops. They have no respect for death, the courage of an enemy soldier or many of the ordinary decencies of life. They think nothing whatever of robbing the body of a dead Jap and call him a "son of a bitch" while they do so.

	"I said during a discussion with American officers that regardless of what the japs did I did not see how we could gain anything or claim that we represented a civilized state if we killed them by torture."

	This was a theme to which Mr.Lindbergh returned several times, as he recorded instances of shooting of Japanese taken as war prisoners or the torture of them.

	And when he traveled in Germany shortly after the Nazi surrender in May 1945, he wrote in his journal. "What the German has done to the Jew in Europe, we are doing to the Jap in the Pacific."

	The journal was originally written in 3-by-5-inch leatherbound books, and Mr. Lindbergh accumulated 650,000 words by the time he stopped. A total of 400,000 of these is included in this book. 


https://www.salon.com/2015/01/02/fdr_outsmarts_them_all_henry_ford_joseph_kennedy_charles_lindbergh_and_the_american_entrance_into_world_war_ii/
	Lindbergh, as ever, remained pessimistic about the future of America. I see chaotic conditions aheadunrest, depressions, labor troubles, violenceeven if we escape the war, he told his diary, and he disliked the superficiality, the cheapness, the lack of understanding of, or interest in, fundamental problems. He considered moving to Oregon to remove himself and his family from the danger of civil unrest.


Lindbergh ended up doomsayer/prepper type?


	...Ford was anti-Semitic. In his newspaper, the Dearborn Independentwhich, being sold nationwide through Ford dealerships, enjoyed a circulation of 700,000Ford published anti-Semitic tracts, often under his own name. He published the notorious Russian tsarist forgery The Protocols of the Elders of Zion, postulating a Jewish conspiracy to dominate the world. When challenged over the authenticity of the Protocols, Ford stood firm, saying, They have fit the world situation up to this time. They fit it now.

	Fords anti-Semitism was well known. Hitler cited Ford as a major influence in Mein Kampf, published in 1925, and kept a full-sized portrait of the carmaker by his desk in the Chancellery in Berlin. Like Lindbergh, Ford had been awarded the Grand Cross of the German Eagle, in July 1938. In Germany, extracts from the Dearborn Independent were compiled into a best-selling book, The International Jew, the Worlds Foremost Problem. Ford, a lapsed Episcopalian, had no religion, yet he was a pacifist and had opposed Americas entry into World War One, just as he now opposed American entry into the current European war.

	Lindbergh got on famously with Ford from the moment they met in 1927, exchanging views on everything from the war to labor relations. Ford is a great man and a constructive influence in this country, Lindbergh told his diary. One cannot talk to him without gaining new ideas and receiving much mental stimulation.


Ford a bad influence?


the infamous speech that was beginning of end for Lindbergh:

http://www.charleslindbergh.com/americanfirst/speech.asp

starts off saying on verge of war and there is propaganda pushing for this


	... What we said before the elections, we say [illegible] and again, and again today. And we will not tell you tomorrow that it was just campaign oratory. Have you ever heard an interventionist, or a British agent, or a member of the administration in Washington ask you to go back and study a record of what they have said since the war started? Are their self-styled defenders of democracy willing to put the issue of war to a vote of our people? Do you find these crusaders for foreign freedom of speech, or the removal of censorship here in our own country?


pins at first on "British agents" and members of FDR's administration

	
	...National polls showed that when England and France declared war on Germany, in 1939, less than 10 percent of our population favored a similar course for America. But there were various groups of people, here and abroad, whose interests and beliefs necessitated the involvement of the United States in the war. I shall point out some of these groups tonight, and outline their methods of procedure. In doing this, I must speak with the utmost frankness, for in order to counteract their efforts, we must know exactly who they are.

	The three most important groups who have been pressing this country toward war are the British, the Jewish and the Roosevelt administration.


says he has to speak with "frankness" that three most important groups in U.S. pushing for war are British, Jewish and FDR's admin

today we know more or less all of FDR's admin were communists or misanthropic spies

where did he get the idea about "British" and "Jewish"?


	 Behind these groups, but of lesser importance, are a number of capitalists, Anglophiles, and intellectuals who believe that the future of mankind depends upon the domination of the British empire. Add to these the Communistic groups who were opposed to intervention until a few weeks ago, and I believe I have named the major war agitators in this country.


goes on to say some responsible where people who want "domination of British empire" and Communists who were changing their mind

sounds like he was watching propaganda and trying to make theories about it


he goes on to speculate on motive of these groups

says British want help against Germany and this is "perfectly understandable", but says England can use U.S. for waging war and paying for cost


	... England has devoted, and will continue to devote every effort to get us into the war. We know that she spent huge sums of money in this country during the last war in order to involve us. Englishmen have written books about the cleverness of its use.


where did he get this idea?

goes on to say Jewish want overthrow of Nazi Germany and this is "not difficult to understand", but that "their" pro-war policy has dangers "for both us and for them"


	... Tolerance is a virtue that depends upon peace and strength. History shows that it cannot survive war and devastations. A few far-sighted Jewish people realize this and stand opposed to intervention. But the majority still do not.


who is he referring to?


	Their greatest danger to this country lies in their large ownership and influence in our motion pictures, our press, our radio and our government.

	I am not attacking either the Jewish or the British people. Both races, I admire. But I am saying that the leaders of both the British and the Jewish races, for reasons which are as understandable from their viewpoint as they are inadvisable from ours, for reasons which are not American, wish to involve us in the war.


inserts a line "by the way jews own hollywood and press"

comes off sensitive to charges of racism he would get from this speech, but seems to see races as having "leaders"

goes on to say Roosvelt admin using the war for a power grab, to get a 3rd term, add to debt, and "justify the restriction of congressional power, and the assumption of dictoral procedures on the part of the president and his appointees."


	...In selecting these three groups as the major agitators for war, I have included only those whose support is essential to the war party. If any one of these groups--the British, the Jewish, or the administration--stops agitating for war, I believe there will be little danger of our involvement.

	I do not believe that any two of them are powerful enough to carry this country to war without the support of the third. And to these three, as I have said, all other war groups are of secondary importance.


he says he sees these three groups as essential to the pro-war propaganda in U.S.

goes on to describe what he sees as U.S. population being against involvement in war them a propaganda effort to change their minds


	... We have become involved in the war from practically every standpoint except actual shooting. Only the creation of sufficient "incidents" yet remains; and you see the first of these already taking place, according to plan [ill.]-- a plan that was never laid before the American people for their approval. 


speculates that an incident will be created to get U.S. involved in war (which was right? pearl harbor kindof like that)

this is important info on how Lindbergh thinks

wonder if he thought Mukden incident was one of these? would be good to get a sense of when he became a conspiracy theorist, what he thought, who helped shape his ideas and how

if a conspiracy theorist with the public's trust got things right it would be a problem for conspiratorial organizations (consider Elizabeth Bentley)

this is one (speculative) motive for why press and other people were messing with him and maybe trying to influence him

could have been that he was just charming, popular, pro-American but not under influence of people who would have liked that and that angered them

could also be they just liked messing with him


	...We are on the verge of war, but it is not yet too late to stay out. It is not too late to show that no amount of money, or propaganda, or patronage can force a free and independent people into war against its will. It is not yet too late to retrieve and to maintain the independent American destiny that our forefathers established in this new world.

	The entire future rests upon our shoulders. It depends upon our action, our courage, and our intelligence. If you oppose our intervention in the war, now is the time to make your voice heard.

	Help us to organize these meetings; and write to your representatives in Washington. I tell you that the last stronghold of democracy and representative government in this country is in our house of representatives and our senate.

	There, we can still make our will known. And if we, the American people, do that, independence and freedom will continue to live among us, and there will be no foreign war. 



here's an article that sounds like its ominously addressing Micheal Jordan (?) saying "what happened to Lindbergh could happen to you":

http://articles.chicagotribune.com/1993-08-20/news/9308200349_1_lindbergh-case-charlie-lindbergh-kidnapping
	Michael Jordan may not want to captain this kind of team. He may not support gun control; he may blame his father's death on the two thugs who pulled him from his shiny red car, and not on the gun that shot him once through the chest. He may not be comfortable with the idea of himself as a political leader pursuing goals in a different court. He may not want to move any further into the public arena, making his family and himself even greater targets.

	But Michael Jordan should think long and hard about what can happen to a hero after tragedy strikes. After his son's murder, Charles Lindbergh was disgusted by the press's disregard for fact and feelings, and he was disillusioned by a public whose morbid curiosity made the site of his tragedy a tourist destination. Disenchanted, he lost faith in his vision of America. When his isolationist politics led to his denunciation as a Nazi sympathizer and possible German spy, Lindbergh simply withdrew from public life, permanently.


says got disgusted at press and dissillusioned at public after his son's death



https://pioneersofflight.si.edu/content/lindberghs%E2%80%99-1931-survey-flight
	The Lindberghs 1931 Survey Flight

	In 1931 and 1933, Charles and Anne Morrow Lindbergh embarked on two lengthy trips over vast expanses of water and uncharted, unpopulated territory, exploring possible overseas airline routes during the pioneering days of international air travel. The remote flights also offered some relief from the endless public scrutiny that had followed Charles Lindbergh since 1927.

	Charles Lindbergh described their 1931 trip as a vacation flight with no start or finish, no diplomatic or commercial significance, and no records to be sought.



Lindbergh described his asia trip as a "vacation trip" with "no diplomatic significance"


------


local Hopewell news where Lindbergh lived at time of kidnapping, Hopewell Herald:


https://www.newspapers.com/image/67164895/?terms=Lindbergh


Lindbergh wrote in Time and Reader's Digest and was made Time person of the year in 1928



books on case:

https://www.amazon.com/Sixteenth-Rail-Scientist-Lindbergh-Kidnapping/product-reviews/155591716X/ref=cm_cr_dp_d_show_all_btm?ie=UTF8&reviewerType=all_reviews

this one got good reviews, said written well, about scientist Arthur Koehler said to be important to case




https://www.amazon.com/Crime-Century-Lindbergh-Kidnapping-Hoax/dp/0828319715/ref=pd_sim_14_5?_encoding=UTF8&pd_rd_i=0828319715&pd_rd_r=K71JVR8FX4D21BJ0K9MQ&pd_rd_w=ntKva&pd_rd_wg=Bq1ha&psc=1&refRID=K71JVR8FX4D21BJ0K9MQ
	After it was announced that the twenty month-old son of Charles and Anne Lindbergh was abducted, the entire world grieved for their loss. Seventytwo days later, the body was found in the woods next to a roadway, a short distance from Lindberghs house. In 1927, Lindbergh was the first to fly the Atlantic. By 1932, he was perhaps the most famous man alive. A great hero, he was allowed to be the chief architect of the investiga-tion into his sons kidnapping. In this capacity, the first thing he did was to have the body cremated without an autopsy. Was this done on purpose? Or, was it done for emotional reasons? The authors, Gregory Ahlgren and Stephen Monier delve into the story like no other investigator has done in the annals of this famous-infamous kidnapping.


https://www.amazon.com/Case-That-Never-Dies-Kidnapping/dp/0813533856
	The Case That Never Dies places the Lindbergh kidnapping, investigation, and trial in the context of the Depression, when many feared the country was on the edge of anarchy. Gardner delves deeply into the aspects of the case that remain confusing to this day, including Lindberghs dealings with crime baron Owney Madden, Al Capones New York counterpart, as well as the inexplicable exploits of John Condon, a retired schoolteacher who became the prosecutions best witness. The initial investigation was hampered by Colonel Lindbergh, who insisted that the police not attempt to find the perpetrator because he feared the investigation would endanger his sons life. He relented only when the child was found dead.


some books suggest Lindbergh did it


a few others pointing to evidence against Hauptmann being weak


hard not to compare this to Leopold Loeb case, the last "Crime of the Century" 8 years earlier


same type where kidnappers demand ransom only for the kidnapped to be dead

Lindenbergh case is an inversion of the Leopold Loeb case in some ways--instead of important evidence of ransom note that "must have been written by an educated man" with a mastery of english, the ransom note was written like it was from someone who didn't know English. And instead of the killer being caught and spared the death penalty, apparently the wrong person was caught and given the death penalty. Interesting that both cases involve arguments against the death penalty and raise questions about justice.


Alan Dershowitz pointed out relation to death penalty: https://books.google.com/books?id=XNSFdQ61SBMC&pg=PR8-IA2&lpg=PR8-IA2&dq=Lindbergh+Leopold+Loeb+%22death+penalty%22&source=bl&ots=tpE5gy8tls&sig=U7d4If28HQb3obvUi-hrC2pZhug&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwj-6uer04_aAhVJ3IMKHaSHBoE4ChDoAQg-MAQ#v=onepage&q=Lindbergh%20Leopold%20Loeb%20%22death%20penalty%22&f=false 



In Andrea D. Lyon's telling:

https://books.google.com/books?id=haqDBQAAQBAJ&pg=PA53&lpg=PA53&dq=Lindbergh+Leopold+Loeb+%22death+penalty%22&source=bl&ots=DpVqumjkGq&sig=CpyPn6aIpbcpYfLOyHpIBvxstlg&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwirtM7u04_aAhVj5IMKHZ8TAso4FBDoAQhDMAU#v=onepage&q=Lindbergh%20Leopold%20Loeb%20%22death%20penalty%22&f=false
	The Death Penalty: What's Keeping It Alive

	...Widely considered the first high-profile death penalty case of the mass media era, the 1924 Leopold and Loeb murder trial captured the collective attention of an America firmly in the grip of the glamour and excess of the roaring twenties. Leopold and Loeb were young, wealthy, and prodigiously intelligent; they eliebeved themselves to be intellectual "supermen" capable fo crafting the perfect undetectable crime; and thier victim was the son of an influential Chicago millionaire. During both the investigation and the ensuing trial, the media fed the public's appetite for details of the unusual crime. And when Leopold and Loeb's attorney, Carence Darrow, delivered a rousing twelve-hour closing argument that passionately attacked the death penalty and ultimately spared his clients' lives, it was reported verbatim in newspapers nationwide. Due to the media's heavy coverage of the Leopold and Loeb trial, Darrow's words were immortalized by the press and remain influential to anti-death penalty advocates to this day.

	Less than ten years later, America was in the midst of the Great Depression. While the government responded to the Depression by adopting nationalist economic policies, jobless AMericans responded with bitter xenophobia. So in 1932 when a German immigrant, "Bruno" Richard Hauptmann, was accused of kidnapping and murdering famed aviator Charles Lindbergh's baby, the media covered the proceedings incessantly. The press dubbed the murder "the Crime of the Century" and portrayed Hauptmann as a foreign outsider. In the light cast by the media, he was no mere criminal suspect, he was a non-American agressor; his crime affected more than just Lindbergh and his family, it affected the entire country. Unsurprisingly, given the media coverage and the social climate at the time, Hauptmann was convicted and executed, though historians continue to debate his actual guilt.



John Lardner on how Lindbergh became a celebrity:


https://www.thedailybeast.com/the-stacks-how-charles-lindbergh-became-the-first-crackpot-celebrity
	...Who better to parse through the myth with a clear, unbiased eye than John Lardner, who weighed in on The Lindbergh Legends with this long profile in 1949. Originally published in The Aspirin Age and featured here with permission, please enjoy Lardner's classic account of one of the Jazz Age's superstars.

	Alex Belth


	In May 1927, a slim, comely man of 25 years flew an airplane from New York to Paris all by himself, without stopping. His performance was instantly recognized as the climactic stunt of a time of marvelous stunts, of an epoch of noise, hero worship, and the sort of individualism which seems to have meant that people were not disposed to look at themselves and their lives, in general, and therefore ran gaping and thirsty to look at anything done by one man or woman that was special and apart from the life they knew. The farther the hero wentwhether he went upward, downward, sideways, through air, land, or water, or hand over hand on a flagpolethe better, provided he went alone.


sees Lindbergh as a product of individualism and hero-worship


but hero-worship is what these guys are all about--cult of personality around Stalin, Mao, now Trump. It is a way to inlfuence people, and they are in the business of influence people who can influence people

another theory on motive: did Lindbergh beat one of their guys to the prize?


https://www.newspapers.com/image/299320832/?terms=Lindbergh%2Bbeat%2Bhours
	Along about this time, Sir Francis Drake appears upon the scene. He is supposed to have made the first record run from the New World to Europe when he left the capes of Florida and picked up the British Isles in 23 days. Lindbergh beat him only by hours.


https://www.wsj.com/articles/SB10001424053111904480904576498061491234304
	Charles Lindbergh Won the Prize, but Did His Rival Get There First?

	A Countryman Tries to Unravel the Unsolved Mystery of Charles Nungesser's Last Flight

	...But his biplanecalled L'Oiseau Blanc, or White Birdnever arrived in New York, and for decades it was assumed that it had crashed in an Atlantic storm.

	Eighty-four years later, Bernard Decr, a French aviation enthusiast, is on his own questto rewrite history. He has come to a different conclusion: The Oiseau Blanc probably flew over Newfoundland, before crash-landing off the coast of Canada.



https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Charles_Nungesser#Early_life
	Over the years, there have been various investigations to try to determine what happened to Nungesser and Coli. Most believe that the plane came down in the Atlantic due to a rain squall, but the aircraft has never been recovered. The leading alternate theory is that the aircraft may have crashed in Maine.[2]

	A report that Nungesser & Coli arrived safely was followed by a detailed description of the festivities, etc., but all this was a hoax. The anti-American sentiment it generated led to Lindbergh being advised to delay his own flight a few weeks, until the furor and resentment had died down.


press interested in spinning it?

not sure if he was one of theirs or not


if NY times back then revealed their disposition toward him hard to read so far:


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1936/02/20/87913152.html?pageNumber=7
	Note Signed 'Coli' Found In Bottle Inside a Fish


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1933/03/26/99300112.html?pageNumber=3
	THINKS NUNGESSER FOUND
	Paper Tells of Reports Bodies of Him and Coli Were Discovered.

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1945/02/08/121619670.html?pageNumber=8
	Nungessner's Mother Killed

	PARIS, Feb. 7 (U.P.) Mrs. Louise Nungesser, 70 years old mother of the French ace of World War I, Capt Charles Nungesser; her maid and a friend, Eugene Lessire, were found dead in her gas-filled apartment today. Mrs. Nungesser refused for many years to believe that her son and Capt. Francois Coli were lost in their attempt to fly the Atlantic 1927.



seems to like intrigues about his death, at least in blurbs


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1927/04/20/101687962.html?pageNumber=1
	Nungesser Plans to Start Sunday On Flight From Paris to New York
	PARIS, April 19.  At 4 o'clock Sunday morning, if the wind is right, Captain Charles Nungesser, one of the greatest French aces of the war, will take off from Le Bourget Airdrome for New York for the Orteig Prize. 

	...He will make a third trial flight with a load of 4,000 kilograms (8,8000 pounds), but he expects this to be antirely successful after today's showing made by the sturdy plane with its 450 horsepower motor.

	During the preparation of the plane for the flight Camptain Nunguess had a grisly embalm painted on the fuselage--a coffin, skull and cross bones, with candles rampant.

	His comrades say that the ace, hal of whose limbs are articifial as a result of the wounds incurred during the war, where often he was carried to his machine, is just as willing to lose his life in an attempt to reach New York as not.


could be more positive


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1927/05/07/104218937.pdf

same with this longer one

before that had

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1927/04/28/118507448.html
	NUNGESSER AND COLI WARY OF TAKING-OFF
	Warned by the Davis-Wooster Tragedy, They Await Perfect Conditions for Atlantic Hop. TAKE PHYSICAL TRAINING Two Aviators Are Putting Themselves in Shape to Stand the Strain  Both Are Athletes.
	PARIS, April 27.  Captain Charles M. Nungesser and Captain Francois Coli have decided to proceed very slowly and carefully with the final preparations for their flight to New York. Friends have urged them to profit, if possible, by the accidents which have befallen American aspirants, culminating with the tragic death of Lieut. Commander Noel Davis and Lieutenant Stanton H. Wooster. 


press reporting in NY times before Nungesser's flight was more like emphasizing the danger of the trip


NY Times for Lindbergh flight:

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1927/04/30/101502702.html?pageNumber=21
	Lindbergh Plane Near Disaster.


says testing to prepare for Paris flight, almost crashed into another plane, flight sponorsed by "a group of wealthy St. Louis men."



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1927/05/10/96647448.html?pageNumber=4
	FEARS SLEET HIT NUNGESSER.
	Capt. Lindbergh Will Leave San Diego Today for His Flight.


mostly quotes by Lindbergh saying Nungesser and Coli might have hit sleet, he was downed by that before, regret they didn't make it and best wishes to whoever does

seems positive on Lindbergh


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1927/05/12/106922936.html?pageNumber=2
	1,550-MILE FLIGHT MADE BY LINDBERGH
	He Reaches St. Louis, Setting a Non-Stop Distance Record for One Pilot. FLIES ALL WAY BY COMPASS His Time From San Diego Is 14 Hours 5 Minutes  Coming Here Today.
	ST. LOUIS, May 11.  Aspirant to the glory of flying from New York to Paris, Captain Charles A. Lindbergh, St. Louis air mail pilot, reached here today at 8 A.M. in his monoplane, "Spirit of St. Louis," 14 hours 5 minutes after his start from San Diego, Cal., yesterday at 5:55 P.M. 


positive on Lindbergh, emphasizing his success and building him up I guess

	..."I am very sorry that Nungesser and Coli seem to have failed in their brave attempt to cross the Atlantic in the wrong direction," said Captain Lindbergh. "I hope they will be picked up. But their experience, whatever it proves to be, will not affect my plans."

	While here he is the guest of Harry H. Knight and others of the group that is backing his projected transatlantic flight with a fund of nearly $25,000.

	A gold ring, with flying insignia, a small horseshoe and a rabbit's foot were presented to Captain Lindbergh at the flying field, after he announced his decision not to wait for a dinner planned in his honor for tomorrow night.

	...His flight from St. Louis to New York will be another unusual long distance hop, and he is looked upon by some aviators as a dark horse of great possibilities in the coming transatlantic contest.



https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1927/05/13/117990713.html?pageNumber=3
	LINDBERGH'S RECORD.
	Escaped Death Twice While on Duty With Mail Plane.

says Lindbergh has "excellent" record and escaped death before


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1927/05/15/96648600.pdf

something on Lindbergh's mother, saying she's proud, tries to help but not bothering him, says something vaguely racist about her and him coming from an "undemonstrative nordic race"

https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1927/05/21/118881206.html?pageNumber=2
	MOTHER OF FLIER SURE HE WILL WIN
	Mrs. Lindbergh Teaches School as Usual in Detroit as Son Soars Away. HAD NO MESSAGE FROM HIM She Told Him on New York Visit Not to Distract His Mind With Word to Her.
	DETROIT, May 20.  While Captain Charles A. Lindbergh was soaring out over the Atlantic today, his mother, Mrs. Evangeline Lodge Lindbergh, was explaining to her classes at the Cass Technical High School here the theory and practice of chemistry. 


on his mother day of flight


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1927/05/21/118881226.html?pageNumber=4
	LINDBERGH PLANNED FLIGHT FOR A YEAR
	A flight from New York to Paris has been in the mind of Charles Lindbergh for more than a year. He made several attempts to obtain backing for such a venture and finally went to Major William B. Robertson, President of the Robertson Aircraft Company, to whom he was flying as a mail pilot. 

on his backers day of flight


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1927/05/21/issue.html

made headline of NY Times that day on his progress


more than half the page for him


https://timesmachine.nytimes.com/timesmachine/1927/05/24/106925197.html?pageNumber=4
	Maurice Rostand, in Poem on Flight, Says Lindbergh Was Guided by Spirits of Americans Who Died for France

	PARIS, May 23 (AP).  A half hour after Captain Charles A. Lindbergh had landed on Le Bourget flying field Saturday night Maurice Rostand wrote a poem to the triumphant aviator. 

Maurice Rostand wrote a French poem for him after he landed

	'Twas those young men, with hearts so brave,
	  Who, full of fervor and good-will,
	Came from your home, too soon forgot,
	  To die for France.

	 That which had brought you, predestined one,
	   Through all these risks where others fell;
	 It was the rendevous which they gave you
	   At their fresh graves.



If anything they sabotaged Nungesser and Coli and wanted Lindbergh to win instead

wrote about his "great potential" and played him up in the media before and after

talked about his investors


maybe decided later not a good return on investment?


maybe his dad was involved with them: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Charles_August_Lindbergh

should check out his mom, backers too


so here's a theory on motive:

Lindbergh was involved with their people already, maybe through his parents

they like to have inlfluence over people who influence public opinion

they saw him as having potential

so they maybe sabotage Nungesser and Coli's flights, or others flights, but built him up as successful and the plucky hero and "let" him cross the Atlantic

he became a world-wide celebrity and they saw themselves as making him and responsible for this, through help in press and not sabotaging his flight

they expected him to do something for them in return, whether he knew it or not, but he didn't, or did something they didn't want and they became dissillusioned or bitter with him

so they kidnapped and killed his son and used the event to gain influence over him by making him a conspiracy theorist about the press, so like citizens in Soviet Russia he'd always be looking at the press for double meaning and they could mess with his head and influence him in I guess well-established ways that way 



back to Lardner's article:


https://www.thedailybeast.com/the-stacks-how-charles-lindbergh-became-the-first-crackpot-celebrity
	...The farther the hero wentwhether he went upward, downward, sideways, through air, land, or water, or hand over hand on a flagpolethe better, provided he went alone.

	The year 1927, which came about two thirds of the way through this time of escape from mass realities, was the perfect year for the perfect feat. It was the apex of the era, chronologically and emotionally. The young flier, Charles A. Lindbergh, did not know this. He picked his time by chance, as far as any ordinary reader of human instincts can say; though then and later he was so repeatedly and so overwhelmingly famous, and showed such a sense, friendly or not, of the rhythms and uses of notoriety, that many newspapermen of his period refuse to lay any part of it to chance. Newspapermen have always felt superstitious, among other things, about Lindbergh.


emphasizes him being seen as rugged individual and self-made man, but this wouldn't be completely true if some journalists cooperated to push-up his public image. If he were cocky that would probably make it easier for them to resent him.

Larnder says Lindbergh was good at playing the press and maybe or maybe not picked his timing by chance. I think he's saying some newspapermen thought Lindbergh was gaming the system.


goes on to say the public liked him because they are simple, Lindbergh was overrated and he should have been a one-day wonder.


	...But it wasn't. The end of the story was delayed, spectacularly, time and again. Lindbergh lived on in the world's interest in a recurrent series of reactionsLindbergh's reactions to the public and the public's reactions to Lindberghsome violent, some cold, some maudlin. One event which came a few years after the flight to Paris, the kidnaping and murder of Lindbergh's son, calls for no psychological explanation of Lindbergh; it was done to Lindbergh and his wife, brutally and as far as we know objectively, from outside.


I think he's alluding to theory that Lindbergh killed his son?

author laments that Lindbergh stayed in public interest


	Yet by and large people have attempted to explain the phenomenon of Lindberghthe phenomenon of the story that refused to die, that may be smoldering now for another burst into printin terms of the man's character. I know that the temptation to psychoanalyze Lindbergh has been too much for many men and women in the last ten years. Harold Nicolson, the English writer who rented his home to Lindbergh and his family when they first fled America, later wrote about him as follows, reviewing the years after 1927:

	It was almost with ferocity that he struggled to remain himself. And in the process of that arduous struggle his simplicity became muscle-bound; his virility-ideal became not merely inflexible, but actually rigid; his self-control thickened into arrogance, and his convictions hardened into granite. He became impervious to anything outside his own legendthe legend of the young lad from Minnesota whose head could not be turned.

	If that sounds a bit portentous, remember that Nicolson was writing at a time when England was in danger and Lindbergh was openly opposed to saving her. 


says Lindbergh was arrogant and rigid


	Otherwise it is a fair specimen of the widespread effort to find the answer to the riddle of Lindbergh in Lindbergh himself, and nowhere else. There is as much truth in it, probably, as in many of the other analyses which rolled off angry lips and pens at the time of Lindbergh's isolationism when he opened a part of his mind to the world by fighting American intervention in the Second World War.


there is a "riddle of Lindbergh" that author has identified and points to others writing psycoanalysis of him when he started becoming a Nazi

author believes the answer was "Lindbergh and Lindbergh himself"

as opposed to others influencing him? might be that author sees a debate over how Lindbergh got the way he was, and his take is that the blame lies with Lindbergh himself.


	Certainly Lindbergh was deliberately responsible to some extent for his continuing fame and notoriety after 1927. Loathing the blatant contactual phases of publicity, he showed nonetheless one of the truest gifts ever seen on this planet for attracting it, seeming sometimes to go out of his way to get It when otherwise it might not have been forthcoming. It almost appeared that he needed fame to subsist, to support his confidence in the role he had won. Here is the paradox that engrosses his analyzers: a man supernormally ingrown and aloof becoming with sure instincts a chronic public figure. Lindbergh once said of interventionists and idealists before the war that they were men who were too far separated from fact and life. No man of note was ever further separated from life and fact than Lindbergh. No man could be more reluctant to admit it.


says Lindbergh was deliberately responsible for his continuing fame and notoriety after 1927.

I guess some journalists did a lot to make him and maybe planned to do this, but if they see Lindbergh as deliberately seeking fame himself they can blame him and not feel as responsible.

says Lindbergh fed off fame and was delusional


	There was a good deal of glibness, in the heyday of the movement called America First a few years ago, about marking the parallel between Charles A. Lindbergh, Jr., and his isolationist father. Possibly Lindbergh wanted to believe that such a parallel existed, but it didn't. His father seems to have been quite another sort of man.


he likes his father though


goes on about his grandfather being a noble European statesman who abolished a form of corporal punishment

says his father was manly and worked as a newsboy and "earned his way though" law school "by washing dishes and waiting on tables."

someone almost stopped his prospects of dying wealthy but fortunatley he was able to become a rising force in local and national politics


	...The farmers liked the elder Lindbergh, and the elder Lindbergh liked the farmers. He lost no time in making them the keystone of his liberal and freethinkingin fact, socialisteconomic theories. C. A. Lindbergh was bookish but gregarious, a thinker and writer but a practicing politician. One of his interests was the creation of an insurance co-operative for farmers, to free them from the big insurance companies of the East. For a time he ran a magazine stumping for co-operatives, which failed, and he became increasingly obsessed by the situation which centered the nation's money in a few hands. He was anti-Morgan, anti-Kuhn, Loeb, anti-National City Bankthe champion of workers in farm or factory. His son never shared in all his life, as far as anyone has been able to detect, this anticapitalist bias.


Lindbergh senior was a freethinking anticapitalist who started a farmers co-op, which freed them from insurance companies of the east

he once even started a magazine to help co-ops


goes on to say Lindbergh and father didn't share interest in mechanical things and planes, father didn't care much about his interest in planes


	...The father and son looked a good deal alike: lean, handsome faces with deep eyes and firm mouths. C.A.'s face, however, began in time to take on the lines of maturity and suffering which come, not unnaturally, to those who mature and suffer. One of the men who in later years made a hobby of publicly psychoanalyzing his son said that the latter's face never seemed to age or to reflect grief or any other experience, keeping a sort of cherubic aspect through its fortieth year.


I guess this is poetry saying Lindbergh was immature and had it easy

	
	In 1906 C.A. ran for Congress and was elected. He ran, it should be noted, on the Republican ticket. He was as yet a socialist in word and precept only, and the Farmer-Labor party, which he helped to found was still in the future. His son, five years old, went to Washington with him in 1907 and watched the swearing-in ceremony. C.A. remained in Congress eight years. During much of that time his boy Charles stayed in Washington too, helping with such office work as running errands and licking envelopes. For a time he went to the Friends' School there, along with the children of Theodore Roosevelt, and was part of a drugstore gang led by Quentin Roosevelt, which used to convene at the store and run up mild tabs in confectionery.


says father ran for congress will being really a socialist and Lindenbergh helped his father in his political things and hung out with T Roosevelt's kids


	There was a panic in 1907, and C. A. Lindbergh swung into action with a campaign for investigation of his great enemy, the money trust. The newspapers began to work him over. He stored up thousands of clippings denouncing him as a demagogue, a dangerous radical and dissenter. He fought, fruitlessly, the Federal Reserve Bill of 1913 and published a book called Banking and Currency in support of his views. In 1915 he was in at the birth of the Farmers League, a political group which was launched in Minnesota, scored its first successes in North Dakota in 1916, and then turned and drove a wedge into C.A.'s home state with our entry into war. Lindbergh and the League, till then fundamentally progressive, socialistic, and anti-money, at once acquired an antiwar and anti-Britain followingstill and always based, in Lindbergh's view, on the suspicion of collusion between British and Wall Street finance.


is this where Lindenbergh got the idea of being suspicious of British?


	They lined up a heavy farm and labor vote. C. A. Lindbergh ran for Governor of Minnesota on the Farmers League ticket in 1918, and it was a wild, bitter campaign.

	He electioneered in his old car, his son driving. Mobs booed him, eggs and garden stock were thrown. This, mark you, was not a prewar campaign, like the younger Lindbergh's before Pearl Harbor. This was actually in wartime, and the elder Lindbergh, called pro-German by his rivals, worked against big pressures and heavy clubs. Department of Justice agents broke the plates of his old book on banking and his new one, Why Is Your Country at War?, in which he denounced the sale of Liberty Bonds as manipulated and forced by bankers and said at one point:

	Our purpose is humane; nevertheless I believe I have proved that a certain 'inner circle,' without official authority and for selfish purposes, adroitly maneuvered things to bring about conditions that would make it practically certain that some of the belligerents would violate our international rights and bring us into war with them.


is this where Lindbergh got the idea that agents of influence were trying to push the U.S. into war?


author says father "swung into action" againts Wall Street, published a book and got attention in the press for his crusade. He was persecuted for his socialist views. 

his anti-WWI campaign sounds interesting and maybe worth looking at. There was an author who wrote a book on a "massive German campaign" to keep the U.S. out of WWI, but scrutiny showed him to be dishonest in a way that obfuscated operations of Soviet spies. There are signs that the Okhrana was using the war to foment unrest kindof like with vietnam


	This theory of maneuver was in the mouth of the younger Lindbergh twenty-two years later, but not Our purpose is humane. Our purpose had become stupid to him, a waste of supermen and white Western civilization. There were no supermen or yellow breeds in C.A.'s vocabulary. Since we were at war, C.A. favored seizure and state ownership of mines, trains, plants, and resources to stop profiteering. He had no personal opposition to Woodrow Wilson, and Wilson scolded mob tactics against Lindbergh. When C.A. lost the election he was offered a place on the War Industries Board by Bernard Baruch. Conservative circles in Minnesota killed this appointment, Baruch withdrawing the offer politely and C.A. going his way a little more bitter than before. He was a Farmer-Laborite by 1920, campaigning for Henrik Shipstead, and in 1923 an author again and for the last timewith The Economic Pinch which showed him still obsessed by the evils of big money but brimful, too, of gentle socialist slogans and advice against such things. as the exploitation of children.


I guess all of this stems from author feeling need to explain how his father's anti-war activity was different from his. 

author says "Our purpose had become stupid to" Lindbergh (author a socialist?)

Lindbergh father wanted to seize means of production to "stop war profiteering"


	His own child was a flier by then. In 1923, in a campaign for a special Senatorial primary, the young Lindbergh flew campaign literature and speakers for his father, and once, only once, flew his father too.

	Afterward, C.A. said to his partner, Quigley, I don't like this flying business. See if you can't get the boy to come into our office, study law, and join the firm.


a theme in this essay (part about father not sharing in son "growing interest" in planes)--says father wanted Lindenbergh to be like him, and apparently author wanted him to make that his career too


	...In a letter to the younger Lindbergh when he was training for his army commission as a flier, an old college classmate asked, among other things, how Lindbergh's love life was coming along. Lindbergh answered: In this respect, I am situated in about the same position that I was in at Madisoni.e., no prospects, past, present, or future.


should look in to his wife--involved with them too?


	He was quiet and in-dwelling from early boyhood on. Some who knew him in those years called his manner grim, and there is no doubt that there was a feeling of withdrawal in him, a discomfort when he came into the world outside planes and mechanics, that made him awkward socially.


says Lindbergh was withdrawn and socially awkward 


	He seems to have found relief from this social strain and repression chiefly in practical jokesand they were the sort of practical jokes, complicated, strenuous, and virile, about which a monograph might be written in connection with American life. The prank called the snipe hunt, for instance, is apt to cost the jokers themselves a full night of sleep and miles of walking, running, and crawling. Lindbergh arranged a snipe hunt at least once, at the expense of a fellow pilot. Another time he went to great pains to introduce a cow into the neighborhood of an airplane mechanic who had a mortal fear of bulls, and again, he filled the ice-water pitcher at the bedside of a roommate, one Bud Gurney, with kerosene.


reading between the lines, did this color how they saw Lindbergh and help them justify to themselves how they treated him? author points out practical joke where he made a fellow pilot go on a "hunt" that lead nowhere, but that's what happened to Lindbergh when he was looking for his dead son. In some books and articles they blame his propensity for practical jokes for killing his son.


goes over how he started flying


	...Then Monsieur Raymond Orteig moved into his life, or, rather, Lindbergh moved into M. Orteig's and the world's.

	Writing about the American Middle West recently, an Englishman, Graham Hutton, said that most of the Middle Westerners he talked with thought, among other things, that Lindbergh was the first man to fly the Atlantic. Quite possibly people think so all over the country and all over the world. Actually, the Atlantic had been flown several times from 1919 through 1926, nonstop or otherwise, by dirigible and plane. There were various transatlantic flights in various stages of preparation in late 1926 and early 1927. This was partly the responsibility of M. Orteig, who had offered $25,000 to the man or men who would fly from New York to Paris or vice-versa. Some people spoke unkindly of M. Orteig's offer as homicidal in effect if not in spirit. 


which people?


	I know that this elderly landlord burned with desire for Franco-American good will and was so well disposed toward mankind that he once gave me the freedom of the Hotel Lafayette's kitchen, and the best eating in downtown New York, in return for a very small favor. At any rate, his $25,000 was on the line. Talk of flying the Atlantic was in the air. Toward the end of 1926, Lindbergh set out to hustle himself a stake.


author says he knew Orteig and swapped favors. Says Orteign "burned with desire for Franco-American good will" (didn't happen with Nungesser and Coli thanks in part to press, but I guess did with Lindbergh)


	He was not ideally equipped for salesmanship. He could not work up interest among the usually farsighted editors of the St. Louis Post-Dispatch. The rival Globe-Democrat, however, listened to his plans, and eventually, in early 1927, money was forthcoming, mostly from Mrs. Lora Josephine Knight, widow of a St. Louis stockbroker. At San Diego, California, in the spring of the year, Lindbergh was camped at the Ryan aircraft plant supervising the final touches on a silver monoplane built to his order, which he named The Spirit of St. Louis. He had for some time been practicing staying awake for thirty to forty hours at a stretch.


author says "usually farsighted" St. Louis Post-Dispatch wasn't interested in Lindbergh when he took up challenge, but Globe-Democrat was.


	He had never had much to do with newspapermen except for his cash-finding campaign in St. Louis. Now he made proposals to the San Diego reporters which they were to think back on a few weeks later with some irritation. He wanted the press to work for him. He asked the reporters to keep quiet about himself and his plans and to keep him posted on what they heard from the East of the moves of his competitorsprincipally Clarence Chamberlin and Charles A. Levine in their Bellanca, and Richard E. Byrd and his big, distinguished crew in their Fokker.


says wanted to work with San Diego reporters, which annoyed them later. Asked them to keep him posted on competitors.

	
	The reporters said sure. A few days later they said, So long, and Lindbergh was off. Being the flier he was, he at once made American air history with the longest nonstop American flight recorded up till then, San Diego to St. Louis, and the fastest over-all time from coast to coast. He arrived at Curtiss Field at 5:33 on the afternoon of May 12, 1927.


reporters agreed. This was before his May 12 flight which had long articles in news


	The public and the papers were aware of him now, but doubtful. Once, during the week that followed, the Post-Dispatch of St. Louis rang up a man at the Times of New York to ask if he thought Lindbergh, of St. Louis, was going to amount to anything. The Times man could not give a definite answer.


says St Louis Post-Dispatch and NY Times were communicating on Lindbergh's potential in the following week.


	Lindbergh himself was not certain how he stood in the matter of news value, but he knew he was going to take off; so he subscribed, in the neat, private, foresighted way in which he did everything else for this flight, to a press-clipping service. Then, with no pontoons on the plane to weigh her down, he took off at 7:51 on the morning of May 20 and headed a little north of the sunrise, while his rivals remained on the ground to wait to be sure about weather.


author emphasizes that Lindbergh was concerned of news coverage of himself and subscribed to clipping service.


	Probably excitement never grew with more terrible momentum, from a puff of curiosity to an earth-shaking tension, than it did through the night of May 20 and the morning of May 21. Probably everyone who knew of the flight remembers today where he was or exactly what he was doing at some moment in the course of it. There was a fight that night in a baseball park in New York between Jack Sharkey and Jim Maloney; I remember that Joe Humphreys, a little announcer with a bow tie and a voice of brass, arose in the pool of light in the center of the darkness and called for silence and prayer, and his words were maudlin, moving, and eloquent.


announcer Joe Humphreys called for silence and prayer for Lindbergh night before, author thinks it was "maudlin, moving, and eloquent"


	It was not a flight that can be spoken of in detail. That was the happy thing about it in the end: nothing happened, except that the plane was sighted now and then, true on its course and making good time. What went on in the flier's mind the flier might have said, but the chances are he could not. He wrote a book afterward called We, in which he told some things about the flight to Paris.


I think I get the title "We" and wikipedia being weird about it now

they want to emphasize that they helped him and made him, don't like people doing things on own initiative without them, and this point would be important to them aftewards since they could use it to justify to themselves killing his baby

(assuming that's what they did)


reading things like this maybe important for understanding psychology of tyrants

like if they see themselves as controlling the media and public opinion and having a "right" to it, they'd see anyone who becomes famous as owing them something.

I think they have a mindset of setting a precedent like anyone who tries to send probe to mars gets blown up, anyone who tries to fly across Atlantic gets sabotaged, anyone who speaks publicly of them gets killed, and any time they make an exception the see as doing that person a favor and reserve right to "retalliate" against that person

like why sexually assault Bentley then come after her later when she goes to FBI with spy ring? it's hard to do mental gymnastics to justify this, but if they bother I think the mindset is "we did a favor for you in making an exception for you, letting you do this" and so feel entitled to enact their idea of "justice" on that person.

why react angrily when Franks goes to police after Leopold rape/murder? if they were operating under assumption that "we can get away with rape and murder", at least of "slave class," they might see this as challenging their authority. Since Leopold raped one of their own, I guess this confused them and caused a stir (how do you balance "protect your own" and "protect your own from legal responsibility" when one of your own kills another?).

a lot of it comes off as ridiculous--there's no way to justify raping and murdering a teenager, helping a rapist and murder get away with it, murdering a baby, framing an innocent man for it, and on and on about the things they do. But it's interesting that it comes off like they try.

Leopold tried to blame it on Loeb's influence, but from the start his justification was "because I can"--maybe that's the end of it?


	... He spoke of the preparations he made, the food and water he took along, sandwiches, Army concentrated rations for five days, an Armbrust Cup, which, wrote Lindbergh, is a device for condensing the moisture from human breath into drinking water. The cup is cloth-covered and contains a series of baffle plates through which the breath is blown. In those sentences is the detachment, the cool, scientific preoccupation, the avoidance of bravado or any sense of great adventure, which make We the best memento we have of the man who made the flight.


author says "We" best memento of LIndbergh flight



	Lindbergh flew 3,610 miles to Paris in 33 hours and 29 minutes, landing cleanly at Le Bourget field on the evening of May 21. A sea of Parisians flowed out to the field, broke down steel fences, swept over the runways. Lindbergh, escaping to some pilots' quarters identified himselfI am Charles A. Lindberghand showed letters of introduction to Ambassador Herrick and others. He was whisked away from the joyous mob, and the line began to form for more mobs in London, Washington, New York. From that moment, which seemed to be the beginning of the end of the most glorious story of the era of glorious stunts, two forcescircumstances and Lindbergh's characterset to work to prevent such an ending. At the very time he seemed to be trying most desperately to efface himself, Lindbergh unerringly prolonged his fame and shaped himself for new stories to come. At no time in the next fifteen years did circumstance fail to lend a hand in this process when a hand was needed.

	Eight months after the Paris flight, a New York editor wired a reporter who was covering Lindbergh on a good-will tour through Latin America: No more unless he crashes.

	It was the first suggestionand only one man's suggestionthat the point of surfeit had been reached in the first of the great Lindbergh stories. There is no telling how many tons of newsprint were consecrated to the Lone Eagle (to use the sobriquet which pleased the flier best, or offended him least) in those eight months. 


author says Lindbergh's fame should have ended after flight, "circumstances" where always there to lend a hand in Lindbergh polonging his fame, and some journalist got sick of covering him.

says got a lot of coverage, too much, in 8 months after flight


reading between the lines, could this be a post-mortem of sorts? like "we shouldn't have promoted Lindbergh so much"


	...His effect on the world had been orgiactic and orgastic. He returned to America to find 500,000 letters, 75,000 telegrams, and two freight-car loads of press clippings awaiting him. He was decorated in swift succession by the President of France, the King of England, and the President of the United States, who also commissioned him a colonel. His laundry disappeared every time he sent it out, and he could not write checks because people kept them instead of cashing them. Of the many sentimental songs which were written about him, the most popular, as I recall, was Lucky Lindy. This was an epithet which Lindbergh hated in each of its parts and in toto. He set to work at once to destroy any impression that he was either lucky or Lindy. It was a sort of battle no other quick celebrity had ever put up, but Lindbergh did not mean to be a quick celebrity. He aimed to perpetuate his fame and what he considered his dignity at one and the same time. His resistance to any other kind of attention was fanatical, skillful, and wholly successful.

	Lucky? He promptly flew through all the forty-eight states, through Mexico, Central America, South America, and the West Indies, always alone, touching on sixteen different countries, covering 7,860 miles, without a slip or a flaw.


Lindbergh got very famous, "couldn't write checks because people would keep them." 

people started calling him "lucky" and Lindbergh resented this. Author says he battled "lucky" impression and this was unusual.

goes on about Lindbergh PR, meeting his wife who author likes


	...During the years when he was enforcing his resistance to precedent, to the fate of the skyrocket, a small group of men was developing a resistance to Lindberghand doing it all alone, in silence. To many people it may not seem important that Lindbergh was antipathetic to newspapermen, and they to him. Yet it is a curious fact, worth noting; for reporters were the key to the fame that sustained him. Knowing the power of his position, Lindbergh seemed to feel that he could point up his hatred of nonprivacywhich is an entirely different thing from publicityby taking it out on the working press. The working press tried time and again to show him the way to privacy: Swallow your medicine, the shouts and the fury, at a quick gulp, like a good patient, and then go off and stop being public. But with strange perversity Lindbergh continued to gag at the medicine and invite the disease.


author says a "small group of men" were silently going against Lindbergh while he was "enforcing his resistence to precedent." Implies they were "newspapermen."

says Lindbergh didn't like newspapermen and they didn't like him

implies he was upset at press invading his private life

the tried to show him to "swallow the medicine" "like a good patient" to show him the way to stop invasions of his privacy, but Lindbergh continued to "gag at the medicine and invite the disease."


	He once, in the early days of his celebrity, flew coast to coast in record time. The flight was advertised as a record attempt, through the channels Lindbergh thought proper; in short, it deliberately invited reporting. Yet Lindbergh flew into a rage at the men who met him to report its consummation firsthand.


describes an instance when Lindbergh raged at reporters (what happened there?)


	It's hard to say when this cycle of frictions began. It was soon. On his first stop in San Francisco after the Paris flight, Lindbergh took to a hotel room and the press gathered in the corridor outside. Lindbergh sent out word that he would not be available for some time. The reporters waited. Presently a dark and genial face peered out from behind a mustache, through another door in the corridor, and its owner, Seor Alvaro Obregn, of Mexico, said, If you're waiting for Colonel Lindbergh, why not wait in here?

	Inside Seor Obregn's room the press got a lively speech on Seor Obregn's plans to be President of Mexico in 1928, and quantities of liquor to wash it down with. When Lindbergh's emissary finally traced the reporters, with the news that the Colonel was ready to talk, he found them agreed that the story was not Lindbergh but Obregn. That is what the papers showed next day.


a story I think saying Senor Obregon stole Lindbergh's thunder while he made the press wait

I guess shows in authors mind Lindbergh getting his up-commence?


	There are many such episodes accessible for the record, though few of them ended the same way, for, as I said, Lindbergh's position was powerful, and the press was seldom able or willing to sacrifice the public's curiosity to its own irritation. To the overwhelming bulk of the public, in the words of a writer commenting on Lindbergh in 1930, he remained Godlike.


says he went on to irritate the press, but he "remainded Godlike" for awhile and I guess author is implying they were annoyed they had to keep helping him


	It might be borne in mind, however, that from 1930 on Lindbergh's closest friend was Dr. Alexis Carrel. The doctor was, first, a scientist and technician. But he was also a colorful and persuasive writer, with certain philosophical ideas. These ideas, not unheard of before 1930 or since, had to do with the natural supremacy of the white race, the rule of the weak by the strong, and the breeding of supermen.


author names Alexis Carrel as influence on Lindbergh giving him white supremecy ideas (why does he do this)

says he was under this influence from 1930 on

this looks bad for author, because he talks about "small group" of newsman plotting against him, then how Lindbergh annoyed press, then inserts paragraph on "he was racist since 1930," then follows with:


	Lindbergh's baby son, Charles, was kidnaped from the flier's home in New Jersey on March 1, 1932. He was found dead seventy-two days later in a patch of woods in the same neighborhood after Lindbergh, with a plea to the police and the newspapers to help him by keeping their hands off the case, had paid ransom money to the unknown and unseen kidnaper. The crime was at once so cold-blooded and so violent that it would have had nationwide publicity no matter who the victims were. Since the victims were the Lindberghs, the impact upon the press and the public was tremendous; the law of the land itself was affected. Within a few months of the murder, long before the arrest of Bruno Richard Hauptmann, Congress enacted the so-called Lindbergh Law, which gave Federal agents national freedom in the pursuit of kidnapers.


so it really does look like this was written by a guy who knew of some plot going on and was trying to justify it

says kidnapping had tremendous effect in press

says law allowing Feds to go after murder signed before Hauptmann caught


assuming the kidnapping was a plot, I wonder if some of the newsmen covering it disagreed with it or were disgusted by it? there were signs of that in the Leopold-Loeb case, even some people coming out decades later basically saying "wtf were we doing"

the article in some ways comes off as addressed to newsmen, and the author emphasizes the relationship between Lindbergh and newsmen and how Lindbergh mistreated them. a working theory is that this article was written to calm them down and rally them behind the author's viewpoint, and that could be why it comes off as so "frank" (for lack of a better word)

They've done similar things to this before--for example when Soviets wanted to issue a general directive they'd publish it publically in open code, and Communist leaders would study it and I guess discuss it among themselves. The protocols of the elders of zion appears to be one such document.


	This second Lindbergh story was so big that it was seldom out of the newspapers for even a day during the next four years. Nor did the papers see any reason, especially after the baby was found dead, to tone it down or to miss such a sterling chance to play cops-and-robbers. Every manner of reporter and cop, official and unofficial, from Walter Winchell down, or up, took a hand. Naturally enough, a score of newspaper characters sprouted on the fringe of Lindbergh's fame and tragedy.


author says some newspapermen and characters liked murder-mystery of Lindbergh case to "play cops and robbers"

John Condon comes off that way, with his story of meeting a guy in the shadows and other things

author goes on to name John Condon, Ellis Parker, Irving Blitz, and Salvy Spitale

Parker kidnapped and tortured wrong suspect

Blitz and Spitale tried to find out if it was mob

author met with Blitz and Spitale


	...Bruno Hauptmann, a Bronx carpenter of German birth, was arrested in 1934. He was convicted of the Lindbergh crime in 1935, after a trial in which the renown of Lindbergh, who was a witness, and the furious public interest in the case had the result of sending those connected with it, lawyers, writers, state executives, and witnesses other than Lindbergh, into a mad spin of histrionics and hysteria.


author said the case sent some lawyers, writers, executives around it into hystrionics and hysteria


	It has been said by more than one person that the killing of his son and the blatancy of the hunt and the trial which followed not only drove Lindbergh out of his country but formed in his mind the somber ideas which he gave to the world a few years later. That is probably, like so many other easy opinions, the truth but not the whole truth. The details of the crime tell what its effect on the father and mother of the baby must have been, and it is certain that Lindbergh's appearance in court, where his son's clothes were spread before him, brought a shock to his sense of what was private, fitting, and decent. He had another son now, born a month before Charles was found dead. A picture of the second son appeared in a newspaper. There is no doubt that the kidnaping and its sequel, including this last detail, were directly responsible for the fact that the Lindberghs sailed secretly for England on December 22, 1935, three months before the execution of Hauptmann.

	But Lindbergh had long since shown dissatisfaction with the state of affairs in America and his own relations with it. He had a problem: He could not enjoy the things he wanted, and these included fame and respect as well as work and privacy, in the way he wanted. Even the kidnaping, in the end, seems to have become fused in his mind with dislike for a state of affairs, not for one man or for any single evil. In the next several yearsthe years of the clash between fascism and democracyhe spoke of America more than once in private conversation as immoral and disorderly.


author says some theorize that killing of his son led Lindbergh to becoming a Nazi, but says this is probably not the whole truth. Says kidnapping and son's picture appearing in newspaper no doubt led to Lindberghs sailing secretly to England.

author says the other part of his leaving and I guess Nazi beliefs was growing dissatisfaction of state of affairs in U.S.


	Sir John Ervine wrote a plea for privacy for the Lindberghs in England, when they arrived there. It was not heeded at first by the British press, which put on a pursuit race and a public picnic, but after a few days the English reporters followed the formula which American reporters had so frequently offered for procedure between themselves and Lindbergh, and which Lindbergh himself was so often loath to accept: Get it over with and the veil is yours. They gave him plenty of privacymore of it, some who knew him said later, than he wanted. Time appears to have grown heavy on his hands after a few months at Long Barn, the Kentish house rented by him from Harold Nicolson and Victoria Sackville-West.


author says Lindbergh had some initial problems with press hounding him in England, Sir JOhn Ervine wrote a plea for his privacy, and eventually they accepted this. 


author goes on to say Lindbergh met with dignitaries in Eureope point out a time where some newsman started a rumor he was lost

goes on to mention more of  the dignitaries he met in Europe, and describe Lindbergh being upset at criticism from ant-Nazis and plan to live in Germany while Jewish purges going on


	...Obviously the mere catalogue of Lindbergh's voyages and visits between 1935 and 1939 does not explain what was happening in his mind, what had led him to reject, at any rate to doubt, the future and the character of three nations in rapid succession. Two men influenced him strongly: one, Dr. Carrel, whose association with Lindbergh, as an intimate friend, was now more than half a dozen years old; the other, Goering, whose knack of salesmanship helped turn Lindbergh's notions about power and war and polities in the same direction as his thoughts about man and society.


author points to Carell and Goering as influences on Lindbergh. Says Goering changed Lindberghs notions of "power and war and polities" towards Nazism, and implies this led him to say negative things and reject America, France, and England

probably this is not the whole story--he sounded like a Nazi after this, but in his speech at the same time came off as worried about America and seeing his country as subject to a great threat.


	The most highly civilized races, the Scandinavian, for example, are white, wrote Dr. Carrel in 1935, in a book called Man the Unknown.

	Caesar, Napoleon, Mussolini mused Dr. Carrel in the same book. All great leaders of nations grown beyond human stature.


author seems to be of the mind of smearing Lindbergh by association and quotes Carell, but wikipedia had direct quotes from him that were even worse than this.

this was written in 1949

maybe some from his diary? his diary was published in 1970 (https://archive.nytimes.com/www.nytimes.com/books/98/09/27/specials/lindbergh-lost.html), and reviewer points out a lot of the horrible things he wrote and things that would embarass U.S. like treatment of Japanese. Ended with "Mr. Lindbergh accumulated 650,000 words by the time he stopped. A total of 400,000 of these is included in this book. "

I guess author didn't have as much to go by in 1949, then diary published, then they come off giddy about it


whether he was a true Nazi or not or to what degree, it confuses things that they are so enthusiastic to argue he was

(so far guessing Lindbergh is to Nazi as Oppenheimer is to Communist)


	It seems a fair inference that the doctor's thoughts and private talk were of a piece with his published philosophy. Born in France, he had been a distinguished physician since 1906 in the fields of suturing blood vessels and transplanting organs. He won the Nobel Prize in 1912, and his scientific work, including that with Lindbergh, was undoubtedly valuable. But in the sciences of philosophy and ethnology, which were not his own, the doctor went along with the most superficial, dime-magazine eugenic theories and the racist cant of the Count de Gobineau and Houston Stewart Chamberlain. These men, whose works have been discredited by every objective technical study and all recorded statistics, are important in that they influenced, among others, Kaiser Wilhelm II and Hitler and inspired Mein Kampf. Their views are reflected in Dr. Carrel's book.


author emphasizes Carell's connections to Nazis then Lindbergh's connection to Carell


	Dr. Carrel and Lindbergh summered on adjoining tiny islands off Brittany in 1938, often strolling on the beach and talking together, and in the early part of 1939 Lindbergh wrote (in the Atlantic Monthly): No system of representation can succeed in which the voice of weakness is equal to the voice of strength.


sounds like something Neitzche would say


	And, speaking of aviation in the Readers Digest: [It is] one of those priceless possessions which permit the White Race to live at all in a sea of Yellow, Black, and Brown.


Lindbergh had Nazi quotes in public anyway

why mention Carell?

author said earlier he's arguing against idea that search, trial and mess from that led to Lindbergh becoming a Nazi. His argument so far is that his friendship with Carell and influence of Georing were responsible for that instead.

guessed earlier that influence of press on him had something to do with it, and deflecting blame from press is a theme in this article, and press had a role in creating Nazis nation-wide in Germany.

Should look into how Lindbergh became a Nazi and what influence on him was.


author goes on to describe Lindbergh meeting with Goering and getting pinned with Nazi medal, then going to Russia and being dissapointed and kocking down a police agent he mistook for a newspaperman


	...The course he then urged on Baldwin, and on anyone who would listen, is no secret; he stated it openly in a speech in 1941:

	I said that war in the west [of Europe] would result in German victory or a devastated and prostrate Europe. I therefore advocated that England and France build  their military forces  but that they permit Germany to expand eastward into Russia without declaring war.

	Baldwin gave Lindbergh a courteous brush-off which, according to his acquaintances, annoyed the Colonel profoundly and reinforced his disgust with British stupidity. As it happened, he was a better salesman than he knew, for at Munich, France and England followed his prescription almost to the letter, at Russia's expense. But Lindbergh went away, home to America at last, thinking only of Baldwin's bullheadedness.


Lindbergh was convinced that the solution was to contain Germany in the West and let Nazis fight Soviets. He went around Europe and pushed his idea. Author says France and England more or less did this at Munich. 

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Munich_Agreement

Munic agreement was agreement in Sep 1938 by major powers of Europe to appease Nazis and let them annex portions of Czechoslovakia


	...Lindbergh's homecoming to the United States in April 1939 was unobtrusive. Shortly after his arrival he made private reports to the War Department and Congressthe factual substance of these could not have been too important, as an American military attach had accompanied him throughout his inspections in Germanyand embarked on a four-month tour of Army study. When the war began in Europe in September he suddenlyand surprisinglyaccepted a suggestion by a radio commentator that he state his views over the air.

	It is a curious thing that never before in the 12 years during which the people of the world had known Lindbergh had they seen him open his mind or speak his thought. When they did, it was on topics no one had associated with him in 1927 or 1932: international politics and the state of civilization. As always, the reaction of press and public to the name of Lindbergh was immense.


did Lindbergh care about international politics and "the state of civilziation" before? author says talk on radio in 1939 was the first time public heard him on this


	He broke his lifelong public silence from Station WOL in Washington, two weeks after the war's start. Three networks carried the speech, which, written painstakingly by his own hand, favored strong neutrality for the United States. Lindbergh said we should make defensive rather than offensive weapons. This form of neutrality, applied to the facts of the moment, markedly favored Germany at the expense of England and France. Lindbergh spoke of the folly of involving ourselves in the problems of alien breeds, yellow people, Moors and Persians.


wrote a racist speech saying U.S. should stay out of war, focus on defense


	As one speech followed anotherhe made five in 1940 and nearly a dozen in 1941Lindbergh began to attract criticism both literate and violent, and as he did so his own talks became less dry and measured, more bitter, personal, and revealing. Plainly sincere, he was having trouble dissociating himself and his program from crackpots and ax-grinders. Lindbergh's embarrassment over such teammates as Joe McWilliams and Gerald L. K. Smith was intense. He did quite stoutly share the views of Lawrence Dennis, author of The Coming American Fascism, who wrote to a known German agent, I saw Lindbergh last week and will see him often from now on.


Lindbergh went on to gove more crazy and racist speeches in 1940 and 1941, perhaps not different from Mel Gibson

says he had intense embarrassment trying to dissociate himself from Joe McWilliams and Gerald L. K. Smtih

says Lawrence Dennis wrote to a known German agent that he will have regular visits with Lindbergh


in this author and others see a relish in pointing out Lindbergh's racist and Nazi leanings, which are unquestionable, but perhaps not for all the reasons the author and others like to cite.


from his "neutrality and war" speech:


http://www.charleslindbergh.com/americanfirst/speech3.asp
	Our bond with Europe is a bond of race and not of political ideology. We had to fight a European army to establish democracy in this country. It is the European race we must preserve; political progress will follow. Racial strength is vital politics, a luxury. If the white race is ever seriously threatened, it may then be time for us to take our part in its protection, to fight side by side with the English, French, and Germans, but not with one against the other for our mutual destruction.


Lindbergh and "America First" sounds like alt-right today


https://altright.com/2017/07/12/no-more-brothers-wars/
	And nationalism is both our salvation and our curse. Realistically, at this point in history, any political movement designed to safeguard the interests of the White race and the existence of Western culture will be labeled a nationalist movement. Of course, even (or especially) a nationalist government can be tempted to fight other nationalist governments, making it easy for rootless cosmopolitans to manipulate patriots to fight each other in mutually ruinous conflicts, as we saw in World War II. 

	...Preventing this scenario must be at the heart of everything we do. A war between Russia and the United States would be the ultimate proof President Trump has either been neutered or totally subverted. And to suggest we share a meaningful national identity with the likes of Kamala Harris or Chuck Schumer that must be defended is as debased as Elsagate.

	No Russian ever called me White trash. No Russian ever told me he was going to take my country away from me, rejoice in the genocide of my race, or extirpate even the memory of my peoples accomplishments like some ISIS knockoff. No real enemy facing the historic American nation lies within the borders of the Russian Federation. The furious mob on the streets of Donetsk was far less hateful and hostile to the authentic American people than the typical delegate to the Democratic National Committee. 


I think the press has a recipe for brainwashing people into being fascists, and the alt-right article hints at it and I guess is implementing it

look at what it links to:

https://www.vdare.com/articles/yes-virginia-dare-there-is-such-a-thing-as-white-genocide
	You see it called out in the comments sections on YouTube videos, on political websites and occasionally in letters to the editor. You see the term increasingly referenced in Conservatism Inc. videos. And you certainly see the horrifying reality of it through the policies perpetrated by almost every government of the West. Its white genocidean idea popularized by former economics professor and Reagan Administration staffer Bob Whitaker, who recently passed away. As Whitaker noted, genocide does not necessarily mean killing.

	...The relevance of this to the plight of whites, in the U.S. and worldwide, is obvious. Today, the hard reality is whites are being eclipsed. 28% of the world population in 1950, they are projected to fall to only 9.8% of the population by 2060. By 2050, whites will be a minority in both the U.S. and their indigenous homeland of Europe.


politicize a debate about race and nationality, make it nasty and drive up extremism on both sides. On one side you will be left with Nazis.

The Bolsheviks were made extreme by the tsarist secret police in the same way, but their debate was over economic conditions and their system of government. While Belteskii testified his intent was to discredit the Bolsheviks, they were already taking over his country.

In Nazi Germany, the Nazi party was in part a reaction to German socialists.


why do they like that Lindbergh ended up a Nazi?


in cases I can think of--Lindbergh, the White Army (Okrhana handed out copies of the protocols to them), Germany, Japan, and the alt-right, the commonality is spitefulness. These are the people and groups that have opposed them. For the Bolsheviks, or whatever you call them, their preferred punishment for their enemies is for them to become the enemy they want--racist, fascist, outwardly evil. 


	...He soon satisfied himself with the respectability of America First, a movement which included several U.S. senators and the president of Sears Roebuck and Company, General Robert Wood. America First, of course, was hugely pleased to have Lindbergh. But there were phases of the partnership which pained and annoyed other prominent isolationists. Membership multiplied, but it was noticeable that the crowds began to leave the hall as soon as Lindbergh's talk was overand at no mere trickle. How many came to see the dream prince of 1927, and how many to save America?


Lindbergh was involved in "America First" with some U.S. senators and the president of Sears Robert Wood.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sears
	The mail order market was based on rural America, with a slow-growing population and far less spending power than urban America. Rosenwald decided to shift emphasis to urban America, and brought in Robert E. Wood to take charge.


http://ibhf.org/wp-content/uploads/IBHF_pdf_final/Robert%20Wood.pdf
	During World War I, Rosenwald delegated his presidental duties to Albert Loeb and wne to Wahsington where he performed various executive chores for the United States Government.


Wood and Alfred Loeb were both appointed by Rosnewald, worked together?

this cites Rosenwald, Wood and Leob as "the men who built sears" https://books.google.com/books?id=BCaTDAAAQBAJ&pg=PA174&lpg=PA174


	Lindbergh denounced the presidential election of 1940 as dishonest: Both sides were interventionist. He spoke of Jewish financing of the war. He resigned his Army commission when President Roosevelt, in April 1941, called him a copperheadan allusion to the Northerners in the Civil War who did not think the South could be beaten.


Lindbergh in WWII acting like "copperhead" in U.S. civil war


	Visibly stung, Lindbergh retorted, A refugee who steps from the gangplank and advocates war is acclaimed as a defender of freedom. A native-born American who opposes war is called a fifth columnist.

	Translations of his speeches were turning up everywhere in the official propaganda of Germany, Italy, and Spain. Japanese planes dropped them over Chungking. Less than four years before Okinawa, Lindbergh said that modern aviation made it impractical, if not impossible, for an expeditionary force to cross an ocean and land successfully on a hostile coast against strong enemy air power. He was speaking every two or three weeks now, in St. Louis, Minneapolis, New York, Philadelphia, Hollywood, San Francisco. He had planned a speech in Boston for late December 1941. But on December 7, America was attacked, and a thick, damp muffler fell on America First and on Lindbergh.


Lindbergh reacted to people attacking him for his views while fascists printed his speeches all over as propaganda


goes on to say Lindbergh gave racist speech at private dinner after pearl harbor, where Stimson saw it and told Lindbergh he shouldn't serve in government. Later Lindbergh went to work for Henry Ford.


	...Most of the news stories that came between the two great wars can be looked back on with pleasure, amusement, or nostalgia, but certainly with detachment. They are over and done with. Lindbergh's story is not, because it is the story of a man's life and character, and he is still living and his character is still at work. I think it is impossible to write with detachment about Lindbergh at this moment. I don't pretend to have done so.


author predicts that it will be impossible to write of Lindbergh with detachment in 1949

author is onto something

Lindbergh became controversial, and the debate about him continued through the 70's when his diary was released an in articles about him today

but what's interesting about Lindbergh isn't whether or not he was a Nazi or a bad person, but what happened to him and why

why is starting debates around Lindbergh's character important?

a good analogy is Germany in WWI and WWII

if you look at what was going on in German foreign ministry, high command, press in WWI out falls a conspiracy to start the war and foment socialist revolutions in Germany as in the rest of the world. It's a very important thing to study.

Then the Nazis came along and sling the "stab in the back myth" everywhere

they own it, use it as an excuse for everything and everyone hates them and all their excuses

now when you look back at WWI and say "wait a minute, there was a 5th column Germany"

now you have a problem

now others can rightly point this out and say: "you know, that's exactly what the Nazis said" (Herwig made clear he understood this when going over battle of Marne, and went on to destroy their arguments while using same style of language as them)

and Herwig even 30 years later pointed out echos of the foreign ministry's historical revisionist propaganda campaign were still going on ('Clio Decieved')

and for a well meaning historian, investiagor, just knowing that, seeing it and getting angry about it clouds your judgement before investigating what German government was up to in WWI

it has the effect of covering it up

politicizing things, keeping a debate going and keeping people thinking with their feelings instead of their head is a way to cover something up. Probably there's a reason Ficher 30 years later kept the debate going releasing new materials about Germans WWI aims


the same thing happened with Soviets in FDR's administration, Bentley's testimony and Joe McCarthy.

Her testimony and the actions of their agents in the press and history books are already out there. They can't change that--anyone who looks can conclude they were spies.

but Joe McCarthy can cover for them

with McCarthy, "soviet spy" is synonymous with right-wing smear-jobs, just like "stab in the back" is synonymous with Nazi excuses

it makes it so anyone who's going to go in there and investigate espionage in FDR's administration is just going to see right-wing smears

anything you find can just be added to the noise of the "ongoing debate"

without consensus comes inaction and apathy

that's why they keep these debates going




goes on to say army press censorship get Lindbergh off front page, General George Kenny, air commander of the area, said later, "I couldn't swear on a stack of Bibles hd didn't do it." author says probably he did.


	...For years, however, Lindbergh's aviation talents have gone hand in hand with a strong compulsion to influence people to see the world as he sees it, and his fame and mechanical gift are the tools he uses to make himself heard. He is still at it. Months after the end of the war Lindbergh was shut in a hotel room with a band of Midwest congressmen, giving them his recipes: Keep the atom bomb completely secret ... Put no confidence in the United Nations  The war we fought against the Nazis cut directly across Lindbergh's social and racial views, and his feeling of what constitutes civilization. He was never a man to change his mind, and since the flight to Paris in 1927 he has not been a man to undervalue himself or to overvalue obscurity.

	There is still timeand there seems to be a growing opportunityfor a fourth Lindbergh Story. 



...


more on U.S. press helping Nazis:


https://www.telegraph.co.uk/history/world-war-two/11370972/Holocaust-Memorial-Day-Telegraph-revealed-Nazi-gas-chambers-three-years-before-liberation-of-Auschwitz.html
	 As early as August 1941, Winston Churchill had denounced the atrocities against the Jews as a crime without a name. Yet Zygielbojm detected no wave of revulsion sufficient for the Allies to take special steps to obstruct the Holocaust.

	The Telegraph chose to report the greatest massacre in the worlds history on page five of a six-page newspaper.

	Zygielbojms informants were taking immense risks and their reports were meticulously accurate, yet he often encountered indifference, disbelief or even suspicion.

	When The Telegraphs story appeared, Zygielbojms wife, Manya, and their son, Tuvia, were still living in occupied Poland as prisoners in the Warsaw Ghetto. Both died during the razing of the Ghetto in 1943.

	Crushed by this tragedy - and by the weight of indifference towards the fate of the Jews - Zygielbojm took his own life on May 11, 1943. 



https://www.algemeiner.com/2012/06/11/how-america-first-learned-of-the-holocaust/
	The turning point came in late May 1942, when a courier from the Jewish Socialist Bund of Poland reached England with a shocking report. It began: From the day the Russo-German war broke out, the Germans embarked on the physical extermination of the Jewish population on Polish soil.


	...Some 700,000 Jews had already been murdered, the Bund Report calculated. At a follow-up press conference in June, World Jewish Congress officials in London reported that the death toll had passed one million. (The real number was already close to 2 million.)

	BBC Radio devoted several broadcasts to the story, and the London Times and other British newspapers published it prominently. The response of the American press, however, was much weaker. The Chicago Tribune, for example, relegated the news to 11 lines on page 6, and reported vaguely that the Jews had perished as a result of ill treatment by the Germans. The Los Angeles Times gave it two paragraphs on page 3.

	The coverage in the New York Times was particularly important because many other newspapers looked to the Timesas they still doto decide if a particular story deserves attention. 


newspapers looked to NY times to decide if a story "deserved attention"


	On June 27, the Times buried the Bund story at the end of a column of short news items from Europe. Five days later, the Times reported on the World Jewish Congresss press conferencebut the Times diluted the news by asserting that the death toll probably includes many who died of maltreatment in concentration camps, starvation in ghettos or forced labor rather than mass murder.

	Then, on July 4, the Times tried to pull the rug out from under the Bund Report. An unsigned news analysis, published on page 4, claimed the Jewish death toll could be anywhere from 100,000 to 1,500,000. The Germans treat the Jews according to whether they are productive or nonproductive, the Times asserted. The high mortality rate among nonproductive Jews was due to starvation and illtreatment rather than mass executions. Eyewitness accounts of mass graves with 40,000 bodies at Zhitomir appear to have been based on hearsay.


	...Then, on July 4, the Times tried to pull the rug out from under the Bund Report. An unsigned news analysis, published on page 4, claimed the Jewish death toll could be anywhere from 100,000 to 1,500,000. The Germans treat the Jews according to whether they are productive or nonproductive, the Times asserted. The high mortality rate among nonproductive Jews was due to starvation and illtreatment rather than mass executions. Eyewitness accounts of mass graves with 40,000 bodies at Zhitomir appear to have been based on hearsay.

	Prof. David S. Wyman, author of The Abandonment of the Jews, contends that Wise and other Jewish leaders were still in shockthe news from Europe was so horrific, and so unprecedented, that it took time to understand and absorb it. It would take several more months of such reports, and a grudging confirmation by the Roosevelt administration at the end of 1942, before Jewish leaders began proposing concrete plans for rescuebut even then, the struggle to bring about Allied action would prove formidable indeed.


------


Lindbergh was a guy interested in press coverage of himself, working with reporters, ordering clipping service


his father was a conspiracy theorist


after the kidnapping the investigation went immediately to some kind of conspiracy by powerful people, reporters investigating if it was "inside" the mob or "an independent," Will Donovan there for some reason, meeting shadowy people, dead-end leads, mob bosses weighing in


working theory is that Lindbergh was reading the press coverage of the kidnapping, saw open code discussion of it or something unusual, press caught on and went with it, Lindbergh slowly went insane


people around him could have contributed to this too



what did Lindbergh read?



St. Louis Post-Dispatch -- communicating with NY Times about Lindbergh potential, Lindbergh went to them before flying


Globe-Democrat -- rival of Dispatch, said to have liked Lindbergh while he was trying to get support


Lindbergh talked to some San Diego reporters saying he wanted to work with them, which said to have annoyed them later


Chicago Tribune -- Lindbergh worked with publisher later for his "America first" campaign


Hopewell Herald -- local news where murder occurred



Daily Journal Vineland NJ had its own story on the murder instead of AP:


https://www.newspapers.com/image/280228470/?terms=Lindbergh


LA Times had an exclusive:


https://www.newspapers.com/image/380281909/



guess journalists he talked to would tend to be the ones he'd read later



some people of interest:

Willard Edwards (covered trial)

this guy?

http://centennial.journalism.columbia.edu/1935-the-lindbergh-kidnapping-trial/index.html
	John Hohenberg 27

	As a young reporter with the New York Evening Journal, John Hohenberg covered the controversial trial of the century in which Bruno Richard Hauptmann was tried and sentenced to death for the murder of Charles Lindberghs son. Hohenberg later returned to the Journalism School, where he became a legendary professor and an administrator of the Pulitzer Prizes.



------


read this guy's book? https://www.annmarieackermann.com/lindbergh-kidnapping/


Cahill book seems good so far


	location 172


		...On May 27, 1929, Lindbergh married Anne Morrow, daughter of Dwight Morrow, ambassador to Mexico. The press could not get enough of this event. In fact, Lindbergh even mentioned the  media coverage of his wedding in his memiors, which were published shortly after his death. He wrote "After our wedding, we spent a fortnight trying to aovid the press in a small motor launch cruising off Long Island and New England Coasts."

		When Charles and Anne Lindbergh began searching for a place to build their home, privacy, seclusion, and freedom from the press were substantial considerations.


press covered Lindbergh marriage a lot, Lindbergh wanted to escape and mentioned this in memiors, built home in secluded place to avoid press


Lindbergh similar to Trump? at least in that both care about press and something they think about a lot, try to play or avoid

press might see both as people they could influence or mess with and like that



Kindle location 194

	...There was little doubt that Daddy Lindbergh was the most popular man in America. Now Baby Lindbergh became the most famous child. The media gave the child nicknames before his real name was even made public. In recognition of his father's accomplishments, the child was called "The Eaglet," "Baby Eagle," and "Little Lindy." There was even a song written entitled, "Hello, Young Lindy." The media's interest in the child was so great that a standing offer of $2,000, a tremendous amount of money in those days, was offered for "secrets of the household." 4


someone in pres offered $2,000 for "secrets of the household" during press frenzy on Lindbergh family


	The Lindberghs became very secretive about their son as they felt the constant media exposure was not a positive influence. Unfortunately, the attempt to protect him led to numerous rumors that the child was somehow deformed. The media speculated that they were being kept away from the child because Charles Lindbergh was embarrassed about his son's imperfection. It never occurred to the reporters that they were the real reason for the Lindberghs' overprotectiveness of their child.

	Time magazine issued an article in response to a rumor in late 1931 that the child was deaf as the result of exposure to loud airplane noise immediately prior to his birth. The rumor was so rampant that Will Rogers himself wrote a column to try and put the baseless allegations to rest.




media spread rumors about their kid while Lindberghs reacted to this and tried to protect him

from early on Lindbergh got mindset of protecting his kid from the press 


	The rumors were so out of control that Charles felt compelled to call a press conference. Five newspaper chains were not permitted to attend as they had actually published stories claiming that the child was deformed. Lindbergh specifically addressed the media about their coverage of his son by saying, "One thing I do hope for him, and that is when he is old enough to go to school, there will be no reporters dogging his footsteps."


which newspapers did he block?

can infer from looking at reporting on his son also

press conference sounds like Lindbergh trying to shoot down some "fake news"


why stories that the baby was deformed? author says all he could find was that a pair of toes overlapped on right foot


maybe some of them thought of the baby like a eugenicist


should look into stories


This says Lindbergh had "creepy fascination with eugenics" by 1966: https://www.minnpost.com/community-voices/2009/07/good-riddance-mr-lindbergh


here's an 11-page forum post on a "eugenics-motivated murder" in Lindbergh case... http://lindberghkidnap.proboards.com/thread/816/case-eugenics-motivated-murder


something weird going on with Anne? http://lindberghkidnap.proboards.com/thread/1138/


noteworthy that press set them up for this by starting rumors their baby was deformed and getting Lindbergh to deny it



location 250


	...Charles had been scheduled to appear at the Waldorf-Astoria Hotel as the guest of honor for a dinner held by New YOrk University. Due to a scheduling error, Lindbergh failed to attend the dinner and came home instead. This innocent error has been used by authors of a tabloid-style book to support a theory that Lindbergh actually killed his own son and then fabricated the kidnapping story.


how did this scheduling error happen?


info on what was happeneing around kidnapping interesting


call between Betty and her boyfriend Red around same time

Anne seeing baby last time, walk into room around kidnapping

Lindbergh assuming Kidnapping occured apparently fairly quickly


kindle location 293


	...Showing a presence of mind and composure that was truly remarkable, Colonel Lindbergh ordered the entire household not to touch the envelope or anything else in the nursery. Many have critizied this action and blatantly stated that no one would ever be able to restrain himself or herself as Lindbergh did. However, Lindbergh was known to face adversity without panicking. He flew across the Atlantic Ocean alone in a plane that most would not even consider boarding, let alone flying. He worked as a barnstormer and had numerous incident swhere he bailed out of his plane and parachuted to safety while the plane crashed and burned. If anyone would have been able to remain calm and rational in a crisis, it was Charles Lindberhg.


author shows bias here, apparently admires Lindbergh

does he even consider Lindbergh as a suspect? from this passage and prior one about the scheduling error sounds like he has read shaky "tabloid-style" stories saying Lindbergh did it and reacted to these.


location 303


Betty tells Whateley what happened who calls Hopewell officer Charles Williamson

Lindbergh contacts friend Colenel Breckinridge in NY as well as NJ police

got Luitenant Dunn, who conferred with Bornmann and at first thought a prank. Called back later (when?) then went on their way


Location 318

Lindbergh and Whateley went out with rifle, found ladder impressions, wooden ladder 70ft away, a peice of it 10ft away from that

athor says this search with Lindbergh and Whateley reported differently in some books. Some accounts say Whateley followed outside and used car lights to search the grounds. Other accounts say Lindbergh wnet alone, walked along road, found nothing, returned.  Author goes on to say some of the accounts where Lindbergh didn't seach under window absurd.

Why different accounts?


Localtion 339


	...Eight to ten feet farther away, they discovered a third piece of the ladder and a wooden dowel pin that was obviously used to connect the peices. A wood chisel was also found.


it's always a chisel... (why would the kidnappers bring a wood chisel)



	...The actions taken be officers Williamson and Wolfe were inexcusable. The evidence should never have been left unattended. These actions, as well as later mistakes made by the New Jersey State Police, would severely compromise the footprint evidence and serve as the foundation for many of the wild accusations that permeate the literature on this case.



location 353: state police officer Wolf interviews Lindbergh. asked if he had any idea who did kidnapping and if he heard anything, Lindbergh answered "no" to both questions.


	....Careful not to disturb the evidence, the men left the nursery and went back outside to show Corporal Wolf what they had discovered beneath the southeast window. Wolf observed fresh footprints leading to three sections of a ladder, but did not report seeing any footprints leading away from the ladder toward the southeast as was later discovered. This is the second time the area around the ladder was examined without anyone noticing these additional footprints.


Both Lindbergh and Wolf don't notice footprints away from the ladder, which might have led them on manhunt to aprehend the criminal

goes on to say Wolf left the evidence unattended again after inspecting


Location 396: says letter was a clue since it was written like a German-speaker trying to write English

	
	...The spelling and grammar suggested that the author was European, most likely German, because it was written using the grammatical construction of the German language but with English words. The use of the dollar sign after the monetary amounts also pointed to a German writer. Interestingly, the writer mispeleld simple words such as "redy" and "anyding," yet had spelled "indication" and "notify" correctly. The officers believed that the author probably used a German-English dictionary to spell the more difficult words, but felt more comfortable with less complicated words.


letter written by "an educated man" trying to sound less educated?

just wierd if the plot so elaborate they skimped on the ransom letter

also the mysterious symbol

like they're trying to be mysterious and fuck with people


Location 413: Kelly testified that he found "marks" at the crime scene but no "fingerprints of value."


so he did find fingerprints just didn't think they were of value

a fingerprint expert later in investigation found hundreds of fingerprints

while they were looking at fingerprints in nursury, a bunch of reporters were near the ladder, which hadn't been photographed or process for fingerprints.

	...Colonel Lindbergh, Corporal Leon, Lieutenant Keaten, and troopers DeGaetano and Bornmann went downstairs to take another look at the ladder, chisel, and footprints. Trooper Bornmann noticed that many reporters had arrived on the scene and were near the ladder. The ladder had not yet been photographed or processed for fingerprints. While the police did not want to disturb the evidence, there was little choice. There were several hundred reporters who were "absolutely out of control." Trooper Bornmann was ordered to bring the ladder into the house, which was the only area the reporters had not yet entered. In the process of moving it, any potential fingerprints on the ladder could have been seriously damaged, assuming, of course, that members of the press had not already done so.


press were "out of control" and messed with crime scene, which was bad for fingerprints


Location 442: author says ladder appeared to be built specifically for the person to climb it based on rung spacing. Ladder could fit into car and be taken apart and put togther and tapered to fold. Author says the ladder was made by an experienced carpenter, but it was frequently described as crude and rickety.


eventually Trooper DeGateana disocvered footprints leading away from scene, which they followed to tire tracks. No photographs or impressions were made of the footprints and the tire tracks were never measured.


Location 455: the footprints leading away from the scene (like boots) were different from footprints to ladder ("sockprints"). Kidnapper could have changed his footwear or tied cloth over shoes. Author dismisses this saying it makes no sense.

author says (I think?) the boot prints tracked with some dogprints


Think most of this comes off as someone trying to confuse investigation--could be kidnapper changing shoes, someone walking along dogprints, brought a dog for no reason, etc.


author points out that the rubber boot footprints were discovered after Lindbergh, Wolfe, and list of people investigated ladder, but none of them reported seeing the boot prints. Only seen after midnight. Author implies that someone made these prints after these people had inspected the scene.

author also points out the press discovered these bootprints but not initial officers and Lindbergh


...then concludes the bootprints were made by a reporter or one of the troopers (?), then says "regardless, they did not belong to the kidnapper" which is probably true unless he's going to come back to stomp around

author says that despite all this, a "significant part" of the early investigation was based on this bootprints and idea the kidnapper fled to the southeast. "Later evidence would show the kidnapper had fled in a different direction."


	...While Lindbergh, Keaten, Leon, and DeGatano were following the wrong footprints, Trooper Kelly was examining the ladder


oh no


can see an element of almost dark comedy in this already, maybe makes the "medicine" easier to "swallow" as was said about Lindbergh, assuming this is active measures.

e.g. While Colonel Lindbergh and the police go off searching wrong footprints, the incompetent trooper who can't find hundreds of fingerprints is left behind to find fingerprints and this becomes basis of investigation...


Kelly found no fingerprints on anything (ladder, dowel pin, chisel) and concluded the kidnapper wore gloves

and why a chisel?


Location 484: "hundreds of people" converged on Lindbergh estate next morning, and crime scene destroyed. Footprints had not been preserved and were destroyed."The media and public frenzy over this case had begun."



Location 497:


	...Lindbergh was doing his best to avoid the media. While he had been a source of public attention after his flight across the Atlantic, the level of itnerest had not been this intense. The first wave of reporters pressed him for a comment. Just before dawn, he briefly addressed them, saying "I hope you boys will excuse me, but I would rather the State Police answered all questions. I am sure you understand how I fell." Despite his request, the media would not leave him alone until he eventually left the country in frustration some time later.


Lindbergh refused press questions


goes on to say Hooever, FBI, CIA (?), a bunch of federal agencies offered support, New Jersy gov sent a telegram "to every govorner in the country", Congress started debapting making kidnapping federal crime. 

	
	...Numerous letters arrived from heads of state around the world. Moreover, every police agency in the country recieved a description of the child and was constantly searching. Couples with blond-haired children were stopped contiually and questioned. It was clear that the entire world was now focused on the tiny town of Hopewell.


national attention quickly


goes on to say the figured kidnapper probably long legs or athletic from ladder

Location 524: state police noticed ladder would require carpetnry skill, started talking to carpenters in area. 


why were reports describing it as "rickety"? maybe craftmanship of ladder one of the reasons suspicion was shifted to organized crime and some wider conspiracy


	...One of the officers found a small postcard addressed to "Chas. Lindbergh, Princeton, J.J." The handwritten message read: "Baby safe, instructions later, act accordingly." This card did not have the handwriting style or the "singnature" from the original ransom note. Nevertheless, the police started an extensive manhunt for the author of this note. A postman interviewed by the police remakred that he had seen the card while emptying a box in the Newark area. After searching nearly two thousands homes, the author was located. He wa sa mentally distrubed young boy who just wanted to see if he could get into the papers. This wild-goose chase was the first, but not the last, during the two-and-a-half-year investigation.



went on a bunch of wild goose chases in 2.5 year investigation

goes over more wild goose chases, cranks calling in

one person had message for Mr.s Lindbergh but just recited Shakespeare

"pig lady" led police to investigate numerous shacks and a diaper

reports of "three people in a green sedan taking pictures" of Lindbergh home



	...The most credible of these early reports came from a young student named Sebastian Benjamin Lupica, who lived about a half mile away from the Sourland estate. On the afternoon of the kidnapping, he had gone to his mailbox, which was jsut across from the entrance to the Lindbergs' home. While there, he saw a Dodge drive by with two peices of a ladder in the back seat. He got a look at the driver and described him as having a "thin face" and wearing a "black overcoat and fedora hat." He was unsure whether he would be able to recognize the man if he saw him again.


why does author think this is most credible?


Location 548:

	...During this time, Lieutenant Keaten and Captain Lamb were putting the available evidence together in an attempt to formulate a possible suspect or at least a type of suspect. The men posed the initial question of whether the cimre had been an inside job.

	The Lindberghs were not normally at the Sourland home on Tuesdays. Usually the couple spent weekends there and stayed at Englewood during the week, so how did the kidnapper know to go to Hopewell instead of Englewood? The police thought that one of the Lindbergs' servants might have inadvertently provided the information to the kidnapper. Betty Gow and the Wateleys both knew that the child was at Sourland that night and were thoroughyl questioned.

	There was also the question of why nothing other than the "cracking sound" had been heard. The police felt that the child would have cried out if handled by someone other than the servants or the family. The family dog had also not responded at any time during the evening. However, the dog, asleep at the far end of the house, may not have detected the sounds of an intruder because of the howling wind that night.

	There were other factors that seemed to indicate inside assistance. The crime had been perfectly timed.


this is a good point you'd have to be a dumb criminal to steal some famous rifle-toting dudes baby with like a 50-50 chance you might run into a bunch of people in the house

could surveil them I guess


	The entire household was eating dinner on the first floor when the kidnapper struck. It was also not considered a coincidence that the kidnapper chose to enter the window with shutters that could not be secured. It also apepared the kidnapper knew which room was the nursery.


Leitenant Keaten theorized someone handed baby to kidnapper, suspected Gow, Lindbergh vouched for her but suspicion heighted due to call with boyfriend Red Johnson


	...The police searched Johnson's car and possessions during the interrogation. The fact that Johnson owned a green coupe was of particular concern because a similar behicle had been reportedly seen on the night of the kidnapping. When the police found an empty milk bottle in Johnson's car, they felt sure they had their man.


reminiscent of Franks murder case

someon says they saw two people in a Grey Winton? Search everone driving a grey winton!


I think this is saying the reports of someone taking pictures in green car added to suspicion of Red. Who reported on someone taking pictures in a green car? (and why would that be newsworthy if reporters were everywhere taking pictures>?)


goes on to say Red johnson lost his composure during questioning, but was eventually cleared. But while investigating found he was an illegal immigrant and deported to Norway.



Location 582: other police disagreed with inside job theory, pointing out there were no curtains, home all over newspapers and would be easy to surveil.


Location 583 says there was still a dispute among investigators about crime and humber of people involved. At this point still relied on bootprints to say cimrinal fled southeast

Lindberghs made first public appeal day after kidnapping.

Anne was "concerned about the child's health as he was just recovering from a cold" and asked the kidnapper to adhere to a diet she told to papers. Lindbergh prepared message with his attorney Breckinridge to negtiate return of his son.


letter included "We urge those who have the child to select any representatives of ours who may be suitable to them at any time and at any place that they may designate."

seems like a recipe for trouble? why put that in there?

went on about keeping secret arrangements between "their representatives and ours"

problem with this is it gives press a lot to go off of to make things up (is that what happened?)


Lindbergh showed signs of being paranoid and suspicious of press earlier--didn't invite the ones who speculated on son's deformity to press conf, didn't want to talk to them at first and generally disliked them in his private life, quickly became suspicous of kidnapping.


but if he suspected press out to get him, he probably showed here less than perfect savvyness in how they work



"Both of these appeals were broadcast on radio stations throughout the country and pastered on the front pages of newspapers worldwide."


while waiting for contact with kidnapper, Lindbergh and State police started on a strategy for the intermediary. around this time rumors were circulating that organizxed crime could be involved. Al Capone offered his contacts and a $10,000 reward to help catch kidnapper in return for release from jail.


	...Lindbergh did not discount the possibility that his son may have been taken by members of organized crime. Against the advice and request of the police, Lindbergh let it be known that he was looking for an intermediary with ties to the mob. The police were irate that Lindbergh would allow criminals to be associated with the investigation, but LIndbergh was now fully in charge and not even the police dared to oppose him. The Colonel had made it clear that he did not want any police interference in his negotiations with the kidnappers. The goal was not the arrest of a suspect but the safe return of his son. He would allow nothing to compromise this.

	Lindbergh's stubborn refusal to let the police handle the early stages of the investigation was a mistake. The police ignored several opportunities to capture the kidnapper rather than upset Colonel Lindbergh. Had these opportunities been taken, there would be no remaining questions about this case. However, Lindbergh's motives are understandable. He just wanted his son back and was not concerned about apprehending the kidnapper. From the perpsective of law enforcement, Lindbergh's position had a negative impact on the investigation.


Lindbergh took control of investigation, decided focus on negotiating release, and police went along with this. Author says this led to opporuntites missed to catch kidnapper. Lindbergh said he was looking for an intermediary with mob ties.


Why did Lindbergh take control of investigation? why suspect mob at this stage?


Location 622: con-man Morris Rosner contacted Brckinridge, said he could help, told them sure mob inolved, referenced Al Capone and Purple Gang of Detriot, asked them to contact with two "associates" Spitale and Bitz.


Location 634: Lindbergh allowed Rosner to read the ransom note, which had the signature, made tracing, showed to Spitale.

	
	...While there were numerous people who attempted to defraud Lindbergh, none ever used the kidnapepr's "signature" or anything even close. The only item indicating that others might have seen the ransom note was a news article from Newark, New Jersy, dated May 13, 1932. This article reveals most of the contents of  the note and does describe the ransom symbol. Someone with the paper may have had an inside contact with the police. However, this article came out over a month after the last ransom note was sent and a day after the baby's body was found.


newspapers made claims that Rosner, Spitale, and Bitz were seen around East Coast and Chicago and Detriot "the mere mention of Chicago and Detroit suggested to som ethat Al Capone or the Purple Gang was somehow involved in the crime. No such connection existed."

Rosner woudl go on to give interview saying he learned the baby alive and would be returned, but never produced proof he claimed.


Location 661:

day after meeting with Rosner, got another letter with kidnapper's signature

letter said we warned you not to make anything public or notify police and now you will have to take the conseuqneces. this means will hold baby until everything is quiet. "It is rely necessary to make a world affair out off this, or to get your baby back as sun as possible"

"Don't by afraid about the baby two lady keeping care of its day and night. We also will feed him according to the diet."


I think the baby was dead by then?


second page said will have to increase ransom and "We will inform you later were to deliver hte mony. but we will note do so until the Police is out of the case and the pappers are quiet"


seems cruel


day after he goes to Rosner who papers have a field day with mob theories and Al-Capone, he gets a letter blaming him for alerting the papers and saying he won't get his baby back until they are "quiet"

so this is going to get him even more angry at the press--they're going to keep the whole thing in the papers for two and a half years while Lindbergh apparently thinking that this is what's keeping him from his son

ransom letter author takes the same attitude as John Lardner, blaming Lindbergh for his incessant press coverage


Location 638:

shortly later, March 5, got a letter at office of Breckinridge, with cover directing to Lindbergh. James Phelan from law firm staff there brougt the note to Lindbergh

said:

	...Dit you reccive ouer letter from March 4. We sent the mail in one off the letter you near Burr Hall-Brooklyn. We know Police interfere with your privatmail, how can we come to any arrangmenets this way. In the future we will send ouer letters to Mr. Breckenbridge at 25 Broadway. We belive Polise captured the letter and dit note Forwadet to you.


did Lindbergh beleive this? the letter would give him cause to distrust the police even more

goes on to say won't accept Lindbergh go-between but will arrange later from their side

says interested in returning boy in good health, thank you for diet information


	...The letter continued on the other side of the sheet:

	Is it nessisery to make a words affair out off it, or to get your Boy back as son as possible

	Wy dit you ingnore ouer letter which we Left in the room. The baby woudt be back long ago. You woudt note get any result from Police, becauce our Kidnaping was planet for a year allredy. But we was afraid the boy would not be strong enough.


goes on about raised ransom

	...We will inform you latter how to deliver the mony, but not befor the Police is out of the cace and the pappers are quiet.

	Please grab a short notice about this letter in the New-York American.

	...Surprisingly, most accounts of this case do not include the final line of this letter. This line is highly significant for two reasons. First, it discloses that the kidnapper read the New York American. Second, the kidnapper had now provided a method to communicate with him. Previously, the messages offered no opportunity to reply.


the kidnapper asked Lindbergh to communicate with him via newspaper. Did Lindbergh get introduced to the idea of communicating via newspaper from this? Guessing Lindbergh would want to simultaneously be discrite while putting something out the Kidnapper would understand, so it would get him thinking about this. This is important to look at since it would open up ways to influence him further


has a list of databases with NY newspapers: https://www.newyorkfamilyhistory.org/subject-guide/online-new-york-newspapers

this New YOrk American? http://onlinebooks.library.upenn.edu/webbin/serial?id=nyjournal


http://www.slate.com/articles/news_and_politics/explainer/2009/03/what_happens_to_the_archives_of_defunct_newspapers.html
	Some newspapers hand over their archives even while they're still in business to save money on storage space. That's why the University of Texas looks after paper clippings for the New York Times and its extinct brethren,the New York Herald Tribune and the New York Journal American.

	In the future, newspaper back issues may be available online. Google launched its advertiser-supported News Archive Program in September with a plan to digitize and index as much of the historical newspaper record as possible.


http://www.cah.utexas.edu/research/nyja.php

says they only have clippings

NY American lost?

it's happened before:

http://www.spiegel.de/international/germany/history-in-ruins-archive-collapse-disaster-for-historians-a-611311.html


maybe not lost, but not easy to get:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/New_York_Journal-American#Archives
	Other afternoon and evening newspapers that expired following the rise of network news in the 1960s donated their clipping files and many darkroom prints of published photographs to libraries. The Hearst Corporation decided to donate the "basic back-copy morgue" of the Journal-American, according to a book about Dorothy Kilgallen, plus darkroom prints and negatives, according to other sources, to the University of Texas at Austin.[14] Office memorandums and letters from politicians and other notables were shredded in 1966.[14] The newspaper is preserved on microfilm in New York City, Washington, DC, and Austin, Texas. Interlibrary loans make the microfilm accessible to people who cannot travel to those cities.

	The Austin facility is the Harry Ransom Center at the University of Texas at Austin. The Ransom Center's Dolph Briscoe Center for American History has the Journal-American morgue of clippings, numbering approximately nine million. Because they are not digitized and because employees of the facility have limited time for communicating by email with people who are searching for very old articles, the people who are searching should know the date of a Journal-American article to locate it on microfilm.


FBI files say Lindbergh put ad in New York American on March 8 through Breckinridge

	"Letter recieved at new address. Will follow your instructions. I also recieved letter mailed to me March 4 and was ready since then. Please hurry on account of mother. Address me to the address you mentioned in your letter. Father."


signed "Mother" and "Father" makes is sound like could be message from someone's parents, message done in way that hard to guess it was from Lindberghs or what it was referring to without inside knowledge of prior communication history

ad was repeated on March 9


back to book:

Location 731: doesn't say if Lindbergh ever put something in the New York American. Apparently, instead put out a press release out confusion of what kidnapper wanted for go-between


	...To answer this question and to provoke additional letters from the kidnapper, Colonel Breckinridge convinced the Lindberghs to issue another statement to the kidnapper offering new go-betweens. Thus, on March 6, 1932, the following announcement appeared on the front pages of newspapers nationwide:

	If the kidnappers of our child are unwilling to deal direct, we fully authorize "Salvy" Spitale and Irving Blitz to act as our go-betweenn. We will also follow any other method suggested by the kidnapers that we can be sure will bring the return of our Child.


	...This annoucnement caused great outcry throughout the country. People were irate that Lindbergh was being forced to deal with gangsters. Many questioned why Lindbergh would allow gangsters to work as go-betweens. How could they be trusted?

	Lindbergh and Breckinridge still felt that underworld involvement was the best hope of getting the baby back alive. Numerous crime figures made bogus offers to help. Few were taken very seriously. The only underworld figure who provided Lindbergh with sound advice was Frank Costello, the head of the Luciano crime family in New York. Costello was contacted by Colonel Breckinridge and asked if he could provide any information. Costello responded a few days later that the baby was not being helpd by anyone in organized crime. He also offered his opinion that the baby was probably dead and that no ransom should be paid.

	Ultimately, the kidnapper never directly responded to this announcement. Instead, a neutral go-between was chosen by the kidnapper himself. The person selected for this assignment would become the most controversial character of the entire debacle.



